ng James Version
__________________________________________________________________

TO THE MOST HIGH AND MIGHTY PRINCE JAMES, BY THE GRACE OF GOD,


   KING OF GREAT BRITIAN, FRANCE, AND IRELAND,


   DEFENDER OF THE FAITH, ETC.


   THE TRANSLATORS OF THE BIBLE WISH GRACE, MERCY, AND PEACE,


   THROUGH JESUS CHRIST OUR Lord


   Great and manifold were the blessings, most dread Sovereign, which
   Almighty God, the Father of all mercies, bestowed upon us the people of
   England, when first he sent Your Majesty's Royal Person to rule and
   reign over us. For whereas it was the expectation of many, who wished
   not well unto our Sion, that, upon the setting of that bright
   Occindental Star, Queen Elizabeth, of most happy memory, some thick and
   palpable clouds of darkness would so have overshadowed this land, that
   men should have been in doubt which way they were to walk, and that it
   should hardly be known who was to direct the unsettled State; the
   appearance of Your Majesty, as of the Sun in his strength, instantly
   dispelled those supposed and surmised mists, and gave unto all that
   were well affected exceeding cause of comfort; especially when we
   beheld the Government established in Your Highness, and Your hopeful
   Seed, by an undoubted Title; and this also accompanied with peace and
   tranquillity at home and abroad.

   But among all of our joys, there was no one that more filled our hearts
   than the blessed continuance of the preaching of God's sacred Word
   among us, which is that inestimable treasure which excelleth all the
   riches of the earth; because the fruit thereof extendeth itself, not
   only to the time spent in this transitory world, but directeth and
   disposeth men unto that eternal happiness which is above in heaven.

   Then not to suffer this fall to the ground, but rather to take it up,
   and to continue it in that state wherein the famous Predecessor of Your
   Highness did leave it; nay, to go forward with the confidence and
   resolution of a man, in maintaining the truth of Christ, and
   propagating it far and near is that which hath so bound and firmly knit
   the hearts of all Your Majesty's loyal and religious people unto You,
   that Your very name is precious among them: their eye doth behold You
   with comfort, and they bless You in their hearts, as that sanctified
   Person, who, under God, is the immediate author of their true
   happiness. And this their contentment doth not diminish or decay, but
   every day increaseth and taketh strength, when they observe that the
   zeal of Your Majesty toward the house of God doth not slack or go
   backward, but is more and more kindled, manifesting itself abroad in
   the farthest parts of Christendom, by writing in defence of the truth,
   (which hath given such a blow unto that Man of Sin as will not be
	healed,) and every day at home, by religious and learned discourse, by
   frequenting the house of God, by hearing the Word preached, by
   cherishing the teachers thereof, by caring for the Church, as a most
   tender and loving nursing father.

   There are infinite arguments of this right Christian and religious
   affection in Your Majesty; but none is more forcible to declare it to
   others than the vehement and perpetuated desire of accomplishing and
   publishing of this work, which now, with all humility, we present unto
   Your Majesty. For when Your Highness had once, out of deep judgement,
   apprehended how convenient it was, that, out of the Original sacred
   Tongues, together with comparing of the labours, both in our own and
   other foreign languages, of many worthy men who went before us, there
   should be one more exact translation of the Holy Scriptures into the
   English tongue; Your Majesty did never desist to urge and to excite
   those to whom it was commended, that the Work might be hastened, and
   that the business might be expedited in so decent a manner, as a matter
   of such importance might justly require.

   And now at last, by the mercy of God, and the continuance of our
   labours, it being brought unto such a conclusion, as that we have great
   hopes that the Church of England shall reap good fruit thereby, we hold
   it our duty to offer it to Your Majesty, not only as to our King and
   Sovereign, but as to the principal mover and author of the Work; humbly
   craving of your most Sacred Majesty, that, since things of this quality
   have ever been subject to the censures of ill-meaning and discontented
   persons, it may receive approbation and patronage from so learned and
   judicious a Prince as Your Highness is; whose allowance and acceptance
   of our labours shall more honour and encourage us, than all the
   calumniations and hard interpretations of other men shall dismay us. So
   that if, on the one side, we shall be traduced by Popish persons at
   home or abroad, who therefore will malign us, because we are poor
   instruments to make God's holy truth to be yet more and more known unto
   the people, whom they desire still to keep in ignorance and darkness;
   or if, on the other side, we shall be maligned by self-conceited
   brethren, who run their own ways, and give liking unto nothing but what
   is framed by themselves, and hammered on their anvil, we may rest
   secure, supported within by the truth and innocency of a good
   conscience, having walked the ways of simplicity and integrity, as
   before the Lord, and sustained without by the powerful protection of
   Your Majesty's grace and favour, which will ever give countenance to
   honest and Christian endeavours against bitter censures and
   uncharitable imputations.

   The Lord of heaven and earth bless Your Majesty with many and happy
   days, that, as his heavenly hand hath enriched Your Highness with many
   singular and extraordinary graces, so You may be the wonder of the
   world in this latter age for happiness and true felicity, to the honour
   of that great God, and the good of his Church, through Jesus Christ our
   Lord and only Saviour.
   __________________________________________________________________

   THE TRANSLATORS TO THE READER

   Preface to the King James Version of 1611

   THE BEST THINGS HAVE BEEN CULMINATED

   Zeal to promote the common good, whether it be by devising anything
   ourselves, or revising that which hath been laboured by others,
   deserveth certainly much respect and esteem, but yet findeth but cold
   entertainment in the world. It is welcomed with suspicion instead of
   love, and with emulation instead of thanks: and if there be any hole
   left for cavil to enter, (and cavil, if it do not find a hole, will
		   make one) it is sure to be misconstrued, and in danger to be condemned.
   This will easily be granted by as many as know story, or have any
   experience. For, was there ever any-projected, that savoured any way of
   newness or renewing, but the same endured many a storm of gainsaying,
   or opposition? A man would think that Civility, wholesome Laws,
   learning and eloquence, Synods, and Church-maintenance, (that we speak
		   of no more things of this kind) should be as safe as a Sanctuary, and
   out of shot, as they say, that no man would lift up the heel, no, nor
   dog move his tongue against the motioners of them. For by the first, we
   are distinguished from brute beasts lead with sensuality; By the
   second, we are bridled and restrained from outrageous behaviour, and
   from doing of injuries, whether by fraud or by violence; By the third,
   we are enabled to inform and reform others, by the light and feeling
   that we have attained unto ourselves; Briefly, by the fourth being
   brought together to a parley face to face, we sooner compose our
   differences than by writings which are endless; And lastly, that the
   Church be sufficiently provided for, is so agreeable to good reason and
   conscience, that those mothers are holden to be less cruel, that kill
   their children as soon as they are born, than those nursing fathers and
   mothers (wheresoever they be) that withdraw from them who hang upon
   their breasts (and upon whose breasts again themselves do hang to
		   receive the Spiritual and sincere milk of the word) livelihood and
   support fit for their estates. Thus it is apparent, that these things
   which we speak of, are of most necessary use, and therefore, that none,
   either without absurdity can speak against them, or without note of
   wickedness can spurn against them.

   Yet for all that, the learned know that certain worthy men [Anacharsis
   with others] have been brought to untimely death for none other fault,
   but for seeking to reduce their Countrymen to god order and discipline;
and that in some Commonwealths [e.g. Locri] it was made a capital
crime, once to motion the making of a new Law for the abrogating of an
old, though the same were most pernicious; And that certain [Cato the
elder], which would be counted pillars of the State, and patterns of
Virtue and Prudence, could not be brought for a long time to give way
to good Letters and refined speech, but bare themselves as averse from
them, as from rocks or boxes of poison; And fourthly, that he was no
babe, but a great clerk [Gregory the Divine], that gave forth (and in
		writing to remain to posterity) in passion peradventure, but yet he
gave forth, that he had not seen any profit to come by any Synod, or
meeting of the Clergy, but rather the contrary; And lastly, against
Church-maintenance and allowance, in such sort, as the Ambassadors and
messengers of the great King of Kings should be furnished, it is not
unknown what a fiction or fable (so it is esteemed, and for no better
		by the reporter himself [Nauclerus], though superstitious) was devised;
Namely, that at such a time as the professors and teachers of
Christianity in the Church of Rome, then a true Church, were liberally
endowed, a voice forsooth was heard from heaven, saying: Now is poison
poured down into the Church, etc. Thus not only as oft as we speak, as
one saith, but also as oft as we do anything of note or consequence, we
subject ourselves to everyone's censure, and happy is he that is least
tossed upon tongues; for utterly to escape the snatch of them it is
impossible. If any man conceit, that this is the lot and portion of the
meaner sort only, and that Princes are privileged by their high estate,
	   he is deceived. "As the sword devoureth as well one as the other," as
	   it is in Samuel [2 Sam 11:25], nay as the great Commander charged his
	   soldiers in a certain battle, to strike at no part of the enemy, but at
	   the face; And as the King of Syria commanded his chief Captains to
	   "fight neither with small nor great, save only against the King of
	   Israel:" [1 Kings 22:31] so it is too true, that Envy striketh most
	   spitefully at the fairest, and at the chiefest. David was a worthy
	   Prince, and no man to be compared to him for his first deeds, and yet
	   for as worthy as act as ever he did (even for bringing back the Ark of
			   God in solemnity) he was scorned and scoffed at by his own wife [2 Sam
	   6:16]. Solomon was greater than David, though not in virtue, yet in
	   power: and by his power and wisdom he built a Temple to the Lord, such
	   a one as was the glory of the land of Israel, and the wonder of the
	   whole world. But was that his magnificence liked of by all? We doubt
	   it. Otherwise, why do they lay it in his son's dish, and call unto him
	   for easing the burden, "Make", say they, "the grievous servitude of thy
	   father, and his sore yoke, lighter?" [1 Kings 12:4] Belike he had
	   charged them with some levies, and troubled them with some carriages;
	   Hereupon they raise up a tragedy, and wish in their heart the Temple
	   had never been built. So hard a thing it is to please all, even when we
	   please God best, and do seek to approve ourselves to every ones
	   conscience.

	   If we will descend to later times, we shall find many the like examples
	   of such kind, or rather unkind acceptance. The first Roman Emperor [C.
	   Caesar. Plutarch] did never do a more pleasing deed to the learned, nor
	   more profitable to posterity, for conserving the record of times in
	   true supputation; than when he corrected the Calendar, and ordered the
	   year according to the course of the Sun; and yet this was imputed to
	   him for novelty, and arrogance, and procured to him great obloguy. So
	   the first Christened Emperor [Constantine] (at the least-wise that
			   openly professed the faith himself, and allowed others to do the like)
	   for strengthening the Empire at his great charges, and providing for
	   the Church, as he did, got for his labour the name Pupillus, as who
	   would say, a wasteful Prince, that had need of a Guardian or overseer
	   [Aurel. Victor]. So the best Christened Emperor [Theodosius], for the
	   love that he bare unto peace, thereby to enrich both himself and his
	   subjects, and because he did not see war but find it, was judged to be
	   no man at arms [Zosimus], (though indeed he excelled in feats of
			   chivalry, and showed so much when he was provoked) and condemned for
	   giving himself to his ease, and to his pleasure. To be short, the most
	   learned Emperor of former times [Justinian], (at the least, the
			   greatest politician) what thanks had he for cutting off the
	   superfluities of the laws, and digesting them into some order and
	   method? This, that he had been blotted by some to be an Epitomist, that
	   is, one that extinguishes worthy whole volumes, to bring his
	   abridgments into request. This is the measure that hath been rendered
	   to excellent Princes in former times, even, Cum bene facerent, male
	   audire, For their good deeds to be evil spoken of. Neither is there any
	   likelihood, that envy and malignity died, and were buried with the
	   ancient. No, no, the reproof of Moses taketh hold of most ages; "You
	   are risen up in your fathers' stead, and increase of sinful men." [Num
	   32:14] "What is that that hath been done? that which shall be done; and
	   there is no new thing under the Sun," saith the wiseman: [Ecc 1:9] and
	   S. Stephen, "As your fathers did, so do you." [Acts 7:51]

	   HIS MAJESTY'S CONSTANCY, NOTWITHSTANDING CULMINATION, FOR THE SURVEY OF THE
	   ENGLISH TRANSLATIONS

	   This, and more to this purpose, His Majesty that now reigneth (and
			   long, and long may he reign, and his offspring forever, "Himself and
			   children, and children's always) knew full well, according to the
	   singular wisdom given unto him by God, and the rare learning and
	   experience that he hath attained unto; namely that whosoever attempteth
	   anything for the public (especially if it pertain to Religion, and to
			   the opening and clearing of the word of God) the same setteth himself
	   upon a stage to be gloated upon by every evil eye, yea, he casteth
	   himself headlong upon pikes, to be gored by every sharp tongue. For he
	   that medleth with men's Religion in any part, medleth with their
	   custom, nay, with their freehold; and though they find no content in
	   that which they have, yet they cannot abide to hear of altering.
	   Notwithstanding his Royal heart was not daunted or discouraged for this
	   that colour, but stood resolute, "as a statue immovable, and an anvil
	   not easy to be beaten into plates," as one [Suidas] saith; he knew who
	   had chosen him to be a Soldier, or rather a Captain, and being assured
	   that the course which he intended made for the glory of God, and the
	   building up of his Church, he would not suffer it to be broken off for
	   whatsoever speeches or practices. It doth certainly belong unto Kings,
	   yea, it doth specially belong unto them, to have care of Religion, yea,
	   it doth specially belong unto them, to have care of Religion, yea, to
	   know it aright, yea, to profess it zealously, yea to promote it to the
	   uttermost of their power. This is their glory before all nations which
	   mean well, and this will bring unto them a far most excellent weight of
	   glory in the day of the Lord Jesus. For the Scripture saith not in
	   vain, "Them that honor me, I will honor," [1 Sam 2:30] neither was it a
	   vain word that Eusebius delivered long ago, that piety towards God was
	   the weapon and the only weapon, that both preserved Constantine's
	   person, and avenged him of his enemies [Eusebius lib 10 cap 8].

	   THE PRAISE OF THE HOLY SCRIPTURES

	But now what piety without truth? what truth (what saving truth)
without the word of God? What word of God (whereof we may be sure)
	without the Scripture? The Scriptures we are commanded to search. John
	5:39. Isa 8:20. They are commended that searched and studied them. Acts
	17:11 and 8:28,29. They are reproved that were unskillful in them, or
	slow to believe them. Matt 22:29. Luke 24:25. They can make us wise
	unto salvation. 2 Tim 3:15. If we be ignorant, they will instruct us;
	if out of the way, they will bring us home; if out of order, they will
	reform us; if in heaviness, comfort us; if dull, quicken us; if cold,
	inflame us. Tolle, lege; Tolle, lege, Take up and read, take up and
	read the Scriptures [S. August. confess. lib 8 cap 12], (for unto them
			was the direction) it was said unto S. Augustine by a supernatural
	voice. "Whatsoever is in the Scriptures, believe me," saith the same S.
	Augustine, "is high and divine; there is verily truth, and a doctrine
	most fit for the refreshing of men's minds, and truly so tempered, that
	everyone may draw from thence that which is sufficient for him, if he
	come to draw with a devout and pious mind, as true Religion requireth."
	[S. August. de utilitcredendi cap. 6] Thus S. Augustine. and S. Jerome:
	"Ama scripturas, et amabit te sapientia etc." [S. Jerome. ad Demetriad]
	Love the Scriptures, and wisdom will love thee. And S. Cyril against
	Julian; "Even boys that are bred up in the Scriptures, become most
	religious, etc. [S. Cyril. 7 contra Iulianum] But what mention we three
	or four uses of the Scripture, whereas whatsoever is to be believed or
	practiced, or hoped for, is contained in them? or three or four
	sentences of the Fathers, since whosoever is worthy the name of a
	Father, from Christ's time downward, hath likewise written not only of
	the riches, but also of the perfection of the Scripture? "I adore the
	fulness of the Scripture," saith Tertullian against Hermogenes.
	[Tertul. advers. Hermo.] And again, to Apelles an heretic of the like
	stamp, he saith; "I do not admit that which thou bringest in (or
	concludest) of thine own (head or store, de tuo) without Scripture."
	[Tertul. de carne Christi.] So Saint Justin Martyr before him; "We must
	know by all means," saith he, "that it is not lawful (or possible) to
	learn (anything) of God or of right piety, save only out of the
	Prophets, who teach us by divine inspiration." So Saint Basil after
	Tertullian, "It is a manifest falling way from the Faith, and a fault
	of presumption, either to reject any of those things that are written,
	or to bring in (upon the head of them) any of those things that are not
	written. We omit to cite to the same effect, S. Cyril B. of Jerusalem
	in his 4::Cataches., Saint Jerome against Helvidius, Saint Augustine in
	his 3::book against the letters of Petilian, and in very many other
	places of his works. Also we forebear to descend to later Fathers,
	because we will not weary the reader. The Scriptures then being
	acknowledged to be so full and so perfect, how can we excuse ourselves
	of negligence, if we do not study them, of curiosity, if we be not
	content with them? Men talk much of [an olive bow wrapped about with
	wood, whereupon did hang figs, and bread, honey in a pot, and oil], how
	many sweet and goodly things it had hanging on it; of the Philosopher's
	stone, that it turned copper into gold; of Cornucopia, that it had all
	things necessary for food in it, of Panaces the herb, that it was good
	for diseases, of Catholicon the drug, that it is instead of all purges;
	of Vulcan's armor, that it was an armor of proof against all thrusts,
	and all blows, etc. Well, that which they falsely or vainly attributed
	to these things for bodily god, we may justly and with full measure
	ascribe unto the Scripture, for spiritual. It is not only an armor, but
	also a whole armory of weapons, both offensive and defensive; whereby
	we may save ourselves and put the enemy to flight. It is not an herb,
	but a tree, or rather a whole paradise of trees of life, which bring
	forth fruit every month, and the fruit thereof is for meat, and the
	leaves for medicine. It is not a pot of Manna, or a cruse of oil, which
	were for memory only, or for a meal's meat or two, but as it were a
	shower of heavenly bread sufficient for a whole host, be it never so
	great; and as it were a whole cellar full of oil vessels; whereby all
	our necessities may be provided for, and our debts discharged. In a
	word, it is a Panary of wholesome food, against fenowed traditions; a
	Physician's shop (Saint Basil called it) [S. Basil in Psal. primum.] of
	preservatives against poisoned heresies; a Pandect of profitable laws,
	against rebellious spirits; a treasury of most costly jewels, against
	beggarly rudiments; finally a fountain of most pure water springing up
	unto everlasting life. And what marvel? The original thereof being from
	heaven, not from earth; the author being God, not man; the inditer, the
	holy spirit, not the wit of the Apostles or Prophets; the Penmen such
	as were sanctified from the womb, and endued with a principal portion
	of God's spirit; the matter, verity, piety, purity, uprightness; the
	form, God's word, God's testimony, God's oracles, the word of truth,
	the word of salvation, etc.; the effects, light of understanding,
	stableness of persuasion, repentance from dead works, newness of life,
	holiness, peace, joy in the holy Ghost; lastly, the end and reward of
	the study thereof, fellowship with the Saints, participation of the
	heavenly nature, fruition of an inheritance immortal, undefiled, and
	that never shall fade away: Happy is the man that delighted in the
	Scripture, and thrice happy that meditateth in it day and night.

	TRANSLATION NECESSARY

	But how shall men meditate in that, which they cannot understand? How
	shall they understand that which is kept close in an unknown tongue? as
	it is written, "Except I know the power of the voice, I shall be to him
	that speaketh, a Barbarian, and he that speaketh, shall be a Barbarian
	to me." [1 Cor 14] The Apostle excepteth no tongue; not Hebrew the
	ancientest, not Greek the most copious, not Latin the finest. Nature
	taught a natural man to confess, that all of us in those tongues which
	we do not understand, are plainly deaf; we may turn the deaf ear unto
	them. The Scythian counted the Athenian, whom he did not understand,
	barbarous; [Clem. Alex. 1 Strom.] so the Roman did the Syrian, and the
	Jew (even S. Jerome himself called the Hebrew tongue barbarous, belike
			because it was strange to so many) [S. Jerome. Damaso.] so the Emperor
	of Constantinople [Michael, Theophili fil.] calleth the Latin tongue,
	barbarous, though Pope Nicolas do storm at it: [2::Tom. Concil. ex
	edit. Petri Crab] so the Jews long before Christ called all other
	nations, Lognazim, which is little better than barbarous. Therefore as
	one complaineth, that always in the Senate of Rome, there was one or
	other that called for an interpreter: [Cicero 5::de finibus.] so lest
	the Church be driven to the like exigent, it is necessary to have
	translations in a readiness. Translation it is that openeth the window,
	to let in the light; that breaketh the shell, that we may eat the
	kernel; that putteth aside the curtain, that we may look into the most
	Holy place; that removeth the cover of the well, that we may come by
	the water, even as Jacob rolled away the stone from the mouth of the
	well, by which means the flocks of Laban were watered [Gen 29:10].
	Indeed without translation into the vulgar tongue, the unlearned are
	but like children at Jacob's well (which is deep) [John 4:11] without a
	bucket or something to draw with; or as that person mentioned by
	Isaiah, to whom when a sealed book was delivered, with this motion,
	"Read this, I pray thee," he was fain to make this answer, "I cannot,
	for it is sealed." [Isa 29:11]

	THE TRANSLATION OF THE OLD TESTAMENT OUT OF THE HEBREW INTO GREEK

	While God would be known only in Jacob, and have his Name great in
	Israel, and in none other place, while the dew lay on Gideon's fleece
	only, and all the earth besides was dry; then for one and the same
	people, which spake all of them the language of Canaan, that is,
	Hebrew, one and the same original in Hebrew was sufficient. [S. August.
	lib 12 contra Faust c32] But, when the fulness of time drew near, that
	the Sun of righteousness, the Son of God should come into the world,
	whom God ordained to be a reconciliation through faith in his blood,
	not of the Jew only, but also of the Greek, yea, of all them that were
	scattered abroad; then lo, it pleased the Lord to stir up the spirit of
	a Greek Prince (Greek for descent and language) even of Ptolemy
	Philadelph King of Egypt, to procure the translating of the Book of God
	out of Hebrew into Greek. This is the translation of the Seventy
	Interpreters, commonly so called, which prepared the way for our
	Saviour among the Gentiles by written preaching, as Saint John Baptist
	did among the Jews by vocal. For the Grecians being desirous of
	learning, were not wont to suffer books of worth to lie moulding in
	Kings' libraries, but had many of their servants, ready scribes, to
	copy them out, and so they were dispersed and made common. Again, the
	Greek tongue was well known and made familiar to most inhabitants in
	Asia, by reason of the conquest that there the Grecians had made, as
	also by the Colonies, which thither they had sent. For the same causes
	also it was well understood in many places of Europe, yea, and of
	Africa too. Therefore the word of God being set forth in Greek,
	becometh hereby like a candle set upon a candlestick, which giveth
	light to all that are in the house, or like a proclamation sounded
	forth in the market place, which most men presently take knowledge of;
	and therefore that language was fittest to contain the Scriptures, both
	for the first Preachers of the Gospel to appeal unto for witness, and
	for the learners also of those times to make search and trial by. It is
	certain, that that Translation was not so sound and so perfect, but it
	needed in many places correction; and who had been so sufficient for
	this work as the Apostles or Apostolic men? Yet it seemed good to the
	holy Ghost and to them, to take that which they found, (the same being
			for the greatest part true and sufficient) rather than making a new, in
	that new world and green age of the Church, to expose themselves to
	many exceptions and cavillations, as though they made a Translations to
	serve their own turn, and therefore bearing a witness to themselves,
	their witness not to be regarded. This may be supposed to be some
	cause, why the Translation of the Seventy was allowed to pass for
	current. Notwithstanding, though it was commended generally, yet it did
	not fully content the learned, no not of the Jews. For not long after
	Christ, Aquila fell in hand with a new Translation, and after him
	Theodotion, and after him Symmachus; yea, there was a fifth and a sixth
	edition, the Authors whereof were not known. [Epiphan. de mensur. et
	ponderibus.] These with the Seventy made up the Hexapla and were
	worthily and to great purpose compiled together by Origen. Howbeit the
	Edition of the Seventy went away with the credit, and therefore not
	only was placed in the midst by Origen (for the worth and excellency
			thereof above the rest, as Epiphanius gathered) but also was used by
	the Greek fathers for the ground and foundation of their Commentaries.
	Yea, Epiphanius above named doeth attribute so much unto it, that he
	holdeth the Authors thereof not only for Interpreters, but also for
	Prophets in some respect [S. August. 2::de dectrin. Christian c. 15];
	and Justinian the Emperor enjoining the Jews his subjects to use
	especially the Translation of the Seventy, rendreth this reason
	thereof, because they were as it were enlightened with prophetical
	grace. Yet for all that, as the Egyptians are said of the Prophet to be
	men and not God, and their horses flesh and not spirit [Isa 31:3]; so
	it is evident, (and Saint Jerome affirmeth as much) [S. Jerome. de
	optimo genere interpret.] that the Seventy were Interpreters, they were
	not Prophets; they did many things well, as learned men; but yet as men
	they stumbled and fell, one while through oversight, another while
	through ignorance, yea, sometimes they may be noted to add to the
	Original, and sometimes to take from it; which made the Apostles to
	leave them many times, when they left the Hebrew, and to deliver the
	sense thereof according to the truth of the word, as the spirit gave
	them utterance. This may suffice touching the Greek Translations of the
	Old Testament.

	TRANSLATION OUT OF HEBREW AND GREEK INTO LATIN

	There were also within a few hundred years after CHRIST, translations
	many into the Latin tongue: for this tongue also was very fit to convey
	the Law and the Gospel by, because in those times very many Countries
	of the West, yea of the South, East and North, spake or understood
	Latin, being made Provinces to the Romans. But now the Latin
	Translations were too many to be all good, for they were infinite
(Latini Interprets nullo modo numerari possunt, saith S. Augustine.)
	[S. Augustin. de doctr. Christ. lib 2 cap II]. Again they were not out
	of the Hebrew fountain (we speak of the Latin Translations of the Old
			Testament) but out of the Greek stream, therefore the Greek being not
	altogether clear, the Latin derived from it must needs be muddy. This
	moved S. Jerome a most learned father, and the best linguist without
	controversy, of his age, or of any that went before him, to undertake
	the translating of the Old Testament, out of the very fountain with
	that evidence of great learning, judgment, industry, and faithfulness,
	that he had forever bound the Church unto him, in a debt of special
	remembrance and thankfulness.

	THE TRANSLATING OF THE SCRIPTURE INTO THE VULGAR TONGUES

	Now through the Church were thus furnished with Greek and Latin
	Translations, even before the faith of CHRIST was generally embraced in
	the Empire; (for the learned know that even in S. Jerome's time, the
			Consul of Rome and his wife were both Ethnics, and about the same time
			the greatest part of the Senate also) [S. Jerome. Marcell.Zosim] yet
	for all that the godly-learned were not content to have the Scriptures
	in the Language which they themselves understood, Greek and Latin, (as
			the good Lepers were not content to fare well themselves, but
			acquainted their neighbors with the store that God had sent, that they
			also might provide for themselves) [2 Kings 7:9] but also for the
	behoof and edifying of the unlearned which hungered and thirsted after
	righteousness, and had souls to be saved as well as they, they provided
	Translations into the vulgar for their Countrymen, insomuch that most
	nations under heaven did shortly after their conversion, hear CHRIST
	speaking unto them in their mother tongue, not by the voice of their
	Minister only, but also by the written word translated. If any doubt
	hereof, he may be satisfied by examples enough, if enough will serve
	the turn. First S. Jerome saith, Multarum gentium linguis Scriptura
	ante translata, docet falsa esse quae addita sunt, etc. i.e. "The
	Scripture being translated before in the languages of many Nations,
	doth show that those things that were added (by Lucian and Hesychius)
	are false." [S. Jerome. praef. in 4::Evangel.] So S. Jerome in that
	place. The same Jerome elsewhere affirmeth that he, the time was, had
	set forth the translation of the Seventy suae linguae hominibus, i.e.,
	for his countrymen of Dalmatia [S. Jerome. Sophronio.] Which words not
	only Erasmus doth understand to purport, that S. Jerome translated the
	Scripture into the Dalmatian tongue, but also Sixtus Senensis [Six.
	Sen. lib 4], and Alphonsus a` Castro [Alphon. lb 1 ca 23] (that we
			speak of no more) men not to be excepted against by them of Rome, do
	ingenuously confess as much. So, S. Chrysostom that lived in S.
	Jerome's time, giveth evidence with him: "The doctrine of S. John
	[saith he] did not in such sort [as the Philosophers' did] vanish away:
	but the Syrians, Egyptians, Indians, Persians, Ethiopians, and infinite
	other nations being barbarous people translated it into their [mother]
	tongue, and have learned to be [true] Philosophers," he meaneth
	Christians. [S. Chrysost. in Johan. cap.I. hom.I.] To this may be added
	Theodoret, as next unto him, both for antiquity, and for learning. His
	words be these, "Every Country that is under the Sun, is full of these
	words (of the Apostles and Prophets) and the Hebrew tongue [he meaneth
	the Scriptures in the Hebrew tongue] is turned not only into the
	Language of the Grecians, but also of the Romans, and Egyptians, and
	Persians, and Indians, and Armenians, and Scythians, and Sauromatians,
	and briefly into all the Languages that any Nation useth. [Theodor. 5.
	Therapeut.] So he. In like manner, Ulfilas is reported by Paulus
	Diaconus and Isidor (and before them by Sozomen) to have translated the
	Scriptures into the Gothic tongue: [P. Diacon. li. 12.] John Bishop of
	Sevil by Vasseus, to have turned them into Arabic, about the year of
	our Lord 717; [Vaseus in Chron. Hispan.] Bede by Cistertiensis, to have
	turned a great part of them into Saxon: Efnard by Trithemius, to have
	abridged the French Psalter, as Beded had done the Hebrew, about the
	year 800: King Alfred by the said Cistertiensis, to have turned the
	Psalter into Saxon: [Polydor. Virg. 5 histor.] Methodius by Aventinus
	(printed at Ingolstadt) to have turned the Scriptures into Slavonian:
	[Aventin. lib. 4.] Valdo, Bishop of Frising by Beatus Rhenanus, to have
	caused about that time, the Gospels to be translated into Dutch rhythm,
	yet extant in the Library of Corbinian: [Circa annum 900. B. Rhenan.
	rerum German. lib 2.] Valdus, by divers to have turned them himself
	into French, about the year 1160: Charles the Fifth of that name,
	surnamed the Wise, to have caused them to be turned into French, about
	200 years after Valdus his time, of which translation there be many
	copies yet extant, as witnesseth Beroaldus. Much about that time, even
	in our King Richard the second's days, John Trevisa translated them
	into English, and many English Bibles in written hand are yet to be
	seen with divers, translated as it is very probable, in that age. So
	the Syrian translation of the New Testament is in most learned men's
	Libraries, of Widminstadius his setting forth, and the Psalter in
	Arabic is with many, of Augustinus Nebiensis' setting forth. So Postel
	affirmeth, that in his travel he saw the Gospels in the Ethiopian
	tongue; And Ambrose Thesius allegeth the Pslater of the Indians, which
	he testifieth to have been set forth by Potken in Syrian characters. So
	that, to have the Scriptures in the mother tongue is not a quaint
	conceit lately taken up, either by the Lord Cromwell in England,
	[Thuan.] or by the Lord Radevile in Polony, or by the Lord Ungnadius in
	the Emperor's dominion, but hath been thought upon, and put in practice
	of old, even from the first times of the conversion of any Nation; no
	doubt, because it was esteemed most profitable, to cause faith to grow
	in men's hearts the sooner, and to make them to be able to say with the
	words of the Psalms, "As we have heard, so we have seen." [Ps 48:8]

	THE UNWILLINGNESS OF OUR CHIEF ADVERSARIES, THAT THE SCRIPTURES SHOULD BE
	DIVULGED IN THE MOTHER TONGUE, ETC.

	Now the Church of Rome would seem at the length to bear a motherly
	affection towards her children, and to allow them the Scriptures in
	their mother tongue: but indeed it is a gift, not deserving to be
	called a gift, an unprofitable gift: [Sophecles] they must first get a
	licence in writing before they may use them, and to get that, they must
	approve themselves to their Confessor, that is, to be such as are, if
	not frozen in the dregs, yet soured with the leaven of their
	superstition. Howbeit, it seemed too much to Clement the Eighth that
	there should be any Licence granted to have them in the vulgar tongue,
	and therefore he overruleth and frustrateth the grant of Pius the
	Fourth. [See the observation (set forth by Clemen. His authority) upon
	the 4. rule of Pius the 4. his making in the index, lib. prohib. pag.
	15. ver. 5.] So much are they afraid of the light of the Scripture,
	(Lucifugae Scripturarum, as Tertulian speaketh) that they will not
	trust the people with it, no not as it is set forth by their own sworn
	men, no not with the Licence of their own Bishops and Inquisitors. Yea,
	so unwilling they are to communicate the Scriptures to the people's
	understanding in any sort, that they are not ashamed to confess, that
	we forced them to translate it into English against their wills. This
	seemeth to argue a bad cause, or a bad conscience, or both. Sure we
	are, that it is not he that hath good gold, that is afraid to bring it
	to the touchstone, but he that hath the counterfeit; [Tertul. de resur.
	carnis.] neither is it the true man that shunneth the light, but the
	malefactor, lest his deeds should be reproved [John 3:20]: neither is
	it the plaindealing Merchant that is unwilling to have the weights, or
	the meteyard brought in place, but he that useth deceit. But we will
	let them alone for this fault, and return to translation.

	THE SPEECHES AND REASONS, BOTH OF OUR BRETHREN, AND OF OUR ADVERSARIES
	AGAINST THIS WORK

	Many men's mouths have been open a good while (and yet are not stopped)
	with speeches about the Translation so long in hand, or rather perusals
	of Translations made before: and ask what may be the reason, what the
	necessity of the employment: Hath the Church been deceived, say they,
	all this while? Hath her sweet bread been mingled with leaven, here
	silver with dross, her wine with water, her milk with lime? (Lacte
			gypsum male miscetur, saith S. Ireney,) [S. Iren. 3. lib. cap. 19.] We
	hoped that we had been in the right way, that we had the Oracles of God
	delivered unto us, and that though all the world had cause to be
	offended and to complain, yet that we had none. Hath the nurse holden
	out the breast, and nothing but wind in it? Hath the bread been
	delivered by the fathers of the Church, and the same proved to be
	lapidosus, as Seneca speaketh? What is it to handle the word of God
	deceitfully, if this be not? Thus certain brethren. Also the
	adversaries of Judah and Jerusalem, like Sanballat in Nehemiah, mock,
	as we hear, both the work and the workmen, saying; "What do these weak
	Jews, etc. will they make the stones whole again out of the heaps of
	dust which are burnt? although they build, yet if a fox go up, he shall
	even break down their stony wall." [Neh 4:3] Was their Translation good
	before? Why do they now mend it? Was it not good? Why then was it
	obtruded to the people? Yea, why did the Catholics (meaning Popish
			Romanists) always go in jeopardy, for refusing to go to hear it? Nay,
	if it must be translated into English, Catholics are fittest to do it.
	They have learning, and they know when a thing is well, they can manum
	de tabula. We will answer them both briefly: and the former, being
	brethren, thus, with S. Jerome, "Damnamus veteres? Mineme, sed post
	priorum studia in domo Domini quod possums laboramus." [S. Jerome.
	Apolog. advers. Ruffin.] That is, "Do we condemn the ancient? In no
	case: but after the endeavors of them that were before us, we take the
	best pains we can in the house of God." As if he said, Being provoked
	by the example of the learned men that lived before my time, I have
	thought it my duty, to assay whether my talent in the knowledge of the
	tongues, may be profitable in any measure to God's Church, lest I
	should seem to laboured in them in vain, and lest I should be thought
	to glory in men, (although ancient,) above that which was in them. Thus
	S. Jerome may be thought to speak.

	A SATISFACTION TO OUR BRETHREN

	And to the same effect say we, that we are so far off from condemning
	any of their labors that travailed before us in this kind, either in
	this land or beyond sea, either in King Henry's time, or King Edward's
	(if there were any translation, or correction of a translation in his
	 time) or Queen Elizabeth's of ever renowned memory, that we acknowledge
	them to have been raised up of God, for the building and furnishing of
	his Church, and that they deserve to be had of us and of posterity in
	everlasting remembrance. The judgment of Aristotle is worthy and well
	known: "If Timotheus had not been, we had not had much sweet music; but
	if Phrynis [Timotheus his master] had not been, we had not had
	Timotheus." Therefore blessed be they, and most honoured be their name,
	that break the ice, and giveth onset upon that which helpeth forward to
	the saving of souls. Now what can be more available thereto, than to
	deliver God's book unto God's people in a tongue which they understand?
	Since of a hidden treasure, and of a fountain that is sealed, there is
	no profit, as Ptolemy Philadelph wrote to the Rabbins or masters of the
	Jews, as witnesseth Epiphanius: [S. Epiphan. loco ante citato.] and as
	S. Augustine saith; "A man had rather be with his dog than with a
	stranger (whose tongue is strange unto him)." [S. Augustin. lib. 19. de
	civil. Dei. c. 7.] Yet for all that, as nothing is begun and perfected
	at the same time, and the later thoughts are thought to be the wiser:
	so, if we building upon their foundation that went before us, and being
	holpen by their labours, do endeavor to make that better which they
	left so good; no man, we are sure, hath cause to mislike us; they, we
	persuade ourselves, if they were alive, would thank us. The vintage of
	Abienzer, that strake the stroke: yet the gleaning of grapes of Ephraim
	was not to be despised. See Judges 8:2. Joash the king of Israel did
	not satisfy himself, till he had smitten the ground three times; and
	yet he offended the Prophet, for giving over then. [2 Kings 13:18-19]
	Aquila, of whom we spake before, translated the Bible as carefully, and
	as skilfully as he could; and yet he thought good to go over it again,
	and then it got the credit with the Jews, to be called accurately done,
	as Saint Jerome witnesseth. [S. Jerome. in Ezech. cap. 3.] How many
	books of profane learning have been gone over again and again, by the
	same translators, by others? Of one and the same book of Aristotle's
	Ethics, there are extant not so few as six or seven several
	translations. Now if this cost may be bestowed upon the gourd, which
	affordeth us a little shade, and which today flourisheth, but tomorrow
	is cut down; what may we bestow, nay what ought we not to bestow upon
	the Vine, the fruit whereof maketh glad the conscience of man, and the
	stem whereof abideth forever? And this is the word of God, which we
	translate. "What is the chaff to the wheat, saith the Lord?" [Jer
23:28] Tanti vitreum, quanti verum margaritum (saith Tertullian,)
	[Tertul. ad Martyr.] if a toy of glass be of that reckoning with us,
	how ought we to value the true pearl? [Jerome. ad Salvin.] Therefore
	let no man's eye be evil, because his Majesty's is good; neither let
	any be grieved, that we have a Prince that seeketh the increase of the
	spiritual wealth of Israel (let Sanballats and Tobiahs do so, which
			therefore do bear their just reproof) but let us rather bless God from
	the ground of our heart, for working this religious care in him, to
	have the translations of the Bible maturely considered of and examined.
	For by this means it cometh to pass, that whatsoever is sound already
	(and all is sound for substance, in one or other of our editions, and
	 the worst of ours far better than their authentic vulgar) the same will
	shine as gold more brightly, being rubbed and polished; also, if
	anything be halting, or superfluous, or not so agreeable to the
	original, the same may be corrected, and the truth set in place. And
	what can the King command to be done, that will bring him more true
	honour than this? and wherein could they that have been set a work,
	approve their duty to the King, yea their obedience to God, and love to
	his Saints more, than by yielding their service, and all that is within
	them, for the furnishing of the work? But besides all this, they were
	the principal motives of it, and therefore ought least to quarrel it:
	for the very Historical truth is, that upon the importunate petitions
	of the Puritans, at his Majesty's coming to this Crown, the Conference
	at Hampton Court having been appointed for hearing their complaints:
	when by force of reason they were put from other grounds, they had
	recourse at the last, to this shift, that they could not with good
	conscience subscribe to the Communion book, since it maintained the
	Bible as it was there translated, which was as they said, a most
	corrupted translation. And although this was judged to be but a very
	poor and empty shift; yet even hereupon did his Majesty begin to
	bethink himself of the good that might ensue by a new translation, and
	presently after gave order for this Translation which is now presented
	unto thee. Thus much to satisfy our scrupulous Brethren.

	AN ANSWER TO THE IMPUTATIONS OF OUR ADVERSARIES

	Now to the latter we answer; that we do not deny, nay we affirm and
	avow, that the very meanest translation of the Bible in English, set
	forth by men of our profession, (for we have seen none of theirs of the
			whole Bible as yet) containeth the word of God, nay, is the word of
	God. As the King's speech, which he uttereth in Parliament, being
	translated into French, Dutch, Italian, and Latin, is still the King's
	speech, though it be not interpreted by every Translator with the like
	grace, nor peradventure so fitly for phrase, nor so expressly for
	sense, everywhere. For it is confessed, that things are to take their
	denomination of the greater part; and a natural man could say, Verum
	ubi multa nitent in carmine, non ego paucis offendor maculis, etc.
	[Horace.] A man may be counted a virtuous man, though he have made many
	slips in his life, (else, there were none virtuous, for in many things
			we offend all) [James 3:2] also a comely man and lovely, though he have
	some warts upon his hand, yea, not only freckles upon his face, but
	also scars. No cause therefore why the word translated should be denied
	to be the word, or forbidden to be current, notwithstanding that some
	imperfections and blemishes may be noted in the setting forth of it.
	For whatever was perfect under the Sun, where Apostles or Apostolic
	men, that is, men endued with an extraordinary measure of God's spirit,
	and privileged with the privilege of infallibility, had not their hand?
	The Romanists therefore in refusing to hear, and daring to burn the
	Word translated, did no less than despite the spirit of grace, from
	whom originally it proceeded, and whose sense and meaning, as well as
	man's weakness would enable, it did express. Judge by an example or
	two. Plutarch writeth, that after that Rome had been burnt by the
	Gauls, they fell soon to build it again: but doing it in haste, they
	did not cast the streets, nor proportion the houses in such comely
	fashion, as had been most slightly and convenient; [Plutarch in
	Camillo.] was Catiline therefore an honest man, or a good patriot, that
	sought to bring it to a combustion? or Nero a good Prince, that did
	indeed set it on fire? So, by the story of Ezra, and the prophecy of
	Haggai it may be gathered, that the Temple built by Zerubbabel after
	the return from Babylon, was by no means to be compared to the former
	built by Solomon (for they that remembered the former, wept when they
			considered the latter) [Ezra 3:12] notwithstanding, might this latter
	either have been abhorred and forsaken by the Jews, or profaned by the
	Greeks? The like we are to think of Translations. The translation of
	the Seventy dissenteth from the Original in many places, neither doth
	it come near it, for perspicuity, gravity, majesty; yet which of the
	Apostles did condemn it? Condemn it? Nay, they used it, (as it is
			apparent, and as Saint Jerome and most learned men do confess) which
	they would not have done, nor by their example of using it, so grace
	and commend it to the Church, if it had been unworthy of the
	appellation and name of the word of God. And whereas they urge for
	their second defence of their vilifying and abusing of the English
	Bibles, or some pieces thereof, which they meet with, for that heretics
	(forsooth) were the Authors of the translations, (heretics they call us
			by the same right that they call themselves Catholics, both being
			wrong) we marvel what divinity taught them so. We are sure Tertullian
	was of another mind: Ex personis probamus fidem, an ex fide personas?
	[Tertul. de praescript. contra haereses.] Do we try men's faith by
	their persons? we should try their persons by their faith. Also S.
	Augustine was of another mind: for he lighting upon certain rules made
	by Tychonius a Donatist, for the better understanding of the word, was
	not ashamed to make use of them, yea, to insert them into his own book,
	with giving commendation to them so far forth as they were worthy to be
	commended, as is to be seen in S. Augustine's third book De doctrina
	Christiana. [S. August. 3. de doct. Christ. cap. 30.] To be short,
	Origen, and the whole Church of God for certain hundred years, were of
	another mind: for they were so far from treading under foot, (much more
			from burning) the Translation of Aquila a Proselyte, that is, one that
	had turned Jew; of Symmachus, and Theodotion, both Ebionites, that is,
	most vile heretics, that they joined together with the Hebrew Original,
	and the Translation of the Seventy (as hath been before signified out
			of Epiphanius) and set them forth openly to be considered of and
	perused by all. But we weary the unlearned, who need not know so much,
	and trouble the learned, who know it already.

	Yet before we end, we must answer a third cavil and objection of theirs
	against us, for altering and amending our Translations so oft; wherein
	truly they deal hardly, and strangely with us. For to whomever was it
	imputed for a fault (by such as were wise) to go over that which he had
	done, and to amend it where he saw cause? Saint Augustine was not
	afraid to exhort S. Jerome to a Palinodia or recantation; [S. Aug.
	Epist. 9.] and doth even glory that he seeth his infirmities. [S. Aug.
	Epist. 8.] If we be sons of the Truth, we must consider what it
	speaketh, and trample upon our own credit, yea, and upon other men's
	too, if either be any way an hindrance to it. This to the cause: then
	to the persons we say, that of all men they ought to be most silent in
	this case. For what varieties have they, and what alterations have they
	made, not only of their Service books, Portesses and Breviaries, but
	also of their Latin Translation? The Service book supposed to be made
	by S. Ambrose (Officium Ambrosianum) was a great while in special use
	and request; but Pope Hadrian calling a Council with the aid of Charles
	the Emperor, abolished it, yea, burnt it, and commanded the Service
	book of Saint Gregory universally to be used. [Durand. lib. 5. cap. 2.]
	Well, Officium Gregorianum gets by this means to be in credit, but doth
	it continue without change or altering? No, the very Roman Service was
	of two fashions, the New fashion, and the Old, (the one used in one
			Church, the other in another) as is to be seen in Pamelius a Romanist,
	his Preface, before Micrologus. the same Pamelius reporteth out
	Radulphus de Rivo, that about the year of our Lord, 1277, Pope Nicolas
	the Third removed out of the Churches of Rome, the more ancient books
	(of Service) and brought into use the Missals of the Friers Minorites,
	and commanded them to be observed there; insomuch that about an hundred
	years after, when the above name Radulphus happened to be at Rome, he
	found all the books to be new, (of the new stamp). Neither were there
	this chopping and changing in the more ancient times only, but also of
	late: Pius Quintus himself confesseth, that every Bishopric almost had
	a peculiar kind of service, most unlike to that which others had: which
	moved him to abolish all other Breviaries, though never so ancient, and
	privileged and published by Bishops in their Dioceses, and to establish
	and ratify that only which was of his own setting forth, in the year
	1568. Now when the father of their Church, who gladly would heal the
	sore of the daughter of his people softly and slightly, and make the
	best of it, findeth so great fault with them for their odds and
	jarring; we hope the children have no great cause to vaunt of their
	uniformity. But the difference that appeareth between our Translations,
	and our often correcting of them, is the thing that we are specially
	charged with; let us see therefore whether they themselves be without
	fault this way, (if it be to be counted a fault, to correct) and
	whether they be fit men to throw stones at us: O tandem maior parcas
	insane minori: they that are less sound themselves, out not to object
	infirmities to others. [Horat.] If we should tell them that Valla,
	Stapulensis, Erasmus, and Vives found fault with their vulgar
	Translation, and consequently wished the same to be mended, or a newness   one to be made, they would answer peradventure, that we produced their
	enemies for witnesses against them; albeit, they were in no other sort
	enemies, than as S. Paul was to the Galatians, for telling them the
	truth [Gal 4:16]: and it were to be wished, that they had dared to tell
	it them plainlier and oftener. But what will they say to this, that
	Pope Leo the Tenth allowed Erasmus' Translation of the New Testament,
	so much different from the vulgar, by his Apostolic Letter and Bull;
that the same Leo exhorted Pagnine to translate the whole Bible, and
bare whatsoever charges was necessary for the work? [Sixtus Senens.]
Surely, as the Apostle reasoneth to the Hebrews, that if the former Law
and Testament had been sufficient, there had been no need of the
latter: [Heb 7:11 and 8:7] so we may say, that if the old vulgar had
been at all points allowable, to small purpose had labour and charges
been undergone, about framing of a new. If they say, it was one Pope's
private opinion, and that he consulted only himself; then we are able
to go further with them, and to aver, that more of their chief men of
all sorts, even their own Trent champions Paiva and Vega, and their own
Inquisitors, Hieronymus ab Oleastro, and their own Bishop Isidorus
Clarius, and their own Cardinal Thomas a Vio Caietan, do either make
new Translations themselves, or follow new ones of other men's making,
	or note the vulgar Interpreter for halting; none of them fear to
	dissent from him, nor yet to except against him. And call they this an
	uniform tenor of text and judgment about the text, so many of their
	Worthies disclaiming the now received conceit? Nay, we will yet come
	nearer the quick: doth not their Paris edition differ from the Lovaine,
	and Hentenius his from them both, and yet all of them allowed by
	authority? Nay, doth not Sixtus Quintus confess, that certain Catholics
	(he meaneth certain of his own side) were in such an humor of
	translating the Scriptures into Latin, that Satan taking occasion by
	them, though they thought of no such matter, did strive what he could,
	out of so uncertain and manifold a variety of Translations, so to
	mingle all things, that nothing might seem to be left certain and firm
	in them, etc.? [Sixtus 5. praefat. fixa Bibliis.] Nay, further, did not
	the same Sixtus ordain by an inviolable decree, and that with the
	counsel and consent of his Cardinals, that the Latin edition of the old
	and new Testament, which the Council of Trent would have to be
	authentic, is the same without controversy which he then set forth,
	being diligently corrected and printed in the Printinghouse of Vatican?
	Thus Sixtus in his Preface before his Bible. And yet Clement the Eighth
	his immediate successor, published another edition of the Bible,
	containing in it infinite differences from that of Sixtus, (and many of
			them weighty and material) and yet this must be authentic by all means.
	What is to have the faith of our glorious Lord JESUS CHRIST with Yea or
	Nay, if this be not? Again, what is sweet harmony and consent, if this
	be? Therefore, as Demaratus of Corinth advised a great King, before he
	talked of the dissensions of the Grecians, to compose his domestic
	broils (for at that time his Queen and his son and heir were at deadly
			feud with him) so all the while that our adversaries do make so many
	and so various editions themselves, and do jar so much about the worth
	and authority of them, they can with no show of equity challenge us for
	changing and correcting.

	THE PURPOSE OF THE TRANSLATORS, WITH THEIR NUMBER, FURNITURE, CARE, ETC.

	But it is high time to leave them, and to show in brief what we
	proposed to ourselves, and what course we held in this our perusal and
	survey of the Bible. Truly (good Christian Reader) we never thought
	from the beginning, that we should need to make a new Translation, nor
	yet to make of a bad one a good one, (for then the imputation of Sixtus
			had been true in some sort, that our people had been fed with gall of
			Dragons instead of wine, with whey instead of milk:) but to make a good
	one better, or out of many good ones, one principal good one, not
	justly to be excepted against; that hath been our endeavor, that our
	mark. To that purpose there were many chosen, that were greater in
	other men's eyes than in their own, and that sought the truth rather
	than their own praise. Again, they came or were thought to come to the
	work, not exercendi causa (as one saith) but exercitati, that is,
	learned, not to learn: For the chief overseer and [NOTE: Greek letters
	omitted] under his Majesty, to whom not only we, but also our whole
	Church was much bound, knew by his wisdom, which thing also Nazianzen
	taught so long ago, that it is a preposterous order to teach first and
	to learn after, yea that [NOTE: Greek letters omitted] to learn and
	practice together, is neither commendable for the workman, nor safe for
	the work. [Idem in Apologet.] Therefore such were thought upon, as
	could say modestly with Saint Jerome, Et Hebreaeum Sermonem ex parte
	didicimus, et in Latino pene ab ipsis incunabulis etc. detriti sumus.
	"Both we have learned the Hebrew tongue in part, and in the Latin we
	have been exercised almost from our very cradle." S. Jerome maketh no
	mention of the Greek tongue, wherein yet he did excel, because he
	translated not the old Testament out of Greek, but out of Hebrew. And
	in what sort did these assemble? In the trust of their own knowledge,
	or of their sharpness of wit, or deepness of judgment, as it were in an
	arm of flesh? At no hand. They trusted in him that hath the key of
	David, opening and no man shutting; they prayed to the Lord the Father
	of our Lord, to the effect that S. Augustine did; "O let thy Scriptures
	be my pure delight, let me not be deceived in them, neither let me
	deceive by them." [S. Aug. lib. II. Confess. cap. 2.] In this
	confidence, and with this devotion did they assemble together; not too
	many, lest one should trouble another; and yet many, lest many things
	haply might escape them. If you ask what they had before them, truly it
	was the Hebrew text of the Old Testament, the Greek of the New. These
	are the two golden pipes, or rather conduits, where-through the olive
	branches empty themselves into the gold. Saint Augustine calleth them
	precedent, or original tongues; [S. August. 3. de doctr. c. 3. etc.]
	Saint Jerome, fountains. [S. Jerome. ad Suniam et Fretel.] The same
	Saint Jerome affirmeth, [S. Jerome. ad Lucinium, Dist. 9 ut veterum.]
	and Gratian hath not spared to put it into his Decree, That "as the
	credit of the old Books" (he meaneth of the Old Testament) "is to be
	tried by the Hebrew Volumes, so of the New by the Greek tongue," he
	meaneth by the original Greek. If truth be tried by these tongues, then
	whence should a Translation be made, but out of them? These tongues
	therefore, the Scriptures we say in those tongues, we set before us to
	translate, being the tongues wherein God was pleased to speak to his
	Church by the Prophets and Apostles. Neither did we run over the work
	with that posting haste that the Septuagint did, if that be true which
	is reported of them, that they finished it in 72 days; [Joseph. Antiq.
	lib. 12.] neither were we barred or hindered from going over it again,
	having once done it, like S. Jerome, if that be true which himself
	reporteth, that he could no sooner write anything, but presently it was
	caught from him, and published, and he could not have leave to mend it:
	[S. Jerome. ad Pammac. pro libr. advers. Iovinian.] neither, to be
	short, were we the first that fell in hand with translating the
	Scripture into English, and consequently destitute of former helps, as
	it is written of Origen, that he was the first in a manner, that put
	his hand to write Commentaries upon the Scriptures, [Sophoc. in Elect.]
	and therefore no marvel, if he overshot himself many times. None of
	these things: the work hath not been huddled up in 72 days, but hath
	cost the workmen, as light as it seemeth, the pains of twice seven
	times seventy two days and more: matters of such weight and consequence
	are to be speeded with maturity: for in a business of movement a man
	feareth not the blame of convenient slackness. [S. Chrysost. in II.
	Thess. cap. 2.] Neither did we think much to consult the Translators or
	Commentators, Chaldee, Hebrew, Syrian, Greek or Latin, no nor the
	Spanish, French, Italian, or Dutch; neither did we disdain to revise
	that which we had done, and to bring back to the anvil that which we
	had hammered: but having and using as great helps as were needful, and
	fearing no reproach for slowness, nor coveting praise for expedition,
	we have at length, through the good hand of the Lord upon us, brought
	the work to that pass that you see.

	REASONS MOVING US TO SET DIVERSITY OF SENSES IN THE MARGIN, WHERE THERE IS
	GREAT PROBABILITY FOR EACH

	Some peradventure would have no variety of senses to be set in the
	margin, lest the authority of the Scriptures for deciding of
	controversies by that show of uncertainty, should somewhat be shaken.
	But we hold their judgment not to be sound in this point. For though,
	"whatsoever things are necessary are manifest," as S. Chrysostom saith,
	[S. Chrysost. in II. Thess. cap. 2.] and as S. Augustine, "In those
	things that are plainly set down in the Scriptures, all such matters
	are found that concern Faith, Hope, and Charity. [S. Aug. 2. de doctr.
	Christ. cap. 9.] Yet for all that it cannot be dissembled, that partly
	to exercise and whet our wits, partly to wean the curious from the
	loathing of them for their everywhere plainness, partly also to stir up
	our devotion to crave the assistance of God's spirit by prayer, and
	lastly, that we might be forward to seek aid of our brethren by
	conference, and never scorn those that be not in all respects so
	complete as they should be, being to seek in many things ourselves, it
	hath pleased God in his divine providence, here and there to scatter
	words and sentences of that difficulty and doubtfulness, not in
	doctrinal points that concern salvation, (for in such it hath been
			vouched that the Scriptures are plain) but in matters of less moment,
	that fearfulness would better beseem us than confidence, and if we will
	resolve upon modesty with S. Augustine, (though not in this same case
			altogether, yet upon the same ground) Melius est debitare de occultis,
	quam litigare de incertis, [S. Aug li. S. de Genes. ad liter. cap. 5.]
	"it is better to make doubt of those things which are secret, than to
	strive about those things that are uncertain." There be many words in
	the Scriptures, which be never found there but once, (having neither
			brother or neighbor, as the Hebrews speak) so that we cannot be holpen
	by conference of places. Again, there be many rare names of certain
	birds, beasts and precious stones, etc. concerning the Hebrews
	themselves are so divided among themselves for judgment, that they may
	seem to have defined this or that, rather because they would say
	something, than because they were sure of that which they said, as S.
	Jerome somewhere saith of the Septuagint. Now in such a case, doth not
	a margin do well to admonish the Reader to seek further, and not to
	conclude or dogmatize upon this or that peremptorily? For as it is a
	fault of incredulity, to doubt of those things that are evident: so to
	determine of such things as the Spirit of God hath left (even in the
			judgment of the judicious) questionable, can be no less than
	presumption. Therefore as S. Augustine saith, that variety of
	Translations is profitable for the finding out of the sense of the
	Scriptures: [S. Aug. 2. De doctr. Christian. cap. 14.] so diversity of
	signification and sense in the margin, where the text is no so clear,
	must needs do good, yea, is necessary, as we are persuaded. We know
	that Sixtus Quintus expressly forbiddeth, that any variety of readings
	of their vulgar edition, should be put in the margin, [Sixtus 5. praef.
	Bibliae.] (which though it be not altogether the same thing to that we
			have in hand, yet it looketh that way) but we think he hath not all of
	his own side his favorers, for this conceit. They that are wise, had
	rather have their judgments at liberty in differences of readings, than
	to be captivated to one, when it may be the other. If they were sure
	that their high Priest had all laws shut up in his breast, as Paul the
	Second bragged, [Plat. in Paulo secundo.] and that he were as free from
	error by special privilege, as the Dictators of Rome were made by law
	inviolable, it were another matter; then his word were an Oracle, his
	opinion a decision. But the eyes of the world are now open, God be
	thanked, and have been a great while, they find that he is subject to
	the same affections and infirmities that others be, that his skin is
	penetrable, and therefore so much as he proveth, not as much as he
	claimeth, they grant and embrace.

	REASONS INDUCING US NOT TO STAND CURIOUSLY UPON AN IDENTITY OF PHRASING

	Another things we think good to admonish thee of (gentle Reader) that
	we have not tied ourselves to an uniformity of phrasing, or to an
	identity of words, as some peradventure would wish that we had done,
	because they observe, that some learned men somewhere, have been as
	exact as they could that way. Truly, that we might not vary from the
	sense of that which we had translated before, if the word signified
	that same in both places (for there be some words that be not the same
			sense everywhere) we were especially careful, and made a conscience,
	according to our duty. But, that we should express the same notion in
	the same particular word; as for example, if we translate the Hebrew or
	Greek word once by PURPOSE, never to call it INTENT; if one where
	JOURNEYING, never TRAVELING; if one where THINK, never SUPPOSE; if one
	where PAIN, never ACHE; if one where JOY, never GLADNESS, etc. Thus to
	mince the matter, we thought to savour more of curiosity than wisdom,
	and that rather it would breed scorn in the Atheist, than bring profit
	to the godly Reader. For is the kingdom of God to become words or
	syllables? why should we be in bondage to them if we may be free, use
	one precisely when we may use another no less fit, as commodiously? A
	godly Father in the Primitive time showed himself greatly moved, that
	one of newfangledness called [NOTE: Greek omitted but was a dispute
	over the word for "a bed"] [Niceph. Calist. lib.8. cap.42.] though the
	difference be little or none; and another reporteth that he was much
	abused for turning "Cucurbita" (to which reading the people had been
			used) into "Hedera". [S. Jerome in 4. Ionae. See S. Aug: epist. 10.]
	Now if this happens in better times, and upon so small occasions, we
	might justly fear hard censure, if generally we should make verbal and
	unnecessary changings. We might also be charged (by scoffers) with some
	unequal dealing towards a great number of good English words. For as it
	is written of a certain great Philosopher, that he should say , that
	those logs were happy that were made images to be worshipped; for their
	fellows, as good as they, lay for blocks behind the fire: so if we
	should say, as it were, unto certain words, Stand up higher, have a
	place in the Bible always, and to others of like quality, Get ye hence,
	be banished forever, we might be taxed peradventure with S. James his
	words, namely, "To be partial in ourselves and judges of evil
	thoughts." Add hereunto, that niceness in words was always counted the
	next step to trifling, and so was to be curious about names too: also
	that we cannot follow a better pattern for elocution than God himself;
	therefore he using divers words, in his holy writ, and indifferently
	for one thing in nature: [see Euseb. li. 12. ex Platon.] we, if we will
	not be superstitious, may use the same liberty in our English versions
	out of Hebrew and Greek, for that copy or store that he hath given us.
	Lastly, we have on the one side avoided the scrupulosity of the
	Puritans, who leave the old Ecclesiastical words, and betake them to
	other, as when they put WASHING for BAPTISM, and CONGREGATION instead
	of CHURCH: as also on the other side we have shunned the obscurity of
	the Papists, in their AZIMES, TUNIKE, RATIONAL, HOLOCAUSTS, PRAEPUCE,
	PASCHE, and a number of such like, whereof their late Translation is
	full, and that of purpose to darken the sense, that since they must
	needs translate the Bible, yet by the language thereof, it may be kept
	from being understood. But we desire that the Scripture may speak like
	itself, as in the language of Canaan, that it may be understood even of
	the very vulgar.

	Many other things we might give thee warning of (gentle Reader) if we
	had not exceeded the measure of a Preface already. It remaineth, that
	we commend thee to God, and to the Spirit of his grace, which is able
	to build further than we can ask or think. He removeth the scales from
	our eyes, the vail from our hearts, opening our wits that we may
	understand his word, enlarging our hearts, yea correcting our
	affections, that we may love it to the end. Ye are brought unto
	fountains of living water which ye digged not; do not cast earth into
	them with the Philistines, neither prefer broken pits before them with
	the wicked Jews. [Gen 26:15. Jer 2:13.] Others have laboured, and you
	may enter into their labours; O receive not so great things in vain, O
	despise not so great salvation! Be not like swine to tread under foot
	so precious things, neither yet like dogs to tear and abuse holy
	things. Say not to our Saviour with the Gergesites, Depart out of our
	coast [Matt 8:34]; neither yet with Esau sell your birthright for a
	mess of pottage [Heb 12:16]. If light be come into the world, love not
	darkness more than light; if food, if clothing be offered, go not
	naked, starve not yourselves. Remember the advice of Nazianzene, "It is
	a grievous thing" (or dangerous) "to neglect a great fair, and to seek
	to make markets afterwards: also the encouragement of S. Chrysostom,
	"It is altogether impossible, that he that is sober" (and watchful)
	"should at any time be neglected:" [S. Chrysost. in epist. ad Rom. cap.
	14. oral. 26.] Lastly, the admonition and menacing of S. Augustine,
	"They that despise God's will inviting them, shall feel God's will
	taking vengeance of them." [S. August. ad artic. sibi falso object.
	Artic. 16.] It is a fearful thing to fall into the hands of the living
	God; [Heb 10:31] but a blessed thing it is, and will bring us to
	everlasting blessedness in the end, when God speaketh unto us, to
	hearken; when he setteth his word before us, to read it; when he
	stretcheth out his hand and calleth, to answer, Here am I, here we are   to do thy will, O God. The Lord work a care and conscience in us to
	know him and serve him, that we may be acknowledged of him at the
	appearing of our Lord Jesus Christ, to whom with the holy Ghost, be all
	praise and thanksgiving.

	Amen.
	__________________________________________________________________

	Old Testament
	__________________________________________________________________

	The First Book of Moses, called

	Genesis
	__________________________________________________________________

	Chapter 1

	In the beginning God created the heaven and the earth.

	^2And the earth was without form, and void; and darkness was upon the
	face of the deep. And the Spirit of God moved upon the face of the
	waters.

	^3And God said, Let there be light: and there was light.

	^4And God saw the light, that it was good: and God divided the light
	from the darkness.

	^5And God called the light Day, and the darkness he called Night. And
	the evening and the morning were the first day.

	^6And God said, Let there be a firmament in the midst of the waters,
	and let it divide the waters from the waters.

	^7And God made the firmament, and divided the waters which were under
	the firmament from the waters which were above the firmament: and it
	was so.

	^8And God called the firmament Heaven. And the evening and the morning
	were the second day.

	^9And God said, Let the waters under the heaven be gathered together
	unto one place, and let the dry land appear: and it was so.

	^10And God called the dry land Earth; and the gathering together of the
	waters called he Seas: and God saw that it was good.

	^11And God said, Let the earth bring forth grass, the herb yielding
	seed, and the fruit tree yielding fruit after his kind, whose seed is
	in itself, upon the earth: and it was so.

	^12And the earth brought forth grass, and herb yielding seed after his
	kind, and the tree yielding fruit, whose seed was in itself, after his
	kind: and God saw that it was good.

	^13And the evening and the morning were the third day.

	^14And God said, Let there be lights in the firmament of the heaven to
	divide the day from the night; and let them be for signs, and for
	seasons, and for days, and years:

	^15And let them be for lights in the firmament of the heaven to give
	light upon the earth: and it was so.

	^16And God made two great lights; the greater light to rule the day,
	and the lesser light to rule the night: he made the stars also.

	^17And God set them in the firmament of the heaven to give light upon
	the earth,

	^18And to rule over the day and over the night, and to divide the light
	from the darkness: and God saw that it was good.

	^19And the evening and the morning were the fourth day.

	^20And God said, Let the waters bring forth abundantly the moving
	creature that hath life, and fowl that may fly above the earth in the
	open firmament of heaven.

	^21And God created great whales, and every living creature that moveth,
	which the waters brought forth abundantly, after their kind, and every
	winged fowl after his kind: and God saw that it was good.

	^22And God blessed them, saying, Be fruitful, and multiply, and fill
	the waters in the seas, and let fowl multiply in the earth.

	^23And the evening and the morning were the fifth day.

	^24And God said, Let the earth bring forth the living creature after
	his kind, cattle, and creeping thing, and beast of the earth after his
	kind: and it was so.

	^25And God made the beast of the earth after his kind, and cattle after
	their kind, and every thing that creepeth upon the earth after his
	kind: and God saw that it was good.

	^26And God said, Let us make man in our image, after our likeness: and
	let them have dominion over the fish of the sea, and over the fowl of
	the air, and over the cattle, and over all the earth, and over every
	creeping thing that creepeth upon the earth.

	^27So God created man in his own image, in the image of God created he
	him; male and female created he them.

	^28And God blessed them, and God said unto them, Be fruitful, and
	multiply, and replenish the earth, and subdue it: and have dominion
	over the fish of the sea, and over the fowl of the air, and over every
	living thing that moveth upon the earth.

	^29And God said, Behold, I have given you every herb bearing seed,
	which is upon the face of all the earth, and every tree, in the which
	is the fruit of a tree yielding seed; to you it shall be for meat.

	^30And to every beast of the earth, and to every fowl of the air, and
	to every thing that creepeth upon the earth, wherein there is life, I
	have given every green herb for meat: and it was so.

	^31And God saw every thing that he had made, and, behold, it was very
	good. And the evening and the morning were the sixth day.
	__________________________________________________________________

	Chapter 2

	Thus the heavens and the earth were finished, and all the host of them.

	^2And on the seventh day God ended his work which he had made; and he
	rested on the seventh day from all his work which he had made.

	^3And God blessed the seventh day, and sanctified it: because that in
	it he had rested from all his work which God created and made.

	^4These are the generations of the heavens and of the earth when they
	were created, in the day that the Lord God made the earth and the
	heavens,

	^5And every plant of the field before it was in the earth, and every
	herb of the field before it grew: for the Lord God had not caused it to
	rain upon the earth, and there was not a man to till the ground.

	^6But there went up a mist from the earth, and watered the whole face
	of the ground.

	^7And the Lord God formed man of the dust of the ground, and breathed
	into his nostrils the breath of life; and man became a living soul.

	^8And the Lord God planted a garden eastward in Eden; and there he put
	the man whom he had formed.

	^9And out of the ground made the Lord God to grow every tree that is
	pleasant to the sight, and good for food; the tree of life also in the
	midst of the garden, and the tree of knowledge of good and evil.

	^10And a river went out of Eden to water the garden; and from thence it
	was parted, and became into four heads.

	^11The name of the first is Pison: that is it which compasseth the
	whole land of Havilah, where there is gold;

	^12And the gold of that land is good: there is bdellium and the onyx
	stone.

	^13And the name of the second river is Gihon: the same is it that
	compasseth the whole land of Ethiopia.

	^14And the name of the third river is Hiddekel: that is it which goeth
	toward the east of Assyria. And the fourth river is Euphrates.

	^15And the Lord God took the man, and put him into the garden of Eden
	to dress it and to keep it.

	^16And the Lord God commanded the man, saying, Of every tree of the
	garden thou mayest freely eat:

	^17But of the tree of the knowledge of good and evil, thou shalt not
	eat of it: for in the day that thou eatest thereof thou shalt surely
	die.

	^18And the Lord God said, It is not good that the man should be alone;
	I will make him an help meet for him.

	^19And out of the ground the Lord God formed every beast of the field,
	and every fowl of the air; and brought them unto Adam to see what he
	would call them: and whatsoever Adam called every living creature, that
	was the name thereof.

	^20And Adam gave names to all cattle, and to the fowl of the air, and
	to every beast of the field; but for Adam there was not found an help
	meet for him.

	^21And the Lord God caused a deep sleep to fall upon Adam, and he
	slept: and he took one of his ribs, and closed up the flesh instead
	thereof;

	^22And the rib, which the Lord God had taken from man, made he a woman,
	and brought her unto the man.

	^23And Adam said, This is now bone of my bones, and flesh of my flesh:
	she shall be called Woman, because she was taken out of Man.

	^24Therefore shall a man leave his father and his mother, and shall
	cleave unto his wife: and they shall be one flesh.

	^25And they were both naked, the man and his wife, and were not
	ashamed.
	__________________________________________________________________

	Chapter 3

	Now the serpent was more subtil than any beast of the field which the
	Lord God had made. And he said unto the woman, Yea, hath God said, Ye
	shall not eat of every tree of the garden?

	^2And the woman said unto the serpent, We may eat of the fruit of the
	trees of the garden:

	^3But of the fruit of the tree which is in the midst of the garden, God
	hath said, Ye shall not eat of it, neither shall ye touch it, lest ye
	die.

	^4And the serpent said unto the woman, Ye shall not surely die:

	^5For God doth know that in the day ye eat thereof, then your eyes
	shall be opened, and ye shall be as gods, knowing good and evil.

	^6And when the woman saw that the tree was good for food, and that it
	was pleasant to the eyes, and a tree to be desired to make one wise,
	she took of the fruit thereof, and did eat, and gave also unto her
	husband with her; and he did eat.

	^7And the eyes of them both were opened, and they knew that they were
	naked; and they sewed fig leaves together, and made themselves aprons.

	^8And they heard the voice of the Lord God walking in the garden in the
	cool of the day: and Adam and his wife hid themselves from the presence
	of the Lord God amongst the trees of the garden.

	^9And the Lord God called unto Adam, and said unto him, Where art thou?

	^10And he said, I heard thy voice in the garden, and I was afraid,
	because I was naked; and I hid myself.

	^11And he said, Who told thee that thou wast naked? Hast thou eaten of
	the tree, whereof I commanded thee that thou shouldest not eat?

	^12And the man said, The woman whom thou gavest to be with me, she gave
	me of the tree, and I did eat.

	^13And the Lord God said unto the woman, What is this that thou hast
	done? And the woman said, The serpent beguiled me, and I did eat.

	^14And the Lord God said unto the serpent, Because thou hast done this,
	thou art cursed above all cattle, and above every beast of the field;
upon thy belly shalt thou go, and dust shalt thou eat all the days of
thy life:

^15And I will put enmity between thee and the woman, and between thy
seed and her seed; it shall bruise thy head, and thou shalt bruise his
heel.

^16Unto the woman he said, I will greatly multiply thy sorrow and thy
conception; in sorrow thou shalt bring forth children; and thy desire
shall be to thy husband, and he shall rule over thee.

^17And unto Adam he said, Because thou hast hearkened unto the voice of
thy wife, and hast eaten of the tree, of which I commanded thee,
	saying, Thou shalt not eat of it: cursed is the ground for thy sake; in
	sorrow shalt thou eat of it all the days of thy life;

	^18Thorns also and thistles shall it bring forth to thee; and thou
	shalt eat the herb of the field;

	^19In the sweat of thy face shalt thou eat bread, till thou return unto
	the ground; for out of it wast thou taken: for dust thou art, and unto
	dust shalt thou return.

	^20And Adam called his wife's name Eve; because she was the mother of
	all living.

	^21Unto Adam also and to his wife did the Lord God make coats of skins,
	and clothed them.

	^22And the Lord God said, Behold, the man is become as one of us, to
	know good and evil: and now, lest he put forth his hand, and take also
	of the tree of life, and eat, and live for ever:

	^23Therefore the Lord God sent him forth from the garden of Eden, to
	till the ground from whence he was taken.

	^24So he drove out the man; and he placed at the east of the garden of
	Eden Cherubims, and a flaming sword which turned every way, to keep the
	way of the tree of life.
	__________________________________________________________________

	Chapter 4

	And Adam knew Eve his wife; and she conceived, and bare Cain, and said,
	I have gotten a man from the Lord.

	^2And she again bare his brother Abel. And Abel was a keeper of sheep,
	but Cain was a tiller of the ground.

	^3And in process of time it came to pass, that Cain brought of the
	fruit of the ground an offering unto the Lord.

	^4And Abel, he also brought of the firstlings of his flock and of the
	fat thereof. And the Lord had respect unto Abel and to his offering:

	^5But unto Cain and to his offering he had not respect. And Cain was
	very wroth, and his countenance fell.

	^6And the Lord said unto Cain, Why art thou wroth? and why is thy
	countenance fallen?

	^7If thou doest well, shalt thou not be accepted? and if thou doest not
	well, sin lieth at the door. And unto thee shall be his desire, and
	thou shalt rule over him.

	^8And Cain talked with Abel his brother: and it came to pass, when they
	were in the field, that Cain rose up against Abel his brother, and slew
	him.

	^9And the Lord said unto Cain, Where is Abel thy brother? And he said,
	I know not: Am I my brother's keeper?

	^10And he said, What hast thou done? the voice of thy brother's blood
	crieth unto me from the ground.

	^11And now art thou cursed from the earth, which hath opened her mouth
	to receive thy brother's blood from thy hand;

	^12When thou tillest the ground, it shall not henceforth yield unto
	thee her strength; a fugitive and a vagabond shalt thou be in the
	earth.

	^13And Cain said unto the Lord, My punishment is greater than I can
	bear.

	^14Behold, thou hast driven me out this day from the face of the earth;
	and from thy face shall I be hid; and I shall be a fugitive and a
	vagabond in the earth; and it shall come to pass, that every one that
	findeth me shall slay me.

	^15And the Lord said unto him, Therefore whosoever slayeth Cain,
	vengeance shall be taken on him sevenfold. And the Lord set a mark upon
	Cain, lest any finding him should kill him.

	^16And Cain went out from the presence of the Lord, and dwelt in the
	land of Nod, on the east of Eden.

	^17And Cain knew his wife; and she conceived, and bare Enoch: and he
	builded a city, and called the name of the city, after the name of his
	son, Enoch.

	^18And unto Enoch was born Irad: and Irad begat Mehujael: and Mehujael
	begat Methusael: and Methusael begat Lamech.

	^19And Lamech took unto him two wives: the name of the one was Adah,
	and the name of the other Zillah.

	^20And Adah bare Jabal: he was the father of such as dwell in tents,
	and of such as have cattle.

	^21And his brother's name was Jubal: he was the father of all such as
	handle the harp and organ.

	^22And Zillah, she also bare Tubal- cain, an instructer of every
	artificer in brass and iron: and the sister of Tubalcain was Naamah.

	^23And Lamech said unto his wives, Adah and Zillah, Hear my voice; ye
	wives of Lamech, hearken unto my speech: for I have slain a man to my
	wounding, and a young man to my hurt.

	^24If Cain shall be avenged sevenfold, truly Lamech seventy and
	sevenfold.

	^25And Adam knew his wife again; and she bare a son, and called his
	name Seth: For God, said she, hath appointed me another seed instead of
	Abel, whom Cain slew.

	^26And to Seth, to him also there was born a son; and he called his
	name Enos: then began men to call upon the name of the Lord.
	__________________________________________________________________

	Chapter 5

	This is the book of the generations of Adam. In the day that God
	created man, in the likeness of God made he him;

	^2Male and female created he them; and blessed them, and called their
	name Adam, in the day when they were created.

	^3And Adam lived an hundred and thirty years, and begat a son in his
	own likeness, after his image; and called his name Seth:

	^4And the days of Adam after he had begotten Seth were eight hundred
	years: and he begat sons and daughters:

	^5And all the days that Adam lived were nine hundred and thirty years:
	and he died.

	^6And Seth lived an hundred and five years, and begat Enos:

	^7And Seth lived after he begat Enos eight hundred and seven years, and
	begat sons and daughters:

	^8And all the days of Seth were nine hundred and twelve years: and he
	died.

	^9And Enos lived ninety years, and begat Cainan:

	^10And Enos lived after he begat Cainan eight hundred and fifteen
	years, and begat sons and daughters:

	^11And all the days of Enos were nine hundred and five years: and he
	died.

	^12And Cainan lived seventy years, and begat Mahalaleel:

	^13And Cainan lived after he begat Mahalaleel eight hundred and forty
	years, and begat sons and daughters:

	^14And all the days of Cainan were nine hundred and ten years: and he
	died.

	^15And Mahalaleel lived sixty and five years, and begat Jared:

	^16And Mahalaleel lived after he begat Jared eight hundred and thirty
	years, and begat sons and daughters:

	^17And all the days of Mahalaleel were eight hundred ninety and five
	years: and he died.

	^18And Jared lived an hundred sixty and two years, and he begat Enoch:

	^19And Jared lived after he begat Enoch eight hundred years, and begat
	sons and daughters:

	^20And all the days of Jared were nine hundred sixty and two years: and
	he died.

	^21And Enoch lived sixty and five years, and begat Methuselah:

	^22And Enoch walked with God after he begat Methuselah three hundred
	years, and begat sons and daughters:

	^23And all the days of Enoch were three hundred sixty and five years:

	^24And Enoch walked with God: and he was not; for God took him.

	^25And Methuselah lived an hundred eighty and seven years, and begat
	Lamech:

	^26And Methuselah lived after he begat Lamech seven hundred eighty and
	two years, and begat sons and daughters:

	^27And all the days of Methuselah were nine hundred sixty and nine
	years: and he died.

	^28And Lamech lived an hundred eighty and two years, and begat a son:

	^29And he called his name Noah, saying, This same shall comfort us
	concerning our work and toil of our hands, because of the ground which
	the Lord hath cursed.

	^30And Lamech lived after he begat Noah five hundred ninety and five
	years, and begat sons and daughters:

	^31And all the days of Lamech were seven hundred seventy and seven
	years: and he died.

	^32And Noah was five hundred years old: and Noah begat Shem, Ham, and
	Japheth.
	__________________________________________________________________

	Chapter 6

	And it came to pass, when men began to multiply on the face of the
	earth, and daughters were born unto them,

	^2That the sons of God saw the daughters of men that they were fair;
	and they took them wives of all which they chose.

	^3And the Lord said, My spirit shall not always strive with man, for
	that he also is flesh: yet his days shall be an hundred and twenty
	years.

	^4There were giants in the earth in those days; and also after that,
	when the sons of God came in unto the daughters of men, and they bare
	children to them, the same became mighty men which were of old, men of
	renown.

	^5And GOD saw that the wickedness of man was great in the earth, and
	that every imagination of the thoughts of his heart was only evil
	continually.

	^6And it repented the Lord that he had made man on the earth, and it
	grieved him at his heart.

	^7And the Lord said, I will destroy man whom I have created from the
	face of the earth; both man, and beast, and the creeping thing, and the
	fowls of the air; for it repenteth me that I have made them.

	^8But Noah found grace in the eyes of the Lord.

	^9These are the generations of Noah: Noah was a just man and perfect in
	his generations, and Noah walked with God.

	^10And Noah begat three sons, Shem, Ham, and Japheth.

	^11The earth also was corrupt before God, and the earth was filled with
	violence.

	^12And God looked upon the earth, and, behold, it was corrupt; for all
	flesh had corrupted his way upon the earth.

	^13And God said unto Noah, The end of all flesh is come before me; for
	the earth is filled with violence through them; and, behold, I will
	destroy them with the earth.

	^14Make thee an ark of gopher wood; rooms shalt thou make in the ark,
	and shalt pitch it within and without with pitch.

	^15And this is the fashion which thou shalt make it of: The length of
	the ark shall be three hundred cubits, the breadth of it fifty cubits,
	and the height of it thirty cubits.

	^16A window shalt thou make to the ark, and in a cubit shalt thou
	finish it above; and the door of the ark shalt thou set in the side
	thereof; with lower, second, and third stories shalt thou make it.

	^17And, behold, I, even I, do bring a flood of waters upon the earth,
	to destroy all flesh, wherein is the breath of life, from under heaven;
and every thing that is in the earth shall die.

^18But with thee will I establish my covenant; and thou shalt come into   the ark, thou, and thy sons, and thy wife, and thy sons' wives with
thee.

^19And of every living thing of all flesh, two of every sort shalt thou
bring into the ark, to keep them alive with thee; they shall be male
and female.

^20Of fowls after their kind, and of cattle after their kind, of every
creeping thing of the earth after his kind, two of every sort shall
come unto thee, to keep them alive.

^21And take thou unto thee of all food that is eaten, and thou shalt
gather it to thee; and it shall be for food for thee, and for them.

^22Thus did Noah; according to all that God commanded him, so did he.
__________________________________________________________________

Chapter 7

And the Lord said unto Noah, Come thou and all thy house into the ark;
for thee have I seen righteous before me in this generation.

^2Of every clean beast thou shalt take to thee by sevens, the male and
his female: and of beasts that are not clean by two, the male and his
female.

^3Of fowls also of the air by sevens, the male and the female; to keep
seed alive upon the face of all the earth.

^4For yet seven days, and I will cause it to rain upon the earth forty
days and forty nights; and every living substance that I have made will
I destroy from off the face of the earth.

^5And Noah did according unto all that the Lord commanded him.

^6And Noah was six hundred years old when the flood of waters was upon
the earth.

^7And Noah went in, and his sons, and his wife, and his sons' wives
with him, into the ark, because of the waters of the flood.

^8Of clean beasts, and of beasts that are not clean, and of fowls, and
of every thing that creepeth upon the earth,

   ^9There went in two and two unto Noah into the ark, the male and the
   female, as God had commanded Noah.

   ^10And it came to pass after seven days, that the waters of the flood
   were upon the earth.

   ^11In the six hundredth year of Noah's life, in the second month, the
   seventeenth day of the month, the same day were all the fountains of
   the great deep broken up, and the windows of heaven were opened.

   ^12And the rain was upon the earth forty days and forty nights.

   ^13In the selfsame day entered Noah, and Shem, and Ham, and Japheth,
   the sons of Noah, and Noah's wife, and the three wives of his sons with
   them, into the ark;

   ^14They, and every beast after his kind, and all the cattle after their
   kind, and every creeping thing that creepeth upon the earth after his
   kind, and every fowl after his kind, every bird of every sort.

   ^15And they went in unto Noah into the ark, two and two of all flesh,
   wherein is the breath of life.

   ^16And they that went in, went in male and female of all flesh, as God
   had commanded him: and the Lord shut him in.

   ^17And the flood was forty days upon the earth; and the waters
   increased, and bare up the ark, and it was lift up above the earth.

   ^18And the waters prevailed, and were increased greatly upon the earth;
   and the ark went upon the face of the waters.

   ^19And the waters prevailed exceedingly upon the earth; and all the
   high hills, that were under the whole heaven, were covered.

   ^20Fifteen cubits upward did the waters prevail; and the mountains were
   covered.

   ^21And all flesh died that moved upon the earth, both of fowl, and of
   cattle, and of beast, and of every creeping thing that creepeth upon
   the earth, and every man:

   ^22All in whose nostrils was the breath of life, of all that was in the
   dry land, died.

   ^23And every living substance was destroyed which was upon the face of
   the ground, both man, and cattle, and the creeping things, and the fowl
   of the heaven; and they were destroyed from the earth: and Noah only
   remained alive, and they that were with him in the ark.

   ^24And the waters prevailed upon the earth an hundred and fifty days.
   __________________________________________________________________

   Chapter 8

   And God remembered Noah, and every living thing, and all the cattle
   that was with him in the ark: and God made a wind to pass over the
   earth, and the waters asswaged;

   ^2The fountains also of the deep and the windows of heaven were
   stopped, and the rain from heaven was restrained;

   ^3And the waters returned from off the earth continually: and after the
   end of the hundred and fifty days the waters were abated.

   ^4And the ark rested in the seventh month, on the seventeenth day of
   the month, upon the mountains of Ararat.

   ^5And the waters decreased continually until the tenth month: in the
   tenth month, on the first day of the month, were the tops of the
   mountains seen.

   ^6And it came to pass at the end of forty days, that Noah opened the
   window of the ark which he had made:

   ^7And he sent forth a raven, which went forth to and fro, until the
   waters were dried up from off the earth.

   ^8Also he sent forth a dove from him, to see if the waters were abated
   from off the face of the ground;

   ^9But the dove found no rest for the sole of her foot, and she returned
   unto him into the ark, for the waters were on the face of the whole
   earth: then he put forth his hand, and took her, and pulled her in unto
   him into the ark.

   ^10And he stayed yet other seven days; and again he sent forth the dove
   out of the ark;

   ^11And the dove came in to him in the evening; and, lo, in her mouth
   was an olive leaf pluckt off: so Noah knew that the waters were abated
   from off the earth.

   ^12And he stayed yet other seven days; and sent forth the dove; which
   returned not again unto him any more.

   ^13And it came to pass in the six hundredth and first year, in the
   first month, the first day of the month, the waters were dried up from
   off the earth: and Noah removed the covering of the ark, and looked,
   and, behold, the face of the ground was dry.

   ^14And in the second month, on the seven and twentieth day of the
   month, was the earth dried.

   ^15And God spake unto Noah, saying,

   ^16Go forth of the ark, thou, and thy wife, and thy sons, and thy sons'
   wives with thee.

   ^17Bring forth with thee every living thing that is with thee, of all
   flesh, both of fowl, and of cattle, and of every creeping thing that
   creepeth upon the earth; that they may breed abundantly in the earth,
   and be fruitful, and multiply upon the earth.

   ^18And Noah went forth, and his sons, and his wife, and his sons' wives
   with him:

   ^19Every beast, every creeping thing, and every fowl, and whatsoever
   creepeth upon the earth, after their kinds, went forth out of the ark.

   ^20And Noah builded an altar unto the Lord; and took of every clean
   beast, and of every clean fowl, and offered burnt offerings on the
   altar.

   ^21And the Lord smelled a sweet savour; and the Lord said in his heart,
   I will not again curse the ground any more for man's sake; for the
   imagination of man's heart is evil from his youth; neither will I again
   smite any more every thing living, as I have done.

   ^22While the earth remaineth, seedtime and harvest, and cold and heat,
   and summer and winter, and day and night shall not cease.
   __________________________________________________________________

   Chapter 9

   And God blessed Noah and his sons, and said unto them, Be fruitful, and
   multiply, and replenish the earth.

   ^2And the fear of you and the dread of you shall be upon every beast of
   the earth, and upon every fowl of the air, upon all that moveth upon
   the earth, and upon all the fishes of the sea; into your hand are they
   delivered.

   ^3Every moving thing that liveth shall be meat for you; even as the
   green herb have I given you all things.

   ^4But flesh with the life thereof, which is the blood thereof, shall ye
   not eat.

   ^5And surely your blood of your lives will I require; at the hand of
   every beast will I require it, and at the hand of man; at the hand of
   every man's brother will I require the life of man.

   ^6Whoso sheddeth man's blood, by man shall his blood be shed: for in
   the image of God made he man.

   ^7And you, be ye fruitful, and multiply; bring forth abundantly in the
   earth, and multiply therein.

   ^8And God spake unto Noah, and to his sons with him, saying,

   ^9And I, behold, I establish my covenant with you, and with your seed
   after you;

   ^10And with every living creature that is with you, of the fowl, of the
   cattle, and of every beast of the earth with you; from all that go out
   of the ark, to every beast of the earth.

   ^11And I will establish my covenant with you; neither shall all flesh
   be cut off any more by the waters of a flood; neither shall there any
   more be a flood to destroy the earth.

   ^12And God said, This is the token of the covenant which I make between
   me and you and every living creature that is with you, for perpetual
   generations:

   ^13I do set my bow in the cloud, and it shall be for a token of a
   covenant between me and the earth.

   ^14And it shall come to pass, when I bring a cloud over the earth, that
   the bow shall be seen in the cloud:

   ^15And I will remember my covenant, which is between me and you and
   every living creature of all flesh; and the waters shall no more become
   a flood to destroy all flesh.

   ^16And the bow shall be in the cloud; and I will look upon it, that I
   may remember the everlasting covenant between God and every living
   creature of all flesh that is upon the earth.

   ^17And God said unto Noah, This is the token of the covenant, which I
   have established between me and all flesh that is upon the earth.

   ^18And the sons of Noah, that went forth of the ark, were Shem, and
   Ham, and Japheth: and Ham is the father of Canaan.

   ^19These are the three sons of Noah: and of them was the whole earth
   overspread.

   ^20And Noah began to be an husbandman, and he planted a vineyard:

   ^21And he drank of the wine, and was drunken; and he was uncovered
   within his tent.

   ^22And Ham, the father of Canaan, saw the nakedness of his father, and
   told his two brethren without.

   ^23And Shem and Japheth took a garment, and laid it upon both their
   shoulders, and went backward, and covered the nakedness of their
   father; and their faces were backward, and they saw not their father's
   nakedness.

   ^24And Noah awoke from his wine, and knew what his younger son had done
   unto him.

   ^25And he said, Cursed be Canaan; a servant of servants shall he be
   unto his brethren.

   ^26And he said, Blessed be the Lord God of Shem; and Canaan shall be
   his servant.

   ^27God shall enlarge Japheth, and he shall dwell in the tents of Shem;
   and Canaan shall be his servant.

   ^28And Noah lived after the flood three hundred and fifty years.

   ^29And all the days of Noah were nine hundred and fifty years: and he
   died.
   __________________________________________________________________

   Chapter 10

   Now these are the generations of the sons of Noah, Shem, Ham, and
   Japheth: and unto them were sons born after the flood.

   ^2The sons of Japheth; Gomer, and Magog, and Madai, and Javan, and
   Tubal, and Meshech, and Tiras.

   ^3And the sons of Gomer; Ashkenaz, and Riphath, and Togarmah.

   ^4And the sons of Javan; Elishah, and Tarshish, Kittim, and Dodanim.

   ^5By these were the isles of the Gentiles divided in their lands; every
   one after his tongue, after their families, in their nations.

   ^6And the sons of Ham; Cush, and Mizraim, and Phut, and Canaan.

   ^7And the sons of Cush; Seba, and Havilah, and Sabtah, and Raamah, and
   Sabtecha: and the sons of Raamah; Sheba, and Dedan.

   ^8And Cush begat Nimrod: he began to be a mighty one in the earth.

   ^9He was a mighty hunter before the Lord: wherefore it is said, Even as
   Nimrod the mighty hunter before the Lord.

   ^10And the beginning of his kingdom was Babel, and Erech, and Accad,
   and Calneh, in the land of Shinar.

   ^11Out of that land went forth Asshur, and builded Nineveh, and the
   city Rehoboth, and Calah,

   ^12And Resen between Nineveh and Calah: the same is a great city.

   ^13And Mizraim begat Ludim, and Anamim, and Lehabim, and Naphtuhim,

   ^14And Pathrusim, and Casluhim, (out of whom came Philistim,) and
   Caphtorim.

   ^15And Canaan begat Sidon his firstborn, and Heth,

   ^16And the Jebusite, and the Amorite, and the Girgasite,

   ^17And the Hivite, and the Arkite, and the Sinite,

   ^18And the Arvadite, and the Zemarite, and the Hamathite: and afterward
   were the families of the Canaanites spread abroad.

   ^19And the border of the Canaanites was from Sidon, as thou comest to
   Gerar, unto Gaza; as thou goest, unto Sodom, and Gomorrah, and Admah,
   and Zeboim, even unto Lasha.

   ^20These are the sons of Ham, after their families, after their
   tongues, in their countries, and in their nations.

   ^21Unto Shem also, the father of all the children of Eber, the brother
   of Japheth the elder, even to him were children born.

   ^22The children of Shem; Elam, and Asshur, and Arphaxad, and Lud, and
   Aram.

   ^23And the children of Aram; Uz, and Hul, and Gether, and Mash.

   ^24And Arphaxad begat Salah; and Salah begat Eber.

   ^25And unto Eber were born two sons: the name of one was Peleg; for in
   his days was the earth divided; and his brother's name was Joktan.

   ^26And Joktan begat Almodad, and Sheleph, and Hazarmaveth, and Jerah,

   ^27And Hadoram, and Uzal, and Diklah,

   ^28And Obal, and Abimael, and Sheba,

   ^29And Ophir, and Havilah, and Jobab: all these were the sons of
   Joktan.

   ^30And their dwelling was from Mesha, as thou goest unto Sephar a mount
   of the east.

   ^31These are the sons of Shem, after their families, after their
   tongues, in their lands, after their nations.

   ^32These are the families of the sons of Noah, after their generations,
   in their nations: and by these were the nations divided in the earth
   after the flood.
   __________________________________________________________________

   Chapter 11

   And the whole earth was of one language, and of one speech.

   ^2And it came to pass, as they journeyed from the east, that they found
   a plain in the land of Shinar; and they dwelt there.

   ^3And they said one to another, Go to, let us make brick, and burn them
   throughly. And they had brick for stone, and slime had they for morter.

   ^4And they said, Go to, let us build us a city and a tower, whose top
   may reach unto heaven; and let us make us a name, lest we be scattered
   abroad upon the face of the whole earth.

   ^5And the Lord came down to see the city and the tower, which the
   children of men builded.

   ^6And the Lord said, Behold, the people is one, and they have all one
   language; and this they begin to do: and now nothing will be restrained
   from them, which they have imagined to do.

   ^7Go to, let us go down, and there confound their language, that they
   may not understand one another's speech.

   ^8So the Lord scattered them abroad from thence upon the face of all
   the earth: and they left off to build the city.

   ^9Therefore is the name of it called Babel; because the Lord did there
   confound the language of all the earth: and from thence did the Lord
   scatter them abroad upon the face of all the earth.

   ^10These are the generations of Shem: Shem was an hundred years old,
   and begat Arphaxad two years after the flood:

   ^11And Shem lived after he begat Arphaxad five hundred years, and begat
   sons and daughters.

   ^12And Arphaxad lived five and thirty years, and begat Salah:

   ^13And Arphaxad lived after he begat Salah four hundred and three
   years, and begat sons and daughters.

   ^14And Salah lived thirty years, and begat Eber:

   ^15And Salah lived after he begat Eber four hundred and three years,
   and begat sons and daughters.

   ^16And Eber lived four and thirty years, and begat Peleg:

   ^17And Eber lived after he begat Peleg four hundred and thirty years,
   and begat sons and daughters.

   ^18And Peleg lived thirty years, and begat Reu:

   ^19And Peleg lived after he begat Reu two hundred and nine years, and
   begat sons and daughters.

   ^20And Reu lived two and thirty years, and begat Serug:

   ^21And Reu lived after he begat Serug two hundred and seven years, and
   begat sons and daughters.

   ^22And Serug lived thirty years, and begat Nahor:

   ^23And Serug lived after he begat Nahor two hundred years, and begat
   sons and daughters.

   ^24And Nahor lived nine and twenty years, and begat Terah:

   ^25And Nahor lived after he begat Terah an hundred and nineteen years,
   and begat sons and daughters.

   ^26And Terah lived seventy years, and begat Abram, Nahor, and Haran.

   ^27Now these are the generations of Terah: Terah begat Abram, Nahor,
   and Haran; and Haran begat Lot.

   ^28And Haran died before his father Terah in the land of his nativity,
   in Ur of the Chaldees.

   ^29And Abram and Nahor took them wives: the name of Abram's wife was
   Sarai; and the name of Nahor's wife, Milcah, the daughter of Haran, the
   father of Milcah, and the father of Iscah.

   ^30But Sarai was barren; she had no child.

   ^31And Terah took Abram his son, and Lot the son of Haran his son's
   son, and Sarai his daughter in law, his son Abram's wife; and they went
   forth with them from Ur of the Chaldees, to go into the land of Canaan;
   and they came unto Haran, and dwelt there.

   ^32And the days of Terah were two hundred and five years: and Terah
   died in Haran.
   __________________________________________________________________

   Chapter 12

   Now the Lord had said unto Abram, Get thee out of thy country, and from
   thy kindred, and from thy father's house, unto a land that I will shew
   thee:

   ^2And I will make of thee a great nation, and I will bless thee, and
   make thy name great; and thou shalt be a blessing:

   ^3And I will bless them that bless thee, and curse him that curseth
   thee: and in thee shall all families of the earth be blessed.

   ^4So Abram departed, as the Lord had spoken unto him; and Lot went with
   him: and Abram was seventy and five years old when he departed out of
   Haran.

   ^5And Abram took Sarai his wife, and Lot his brother's son, and all
   their substance that they had gathered, and the souls that they had
   gotten in Haran; and they went forth to go into the land of Canaan; and
   into the land of Canaan they came.

   ^6And Abram passed through the land unto the place of Sichem, unto the
   plain of Moreh. And the Canaanite was then in the land.

   ^7And the Lord appeared unto Abram, and said, Unto thy seed will I give
   this land: and there builded he an altar unto the Lord, who appeared
   unto him.

   ^8And he removed from thence unto a mountain on the east of Bethel, and
   pitched his tent, having Bethel on the west, and Hai on the east: and
   there he builded an altar unto the Lord, and called upon the name of
   the Lord.

   ^9And Abram journeyed, going on still toward the south.

   ^10And there was a famine in the land: and Abram went down into Egypt
   to sojourn there; for the famine was grievous in the land.

   ^11And it came to pass, when he was come near to enter into Egypt, that
   he said unto Sarai his wife, Behold now, I know that thou art a fair
   woman to look upon:

   ^12Therefore it shall come to pass, when the Egyptians shall see thee,
   that they shall say, This is his wife: and they will kill me, but they
   will save thee alive.

   ^13Say, I pray thee, thou art my sister: that it may be well with me
   for thy sake; and my soul shall live because of thee.

   ^14And it came to pass, that, when Abram was come into Egypt, the
   Egyptians beheld the woman that she was very fair.

   ^15The princes also of Pharaoh saw her, and commended her before
   Pharaoh: and the woman was taken into Pharaoh's house.

   ^16And he entreated Abram well for her sake: and he had sheep, and
   oxen, and he asses, and menservants, and maidservants, and she asses,
   and camels.

   ^17And the Lord plagued Pharaoh and his house with great plagues
   because of Sarai Abram's wife.

   ^18And Pharaoh called Abram, and said, What is this that thou hast done
   unto me? why didst thou not tell me that she was thy wife?

   ^19Why saidst thou, She is my sister? so I might have taken her to me
   to wife: now therefore behold thy wife, take her, and go thy way.

   ^20And Pharaoh commanded his men concerning him: and they sent him
   away, and his wife, and all that he had.
   __________________________________________________________________

   Chapter 13

   And Abram went up out of Egypt, he, and his wife, and all that he had,
   and Lot with him, into the south.

   ^2And Abram was very rich in cattle, in silver, and in gold.

   ^3And he went on his journeys from the south even to Bethel, unto the
   place where his tent had been at the beginning, between Bethel and Hai;

   ^4Unto the place of the altar, which he had made there at the first:
   and there Abram called on the name of the Lord.

   ^5And Lot also, which went with Abram, had flocks, and herds, and
   tents.

   ^6And the land was not able to bear them, that they might dwell
   together: for their substance was great, so that they could not dwell
   together.

   ^7And there was a strife between the herdmen of Abram's cattle and the
   herdmen of Lot's cattle: and the Canaanite and the Perizzite dwelled
   then in the land.

   ^8And Abram said unto Lot, Let there be no strife, I pray thee, between
   me and thee, and between my herdmen and thy herdmen; for we be
   brethren.

   ^9Is not the whole land before thee? separate thyself, I pray thee,
   from me: if thou wilt take the left hand, then I will go to the right;
or if thou depart to the right hand, then I will go to the left.

^10And Lot lifted up his eyes, and beheld all the plain of Jordan, that
it was well watered every where, before the Lord destroyed Sodom and
Gomorrah, even as the garden of the Lord, like the land of Egypt, as
thou comest unto Zoar.

^11Then Lot chose him all the plain of Jordan; and Lot journeyed east:
and they separated themselves the one from the other.

^12Abram dwelled in the land of Canaan, and Lot dwelled in the cities
of the plain, and pitched his tent toward Sodom.

^13But the men of Sodom were wicked and sinners before the Lord
exceedingly.

^14And the Lord said unto Abram, after that Lot was separated from him,
	Lift up now thine eyes, and look from the place where thou art
	northward, and southward, and eastward, and westward:

	^15For all the land which thou seest, to thee will I give it, and to
	thy seed for ever.

	^16And I will make thy seed as the dust of the earth: so that if a man
	can number the dust of the earth, then shall thy seed also be numbered.

	^17Arise, walk through the land in the length of it and in the breadth
	of it; for I will give it unto thee.

	^18Then Abram removed his tent, and came and dwelt in the plain of
	Mamre, which is in Hebron, and built there an altar unto the Lord.
	__________________________________________________________________

	Chapter 14

	And it came to pass in the days of Amraphel king of Shinar, Arioch king
	of Ellasar, Chedorlaomer king of Elam, and Tidal king of nations;

	^2That these made war with Bera king of Sodom, and with Birsha king of
	Gomorrah, Shinab king of Admah, and Shemeber king of Zeboiim, and the
	king of Bela, which is Zoar.

	^3All these were joined together in the vale of Siddim, which is the
	salt sea.

	^4Twelve years they served Chedorlaomer, and in the thirteenth year
	they rebelled.

	^5And in the fourteenth year came Chedorlaomer, and the kings that were
	with him, and smote the Rephaims in Ashteroth Karnaim, and the Zuzims
	in Ham, and the Emims in Shaveh Kiriathaim,

	^6And the Horites in their mount Seir, unto Elparan, which is by the
	wilderness.

	^7And they returned, and came to Enmishpat, which is Kadesh, and smote
	all the country of the Amalekites, and also the Amorites, that dwelt in
	Hazezontamar.

	^8And there went out the king of Sodom, and the king of Gomorrah, and
	the king of Admah, and the king of Zeboiim, and the king of Bela (the
			same is Zoar;) and they joined battle with them in the vale of Siddim;

	^9With Chedorlaomer the king of Elam, and with Tidal king of nations,
	and Amraphel king of Shinar, and Arioch king of Ellasar; four kings
	with five.

	^10And the vale of Siddim was full of slimepits; and the kings of Sodom
	and Gomorrah fled, and fell there; and they that remained fled to the
	mountain.

	^11And they took all the goods of Sodom and Gomorrah, and all their
	victuals, and went their way.

	^12And they took Lot, Abram's brother's son, who dwelt in Sodom, and
	his goods, and departed.

	^13And there came one that had escaped, and told Abram the Hebrew; for
	he dwelt in the plain of Mamre the Amorite, brother of Eshcol, and
	brother of Aner: and these were confederate with Abram.

	^14And when Abram heard that his brother was taken captive, he armed
	his trained servants, born in his own house, three hundred and
	eighteen, and pursued them unto Dan.

	^15And he divided himself against them, he and his servants, by night,
	and smote them, and pursued them unto Hobah, which is on the left hand
	of Damascus.

	^16And he brought back all the goods, and also brought again his
	brother Lot, and his goods, and the women also, and the people.

	^17And the king of Sodom went out to meet him after his return from the
	slaughter of Chedorlaomer, and of the kings that were with him, at the
	valley of Shaveh, which is the king's dale.

	^18And Melchizedek king of Salem brought forth bread and wine: and he
	was the priest of the most high God.

	^19And he blessed him, and said, Blessed be Abram of the most high God,
	possessor of heaven and earth:

	^20And blessed be the most high God, which hath delivered thine enemies
	into thy hand. And he gave him tithes of all.

	^21And the king of Sodom said unto Abram, Give me the persons, and take
	the goods to thyself.

	^22And Abram said to the king of Sodom, I have lift up mine hand unto
	the Lord, the most high God, the possessor of heaven and earth,

	^23That I will not take from a thread even to a shoelatchet, and that I
	will not take any thing that is thine, lest thou shouldest say, I have
	made Abram rich:

	^24Save only that which the young men have eaten, and the portion of
	the men which went with me, Aner, Eshcol, and Mamre; let them take
	their portion.
	__________________________________________________________________

	Chapter 15

	After these things the word of the Lord came unto Abram in a vision,
	saying, Fear not, Abram: I am thy shield, and thy exceeding great
	reward.

	^2And Abram said, Lord GOD, what wilt thou give me, seeing I go
	childless, and the steward of my house is this Eliezer of Damascus?

	^3And Abram said, Behold, to me thou hast given no seed: and, lo, one
	born in my house is mine heir.

	^4And, behold, the word of the Lord came unto him, saying, This shall
	not be thine heir; but he that shall come forth out of thine own bowels
	shall be thine heir.

	^5And he brought him forth abroad, and said, Look now toward heaven,
	and tell the stars, if thou be able to number them: and he said unto
	him, So shall thy seed be.

	^6And he believed in the Lord; and he counted it to him for
	righteousness.

	^7And he said unto him, I am the Lord that brought thee out of Ur of
	the Chaldees, to give thee this land to inherit it.

	^8And he said, Lord GOD, whereby shall I know that I shall inherit it?

	^9And he said unto him, Take me an heifer of three years old, and a she
	goat of three years old, and a ram of three years old, and a
	turtledove, and a young pigeon.

	^10And he took unto him all these, and divided them in the midst, and
	laid each piece one against another: but the birds divided he not.

	^11And when the fowls came down upon the carcases, Abram drove them
	away.

	^12And when the sun was going down, a deep sleep fell upon Abram; and,
	lo, an horror of great darkness fell upon him.

	^13And he said unto Abram, Know of a surety that thy seed shall be a
	stranger in a land that is not theirs, and shall serve them; and they
	shall afflict them four hundred years;

	^14And also that nation, whom they shall serve, will I judge: and
	afterward shall they come out with great substance.

	^15And thou shalt go to thy fathers in peace; thou shalt be buried in a
	good old age.

	^16But in the fourth generation they shall come hither again: for the
	iniquity of the Amorites is not yet full.

	^17And it came to pass, that, when the sun went down, and it was dark,
	behold a smoking furnace, and a burning lamp that passed between those
	pieces.

	^18In the same day the Lord made a covenant with Abram, saying, Unto
	thy seed have I given this land, from the river of Egypt unto the great
	river, the river Euphrates:

	^19The Kenites, and the Kenizzites, and the Kadmonites,

	^20And the Hittites, and the Perizzites, and the Rephaims,

	^21And the Amorites, and the Canaanites, and the Girgashites, and the
	Jebusites.
	__________________________________________________________________

	Chapter 16

	Now Sarai Abram's wife bare him no children: and she had an handmaid,
	an Egyptian, whose name was Hagar.

	^2And Sarai said unto Abram, Behold now, the Lord hath restrained me
	from bearing: I pray thee, go in unto my maid; it may be that I may
	obtain children by her. And Abram hearkened to the voice of Sarai.

	^3And Sarai Abram's wife took Hagar her maid the Egyptian, after Abram
	had dwelt ten years in the land of Canaan, and gave her to her husband
	Abram to be his wife.

	^4And he went in unto Hagar, and she conceived: and when she saw that
	she had conceived, her mistress was despised in her eyes.

	^5And Sarai said unto Abram, My wrong be upon thee: I have given my
	maid into thy bosom; and when she saw that she had conceived, I was
	despised in her eyes: the Lord judge between me and thee.

	^6But Abram said unto Sarai, Behold, thy maid is in thy hand; do to her
	as it pleaseth thee. And when Sarai dealt hardly with her, she fled
	from her face.

	^7And the angel of the Lord found her by a fountain of water in the
	wilderness, by the fountain in the way to Shur.

	^8And he said, Hagar, Sarai's maid, whence camest thou? and whither
	wilt thou go? And she said, I flee from the face of my mistress Sarai.

	^9And the angel of the Lord said unto her, Return to thy mistress, and
	submit thyself under her hands.

	^10And the angel of the Lord said unto her, I will multiply thy seed
	exceedingly, that it shall not be numbered for multitude.

	^11And the angel of the Lord said unto her, Behold, thou art with
	child, and shalt bear a son, and shalt call his name Ishmael; because
	the Lord hath heard thy affliction.

	^12And he will be a wild man; his hand will be against every man, and
	every man's hand against him; and he shall dwell in the presence of all
	his brethren.

	^13And she called the name of the Lord that spake unto her, Thou God
	seest me: for she said, Have I also here looked after him that seeth
	me?

	^14Wherefore the well was called Beerlahairoi; behold, it is between
	Kadesh and Bered.

	^15And Hagar bare Abram a son: and Abram called his son's name, which
	Hagar bare, Ishmael.

	^16And Abram was fourscore and six years old, when Hagar bare Ishmael
	to Abram.
	__________________________________________________________________

	Chapter 17

	And when Abram was ninety years old and nine, the Lord appeared to
	Abram, and said unto him, I am the Almighty God; walk before me, and be
	thou perfect.

	^2And I will make my covenant between me and thee, and will multiply
	thee exceedingly.

	^3And Abram fell on his face: and God talked with him, saying,

	^4As for me, behold, my covenant is with thee, and thou shalt be a
	father of many nations.

	^5Neither shall thy name any more be called Abram, but thy name shall
	be Abraham; for a father of many nations have I made thee.

	^6And I will make thee exceeding fruitful, and I will make nations of
	thee, and kings shall come out of thee.

	^7And I will establish my covenant between me and thee and thy seed
	after thee in their generations for an everlasting covenant, to be a
	God unto thee, and to thy seed after thee.

	^8And I will give unto thee, and to thy seed after thee, the land
	wherein thou art a stranger, all the land of Canaan, for an everlasting
	possession; and I will be their God.

	^9And God said unto Abraham, Thou shalt keep my covenant therefore,
	thou, and thy seed after thee in their generations.

	^10This is my covenant, which ye shall keep, between me and you and thy
	seed after thee; Every man child among you shall be circumcised.

	^11And ye shall circumcise the flesh of your foreskin; and it shall be
	a token of the covenant betwixt me and you.

	^12And he that is eight days old shall be circumcised among you, every
	man child in your generations, he that is born in the house, or bought
	with money of any stranger, which is not of thy seed.

	^13He that is born in thy house, and he that is bought with thy money,
	must needs be circumcised: and my covenant shall be in your flesh for
	an everlasting covenant.

	^14And the uncircumcised man child whose flesh of his foreskin is not
	circumcised, that soul shall be cut off from his people; he hath broken
	my covenant.

	^15And God said unto Abraham, As for Sarai thy wife, thou shalt not
	call her name Sarai, but Sarah shall her name be.

	^16And I will bless her, and give thee a son also of her: yea, I will
	bless her, and she shall be a mother of nations; kings of people shall
	be of her.

	^17Then Abraham fell upon his face, and laughed, and said in his heart,
	Shall a child be born unto him that is an hundred years old? and shall
	Sarah, that is ninety years old, bear?

	^18And Abraham said unto God, O that Ishmael might live before thee!

	^19And God said, Sarah thy wife shall bear thee a son indeed; and thou
	shalt call his name Isaac: and I will establish my covenant with him
	for an everlasting covenant, and with his seed after him.

	^20And as for Ishmael, I have heard thee: Behold, I have blessed him,
	and will make him fruitful, and will multiply him exceedingly; twelve
	princes shall he beget, and I will make him a great nation.

	^21But my covenant will I establish with Isaac, which Sarah shall bear
	unto thee at this set time in the next year.

	^22And he left off talking with him, and God went up from Abraham.

	^23And Abraham took Ishmael his son, and all that were born in his
	house, and all that were bought with his money, every male among the
	men of Abraham's house; and circumcised the flesh of their foreskin in
	the selfsame day, as God had said unto him.

	^24And Abraham was ninety years old and nine, when he was circumcised
	in the flesh of his foreskin.

	^25And Ishmael his son was thirteen years old, when he was circumcised
	in the flesh of his foreskin.

	^26In the selfsame day was Abraham circumcised, and Ishmael his son.

	^27And all the men of his house, born in the house, and bought with
	money of the stranger, were circumcised with him.
	__________________________________________________________________

	Chapter 18

	And the Lord appeared unto him in the plains of Mamre: and he sat in
	the tent door in the heat of the day;

	^2And he lift up his eyes and looked, and, lo, three men stood by him:
	and when he saw them, he ran to meet them from the tent door, and bowed
	himself toward the ground,

	^3And said, My Lord, if now I have found favour in thy sight, pass not
	away, I pray thee, from thy servant:

	^4Let a little water, I pray you, be fetched, and wash your feet, and
	rest yourselves under the tree:

	^5And I will fetch a morsel of bread, and comfort ye your hearts; after
	that ye shall pass on: for therefore are ye come to your servant. And
	they said, So do, as thou hast said.

	^6And Abraham hastened into the tent unto Sarah, and said, Make ready
	quickly three measures of fine meal, knead it, and make cakes upon the
	hearth.

	^7And Abraham ran unto the herd, and fetcht a calf tender and good, and
	gave it unto a young man; and he hasted to dress it.

	^8And he took butter, and milk, and the calf which he had dressed, and
	set it before them; and he stood by them under the tree, and they did
	eat.

	^9And they said unto him, Where is Sarah thy wife? And he said, Behold,
	in the tent.

	^10And he said, I will certainly return unto thee according to the time
	of life; and, lo, Sarah thy wife shall have a son. And Sarah heard it
	in the tent door, which was behind him.

	^11Now Abraham and Sarah were old and well stricken in age; and it
	ceased to be with Sarah after the manner of women.

	^12Therefore Sarah laughed within herself, saying, After I am waxed old
	shall I have pleasure, my lord being old also?

	^13And the Lord said unto Abraham, Wherefore did Sarah laugh, saying,
	Shall I of a surety bear a child, which am old?

	^14Is any thing too hard for the Lord? At the time appointed I will
	return unto thee, according to the time of life, and Sarah shall have a
	son.

	^15Then Sarah denied, saying, I laughed not; for she was afraid. And he
	said, Nay; but thou didst laugh.

	^16And the men rose up from thence, and looked toward Sodom: and
	Abraham went with them to bring them on the way.

	^17And the Lord said, Shall I hide from Abraham that thing which I do;

	^18Seeing that Abraham shall surely become a great and mighty nation,
	and all the nations of the earth shall be blessed in him?

	^19For I know him, that he will command his children and his household
	after him, and they shall keep the way of the Lord, to do justice and
	judgment; that the Lord may bring upon Abraham that which he hath
	spoken of him.

	^20And the Lord said, Because the cry of Sodom and Gomorrah is great,
	and because their sin is very grievous;

^21I will go down now, and see whether they have done altogether
according to the cry of it, which is come unto me; and if not, I will
know.

^22And the men turned their faces from thence, and went toward Sodom:
but Abraham stood yet before the Lord.

^23And Abraham drew near, and said, Wilt thou also destroy the
righteous with the wicked?

^24Peradventure there be fifty righteous within the city: wilt thou
also destroy and not spare the place for the fifty righteous that are
therein?

^25That be far from thee to do after this manner, to slay the righteous
with the wicked: and that the righteous should be as the wicked, that
be far from thee: Shall not the Judge of all the earth do right?

^26And the Lord said, If I find in Sodom fifty righteous within the
city, then I will spare all the place for their sakes.

^27And Abraham answered and said, Behold now, I have taken upon me to
speak unto the Lord, which am but dust and ashes:

^28Peradventure there shall lack five of the fifty righteous: wilt thou
destroy all the city for lack of five? And he said, If I find there
forty and five, I will not destroy it.

^29And he spake unto him yet again, and said, Peradventure there shall
be forty found there. And he said, I will not do it for forty's sake.

^30And he said unto him, Oh let not the Lord be angry, and I will
speak: Peradventure there shall thirty be found there. And he said, I
will not do it, if I find thirty there.

^31And he said, Behold now, I have taken upon me to speak unto the
Lord: Peradventure there shall be twenty found there. And he said, I
will not destroy it for twenty's sake.

^32And he said, Oh let not the Lord be angry, and I will speak yet but
this once: Peradventure ten shall be found there. And he said, I will
not destroy it for ten's sake.

^33And the Lord went his way, as soon as he had left communing with
Abraham: and Abraham returned unto his place.
__________________________________________________________________

Chapter 19

And there came two angels to Sodom at even; and Lot sat in the gate of
Sodom: and Lot seeing them rose up to meet them; and he bowed himself
with his face toward the ground;

^2And he said, Behold now, my lords, turn in, I pray you, into your
servant's house, and tarry all night, and wash your feet, and ye shall
rise up early, and go on your ways. And they said, Nay; but we will
abide in the street all night.

^3And he pressed upon them greatly; and they turned in unto him, and
entered into his house; and he made them a feast, and did bake
unleavened bread, and they did eat.

^4But before they lay down, the men of the city, even the men of Sodom,
	compassed the house round, both old and young, all the people from
	every quarter:

	^5And they called unto Lot, and said unto him, Where are the men which
	came in to thee this night? bring them out unto us, that we may know
	them.

	^6And Lot went out at the door unto them, and shut the door after him,

	^7And said, I pray you, brethren, do not so wickedly.

	^8Behold now, I have two daughters which have not known man; let me, I
	pray you, bring them out unto you, and do ye to them as is good in your
	eyes: only unto these men do nothing; for therefore came they under the
	shadow of my roof.

	^9And they said, Stand back. And they said again, This one fellow came
	in to sojourn, and he will needs be a judge: now will we deal worse
	with thee, than with them. And they pressed sore upon the man, even
	Lot, and came near to break the door.

	^10But the men put forth their hand, and pulled Lot into the house to
	them, and shut to the door.

	^11And they smote the men that were at the door of the house with
	blindness, both small and great: so that they wearied themselves to
	find the door.

	^12And the men said unto Lot, Hast thou here any besides? son in law,
	and thy sons, and thy daughters, and whatsoever thou hast in the city,
	bring them out of this place:

	^13For we will destroy this place, because the cry of them is waxen
	great before the face of the Lord; and the Lord hath sent us to destroy
	it.

	^14And Lot went out, and spake unto his sons in law, which married his
	daughters, and said, Up, get you out of this place; for the Lord will
	destroy this city. But he seemed as one that mocked unto his sons in
	law.

	^15And when the morning arose, then the angels hastened Lot, saying,
	Arise, take thy wife, and thy two daughters, which are here; lest thou
	be consumed in the iniquity of the city.

	^16And while he lingered, the men laid hold upon his hand, and upon the
	hand of his wife, and upon the hand of his two daughters; the Lord
	being merciful unto him: and they brought him forth, and set him
	without the city.

	^17And it came to pass, when they had brought them forth abroad, that
	he said, Escape for thy life; look not behind thee, neither stay thou
	in all the plain; escape to the mountain, lest thou be consumed.

	^18And Lot said unto them, Oh, not so, my Lord:

	^19Behold now, thy servant hath found grace in thy sight, and thou hast
	magnified thy mercy, which thou hast shewed unto me in saving my life;
	and I cannot escape to the mountain, lest some evil take me, and I die:

	^20Behold now, this city is near to flee unto, and it is a little one:
	Oh, let me escape thither, (is it not a little one?) and my soul shall
	live.

	^21And he said unto him, See, I have accepted thee concerning this
	thing also, that I will not overthrow this city, for the which thou
	hast spoken.

	^22Haste thee, escape thither; for I cannot do any thing till thou be
	come thither. Therefore the name of the city was called Zoar.

	^23The sun was risen upon the earth when Lot entered into Zoar.

	^24Then the Lord rained upon Sodom and upon Gomorrah brimstone and fire
	from the Lord out of heaven;

	^25And he overthrew those cities, and all the plain, and all the
	inhabitants of the cities, and that which grew upon the ground.

	^26But his wife looked back from behind him, and she became a pillar of
	salt.

	^27And Abraham gat up early in the morning to the place where he stood
	before the Lord:

	^28And he looked toward Sodom and Gomorrah, and toward all the land of
	the plain, and beheld, and, lo, the smoke of the country went up as the
	smoke of a furnace.

	^29And it came to pass, when God destroyed the cities of the plain,
	that God remembered Abraham, and sent Lot out of the midst of the
	overthrow, when he overthrew the cities in the which Lot dwelt.

	^30And Lot went up out of Zoar, and dwelt in the mountain, and his two
	daughters with him; for he feared to dwell in Zoar: and he dwelt in a
	cave, he and his two daughters.

	^31And the firstborn said unto the younger, Our father is old, and
	there is not a man in the earth to come in unto us after the manner of
	all the earth:

	^32Come, let us make our father drink wine, and we will lie with him,
	that we may preserve seed of our father.

	^33And they made their father drink wine that night: and the firstborn
	went in, and lay with her father; and he perceived not when she lay
	down, nor when she arose.

	^34And it came to pass on the morrow, that the firstborn said unto the
	younger, Behold, I lay yesternight with my father: let us make him
	drink wine this night also; and go thou in, and lie with him, that we
	may preserve seed of our father.

	^35And they made their father drink wine that night also: and the
	younger arose, and lay with him; and he perceived not when she lay
	down, nor when she arose.

	^36Thus were both the daughters of Lot with child by their father.

	^37And the firstborn bare a son, and called his name Moab: the same is
	the father of the Moabites unto this day.

	^38And the younger, she also bare a son, and called his name Benammi:
	the same is the father of the children of Ammon unto this day.
	__________________________________________________________________

	Chapter 20

	And Abraham journeyed from thence toward the south country, and dwelled
	between Kadesh and Shur, and sojourned in Gerar.

	^2And Abraham said of Sarah his wife, She is my sister: and Abimelech
	king of Gerar sent, and took Sarah.

	^3But God came to Abimelech in a dream by night, and said to him,
	Behold, thou art but a dead man, for the woman which thou hast taken;
for she is a man's wife.

^4But Abimelech had not come near her: and he said, Lord, wilt thou
slay also a righteous nation?

^5Said he not unto me, She is my sister? and she, even she herself
said, He is my brother: in the integrity of my heart and innocency of
my hands have I done this.

^6And God said unto him in a dream, Yea, I know that thou didst this in
the integrity of thy heart; for I also withheld thee from sinning
against me: therefore suffered I thee not to touch her.

^7Now therefore restore the man his wife; for he is a prophet, and he
shall pray for thee, and thou shalt live: and if thou restore her not,
	  know thou that thou shalt surely die, thou, and all that are thine.

	  ^8Therefore Abimelech rose early in the morning, and called all his
	  servants, and told all these things in their ears: and the men were
	  sore afraid.

	  ^9Then Abimelech called Abraham, and said unto him, What hast thou done
	  unto us? and what have I offended thee, that thou hast brought on me
	  and on my kingdom a great sin? thou hast done deeds unto me that ought
	  not to be done.

	  ^10And Abimelech said unto Abraham, What sawest thou, that thou hast
	  done this thing?

	  ^11And Abraham said, Because I thought, Surely the fear of God is not
	  in this place; and they will slay me for my wife's sake.

	  ^12And yet indeed she is my sister; she is the daughter of my father,
	  but not the daughter of my mother; and she became my wife.

	  ^13And it came to pass, when God caused me to wander from my father's
	  house, that I said unto her, This is thy kindness which thou shalt shew
	  unto me; at every place whither we shall come, say of me, He is my
	  brother.

	  ^14And Abimelech took sheep, and oxen, and menservants, and
	  womenservants, and gave them unto Abraham, and restored him Sarah his
	  wife.

	  ^15And Abimelech said, Behold, my land is before thee: dwell where it
	  pleaseth thee.

	  ^16And unto Sarah he said, Behold, I have given thy brother a thousand
	  pieces of silver: behold, he is to thee a covering of the eyes, unto
	  all that are with thee, and with all other: thus she was reproved.

	  ^17So Abraham prayed unto God: and God healed Abimelech, and his wife,
	  and his maidservants; and they bare children.

	  ^18For the Lord had fast closed up all the wombs of the house of
	  Abimelech, because of Sarah Abraham's wife.
	  __________________________________________________________________

	  Chapter 21

	  And the Lord visited Sarah as he had said, and the Lord did unto Sarah
	  as he had spoken.

	  ^2For Sarah conceived, and bare Abraham a son in his old age, at the
	  set time of which God had spoken to him.

	  ^3And Abraham called the name of his son that was born unto him, whom
	  Sarah bare to him, Isaac.

	  ^4And Abraham circumcised his son Isaac being eight days old, as God
	  had commanded him.

	  ^5And Abraham was an hundred years old, when his son Isaac was born
	  unto him.

	  ^6And Sarah said, God hath made me to laugh, so that all that hear will
	  laugh with me.

	  ^7And she said, Who would have said unto Abraham, that Sarah should
	  have given children suck? for I have born him a son in his old age.

	  ^8And the child grew, and was weaned: and Abraham made a great feast
	  the same day that Isaac was weaned.

	  ^9And Sarah saw the son of Hagar the Egyptian, which she had born unto
	  Abraham, mocking.

	  ^10Wherefore she said unto Abraham, Cast out this bondwoman and her
	  son: for the son of this bondwoman shall not be heir with my son, even
	  with Isaac.

	  ^11And the thing was very grievous in Abraham's sight because of his
	  son.

	  ^12And God said unto Abraham, Let it not be grievous in thy sight
	  because of the lad, and because of thy bondwoman; in all that Sarah
	  hath said unto thee, hearken unto her voice; for in Isaac shall thy
	  seed be called.

	  ^13And also of the son of the bondwoman will I make a nation, because
	  he is thy seed.

	  ^14And Abraham rose up early in the morning, and took bread, and a
	  bottle of water, and gave it unto Hagar, putting it on her shoulder,
	  and the child, and sent her away: and she departed, and wandered in the
	  wilderness of Beersheba.

	  ^15And the water was spent in the bottle, and she cast the child under
	  one of the shrubs.

	  ^16And she went, and sat her down over against him a good way off, as
	  it were a bowshot: for she said, Let me not see the death of the child.
	  And she sat over against him, and lift up her voice, and wept.

	  ^17And God heard the voice of the lad; and the angel of God called to
	  Hagar out of heaven, and said unto her, What aileth thee, Hagar? fear
	  not; for God hath heard the voice of the lad where he is.

	  ^18Arise, lift up the lad, and hold him in thine hand; for I will make
	  him a great nation.

	  ^19And God opened her eyes, and she saw a well of water; and she went,
	  and filled the bottle with water, and gave the lad drink.

	  ^20And God was with the lad; and he grew, and dwelt in the wilderness,
	  and became an archer.

	  ^21And he dwelt in the wilderness of Paran: and his mother took him a
	  wife out of the land of Egypt.

	  ^22And it came to pass at that time, that Abimelech and Phichol the
	  chief captain of his host spake unto Abraham, saying, God is with thee
	  in all that thou doest:

	  ^23Now therefore swear unto me here by God that thou wilt not deal
	  falsely with me, nor with my son, nor with my son's son: but according
	  to the kindness that I have done unto thee, thou shalt do unto me, and
	  to the land wherein thou hast sojourned.

	  ^24And Abraham said, I will swear.

	  ^25And Abraham reproved Abimelech because of a well of water, which
	  Abimelech's servants had violently taken away.

	  ^26And Abimelech said, I wot not who hath done this thing: neither
	  didst thou tell me, neither yet heard I of it, but to day.

	  ^27And Abraham took sheep and oxen, and gave them unto Abimelech; and
	  both of them made a covenant.

	  ^28And Abraham set seven ewe lambs of the flock by themselves.

	  ^29And Abimelech said unto Abraham, What mean these seven ewe lambs
	  which thou hast set by themselves?

	  ^30And he said, For these seven ewe lambs shalt thou take of my hand,
	  that they may be a witness unto me, that I have digged this well.

	  ^31Wherefore he called that place Beersheba; because there they sware
	  both of them.

	  ^32Thus they made a covenant at Beersheba: then Abimelech rose up, and
	  Phichol the chief captain of his host, and they returned into the land
	  of the Philistines.

	  ^33And Abraham planted a grove in Beersheba, and called there on the
	  name of the Lord, the everlasting God.

	  ^34And Abraham sojourned in the Philistines' land many days.
	  __________________________________________________________________

	  Chapter 22

	  And it came to pass after these things, that God did tempt Abraham, and
	  said unto him, Abraham: and he said, Behold, here I am.

	  ^2And he said, Take now thy son, thine only son Isaac, whom thou
	  lovest, and get thee into the land of Moriah; and offer him there for a
	  burnt offering upon one of the mountains which I will tell thee of.

	  ^3And Abraham rose up early in the morning, and saddled his ass, and
	  took two of his young men with him, and Isaac his son, and clave the
	  wood for the burnt offering, and rose up, and went unto the place of
	  which God had told him.

	  ^4Then on the third day Abraham lifted up his eyes, and saw the place
	  afar off.

	  ^5And Abraham said unto his young men, Abide ye here with the ass; and
	  I and the lad will go yonder and worship, and come again to you.

	  ^6And Abraham took the wood of the burnt offering, and laid it upon
	  Isaac his son; and he took the fire in his hand, and a knife; and they
	  went both of them together.

	  ^7And Isaac spake unto Abraham his father, and said, My father: and he
	  said, Here am I, my son. And he said, Behold the fire and the wood: but
	  where is the lamb for a burnt offering?

	  ^8And Abraham said, My son, God will provide himself a lamb for a burnt
	  offering: so they went both of them together.

	  ^9And they came to the place which God had told him of; and Abraham
	  built an altar there, and laid the wood in order, and bound Isaac his
	  son, and laid him on the altar upon the wood.

	  ^10And Abraham stretched forth his hand, and took the knife to slay his
	  son.

	  ^11And the angel of the Lord called unto him out of heaven, and said,
	  Abraham, Abraham: and he said, Here am I.

	  ^12And he said, Lay not thine hand upon the lad, neither do thou any
	  thing unto him: for now I know that thou fearest God, seeing thou hast
	  not withheld thy son, thine only son from me.

	  ^13And Abraham lifted up his eyes, and looked, and behold behind him a
	  ram caught in a thicket by his horns: and Abraham went and took the
	  ram, and offered him up for a burnt offering in the stead of his son.

	  ^14And Abraham called the name of that place Jehovahjireh: as it is
	  said to this day, In the mount of the Lord it shall be seen.

	  ^15And the angel of the Lord called unto Abraham out of heaven the
	  second time,

	  ^16And said, By myself have I sworn, saith the Lord, for because thou
	  hast done this thing, and hast not withheld thy son, thine only son:

	  ^17That in blessing I will bless thee, and in multiplying I will
	  multiply thy seed as the stars of the heaven, and as the sand which is
	  upon the sea shore; and thy seed shall possess the gate of his enemies;

	  ^18And in thy seed shall all the nations of the earth be blessed;
	  because thou hast obeyed my voice.

	  ^19So Abraham returned unto his young men, and they rose up and went
	  together to Beersheba; and Abraham dwelt at Beersheba.

	  ^20And it came to pass after these things, that it was told Abraham,
	  saying, Behold, Milcah, she hath also born children unto thy brother
	  Nahor;

	  ^21Huz his firstborn, and Buz his brother, and Kemuel the father of
	  Aram,

	  ^22And Chesed, and Hazo, and Pildash, and Jidlaph, and Bethuel.

	  ^23And Bethuel begat Rebekah: these eight Milcah did bear to Nahor,
	  Abraham's brother.

	  ^24And his concubine, whose name was Reumah, she bare also Tebah, and
	  Gaham, and Thahash, and Maachah.
	  __________________________________________________________________

	  Chapter 23

	  And Sarah was an hundred and seven and twenty years old: these were the
	  years of the life of Sarah.

	  ^2And Sarah died in Kirjatharba; the same is Hebron in the land of
	  Canaan: and Abraham came to mourn for Sarah, and to weep for her.

	  ^3And Abraham stood up from before his dead, and spake unto the sons of
	  Heth, saying,

	  ^4I am a stranger and a sojourner with you: give me a possession of a
	  buryingplace with you, that I may bury my dead out of my sight.

	  ^5And the children of Heth answered Abraham, saying unto him,

	  ^6Hear us, my lord: thou art a mighty prince among us: in the choice of
	  our sepulchres bury thy dead; none of us shall withhold from thee his
	  sepulchre, but that thou mayest bury thy dead.

	  ^7And Abraham stood up, and bowed himself to the people of the land,
	  even to the children of Heth.

	  ^8And he communed with them, saying, If it be your mind that I should
	  bury my dead out of my sight; hear me, and intreat for me to Ephron the
	  son of Zohar,

	  ^9That he may give me the cave of Machpelah, which he hath, which is in
	  the end of his field; for as much money as it is worth he shall give it
	  me for a possession of a buryingplace amongst you.

	  ^10And Ephron dwelt among the children of Heth: and Ephron the Hittite
	  answered Abraham in the audience of the children of Heth, even of all
	  that went in at the gate of his city, saying,

	  ^11Nay, my lord, hear me: the field give I thee, and the cave that is
	  therein, I give it thee; in the presence of the sons of my people give
	  I it thee: bury thy dead.

	  ^12And Abraham bowed down himself before the people of the land.

	  ^13And he spake unto Ephron in the audience of the people of the land,
	  saying, But if thou wilt give it, I pray thee, hear me: I will give
	  thee money for the field; take it of me, and I will bury my dead there.

	  ^14And Ephron answered Abraham, saying unto him,

	  ^15My lord, hearken unto me: the land is worth four hundred shekels of
	  silver; what is that betwixt me and thee? bury therefore thy dead.

	  ^16And Abraham hearkened unto Ephron; and Abraham weighed to Ephron the
	  silver, which he had named in the audience of the sons of Heth, four
	  hundred shekels of silver, current money with the merchant.

	  ^17And the field of Ephron, which was in Machpelah, which was before
	  Mamre, the field, and the cave which was therein, and all the trees
	  that were in the field, that were in all the borders round about, were
	  made sure

	  ^18Unto Abraham for a possession in the presence of the children of
	  Heth, before all that went in at the gate of his city.

	  ^19And after this, Abraham buried Sarah his wife in the cave of the
	  field of Machpelah before Mamre: the same is Hebron in the land of
	  Canaan.

	  ^20And the field, and the cave that is therein, were made sure unto
	  Abraham for a possession of a buryingplace by the sons of Heth.
	  __________________________________________________________________

	  Chapter 24

	  And Abraham was old, and well stricken in age: and the Lord had blessed
	  Abraham in all things.

	  ^2And Abraham said unto his eldest servant of his house, that ruled
	  over all that he had, Put, I pray thee, thy hand under my thigh:

	  ^3And I will make thee swear by the Lord, the God of heaven, and the
	  God of the earth, that thou shalt not take a wife unto my son of the
	  daughters of the Canaanites, among whom I dwell:

	  ^4But thou shalt go unto my country, and to my kindred, and take a wife
	  unto my son Isaac.

	  ^5And the servant said unto him, Peradventure the woman will not be
	  willing to follow me unto this land: must I needs bring thy son again
	  unto the land from whence thou camest?

	  ^6And Abraham said unto him, Beware thou that thou bring not my son
	  thither again.

	  ^7The Lord God of heaven, which took me from my father's house, and
	  from the land of my kindred, and which spake unto me, and that sware
	  unto me, saying, Unto thy seed will I give this land; he shall send his
	  angel before thee, and thou shalt take a wife unto my son from thence.

	  ^8And if the woman will not be willing to follow thee, then thou shalt
	  be clear from this my oath: only bring not my son thither again.

	  ^9And the servant put his hand under the thigh of Abraham his master,
	  and sware to him concerning that matter.

	  ^10And the servant took ten camels of the camels of his master, and
	  departed; for all the goods of his master were in his hand: and he
	  arose, and went to Mesopotamia, unto the city of Nahor.

	  ^11And he made his camels to kneel down without the city by a well of
	  water at the time of the evening, even the time that women go out to
	  draw water.

	  ^12And he said, O Lord God of my master Abraham, I pray thee, send me
	  good speed this day, and shew kindness unto my master Abraham.

	  ^13Behold, I stand here by the well of water; and the daughters of the
	  men of the city come out to draw water:

	  ^14And let it come to pass, that the damsel to whom I shall say, Let
	  down thy pitcher, I pray thee, that I may drink; and she shall say,
	  Drink, and I will give thy camels drink also: let the same be she that
	  thou hast appointed for thy servant Isaac; and thereby shall I know
	  that thou hast shewed kindness unto my master.

	  ^15And it came to pass, before he had done speaking, that, behold,
	  Rebekah came out, who was born to Bethuel, son of Milcah, the wife of
	  Nahor, Abraham's brother, with her pitcher upon her shoulder.

	  ^16And the damsel was very fair to look upon, a virgin, neither had any
	  man known her: and she went down to the well, and filled her pitcher,
	  and came up.

	  ^17And the servant ran to meet her, and said, Let me, I pray thee,
	  drink a little water of thy pitcher.

	  ^18And she said, Drink, my lord: and she hasted, and let down her
	  pitcher upon her hand, and gave him drink.

	  ^19And when she had done giving him drink, she said, I will draw water
	  for thy camels also, until they have done drinking.

	  ^20And she hasted, and emptied her pitcher into the trough, and ran
	  again unto the well to draw water, and drew for all his camels.

	  ^21And the man wondering at her held his peace, to wit whether the Lord
	  had made his journey prosperous or not.

	  ^22And it came to pass, as the camels had done drinking, that the man
	  took a golden earring of half a shekel weight, and two bracelets for
	  her hands of ten shekels weight of gold;

	  ^23And said, Whose daughter art thou? tell me, I pray thee: is there
	  room in thy father's house for us to lodge in?

	  ^24And she said unto him, I am the daughter of Bethuel the son of
	  Milcah, which she bare unto Nahor.

	  ^25She said moreover unto him, We have both straw and provender enough,
	  and room to lodge in.

	  ^26And the man bowed down his head, and worshipped the Lord.

	  ^27And he said, Blessed be the Lord God of my master Abraham, who hath
	  not left destitute my master of his mercy and his truth: I being in the
	  way, the Lord led me to the house of my master's brethren.

	  ^28And the damsel ran, and told them of her mother's house these
	  things.

	  ^29And Rebekah had a brother, and his name was Laban: and Laban ran out
	  unto the man, unto the well.

	  ^30And it came to pass, when he saw the earring and bracelets upon his
	  sister's hands, and when he heard the words of Rebekah his sister,
	  saying, Thus spake the man unto me; that he came unto the man; and,
	  behold, he stood by the camels at the well.

	  ^31And he said, Come in, thou blessed of the Lord; wherefore standest
	  thou without? for I have prepared the house, and room for the camels.

	  ^32And the man came into the house: and he ungirded his camels, and
	  gave straw and provender for the camels, and water to wash his feet,
	  and the men's feet that were with him.

	  ^33And there was set meat before him to eat: but he said, I will not
	  eat, until I have told mine errand. And he said, Speak on.

	  ^34And he said, I am Abraham's servant.

	  ^35And the Lord hath blessed my master greatly; and he is become great:
	  and he hath given him flocks, and herds, and silver, and gold, and
	  menservants, and maidservants, and camels, and asses.

	  ^36And Sarah my master's wife bare a son to my master when she was old:
	  and unto him hath he given all that he hath.

	  ^37And my master made me swear, saying, Thou shalt not take a wife to
	  my son of the daughters of the Canaanites, in whose land I dwell:

	  ^38But thou shalt go unto my father's house, and to my kindred, and
	  take a wife unto my son.

	  ^39And I said unto my master, Peradventure the woman will not follow
	  me.

	  ^40And he said unto me, The Lord, before whom I walk, will send his
	  angel with thee, and prosper thy way; and thou shalt take a wife for my
	  son of my kindred, and of my father's house:

	  ^41Then shalt thou be clear from this my oath, when thou comest to my
	  kindred; and if they give not thee one, thou shalt be clear from my
	  oath.

	  ^42And I came this day unto the well, and said, O Lord God of my master
	  Abraham, if now thou do prosper my way which I go:

	  ^43Behold, I stand by the well of water; and it shall come to pass,
	  that when the virgin cometh forth to draw water, and I say to her, Give
	  me, I pray thee, a little water of thy pitcher to drink;

	  ^44And she say to me, Both drink thou, and I will also draw for thy
	  camels: let the same be the woman whom the Lord hath appointed out for
	  my master's son.

	  ^45And before I had done speaking in mine heart, behold, Rebekah came
	  forth with her pitcher on her shoulder; and she went down unto the
	  well, and drew water: and I said unto her, Let me drink, I pray thee.

	  ^46And she made haste, and let down her pitcher from her shoulder, and
	  said, Drink, and I will give thy camels drink also: so I drank, and she
	  made the camels drink also.

	  ^47And I asked her, and said, Whose daughter art thou? And she said,
	  The daughter of Bethuel, Nahor's son, whom Milcah bare unto him: and I
	  put the earring upon her face, and the bracelets upon her hands.

	  ^48And I bowed down my head, and worshipped the Lord, and blessed the
	  Lord God of my master Abraham, which had led me in the right way to
	  take my master's brother's daughter unto his son.

	  ^49And now if ye will deal kindly and truly with my master, tell me:
	  and if not, tell me; that I may turn to the right hand, or to the left.

	  ^50Then Laban and Bethuel answered and said, The thing proceedeth from
	  the Lord: we cannot speak unto thee bad or good.

	  ^51Behold, Rebekah is before thee, take her, and go, and let her be thy
	  master's son's wife, as the Lord hath spoken.

	  ^52And it came to pass, that, when Abraham's servant heard their words,
	  he worshipped the Lord, bowing himself to the earth.

	  ^53And the servant brought forth jewels of silver, and jewels of gold,
	  and raiment, and gave them to Rebekah: he gave also to her brother and
	  to her mother precious things.

	  ^54And they did eat and drink, he and the men that were with him, and
	  tarried all night; and they rose up in the morning, and he said, Send
	  me away unto my master.

	  ^55And her brother and her mother said, Let the damsel abide with us a
	  few days, at the least ten; after that she shall go.

	  ^56And he said unto them, Hinder me not, seeing the Lord hath prospered
	  my way; send me away that I may go to my master.

	  ^57And they said, We will call the damsel, and enquire at her mouth.

	  ^58And they called Rebekah, and said unto her, Wilt thou go with this
	  man? And she said, I will go.

	  ^59And they sent away Rebekah their sister, and her nurse, and
	  Abraham's servant, and his men.

	  ^60And they blessed Rebekah, and said unto her, Thou art our sister, be
	  thou the mother of thousands of millions, and let thy seed possess the
	  gate of those which hate them.

	  ^61And Rebekah arose, and her damsels, and they rode upon the camels,
	  and followed the man: and the servant took Rebekah, and went his way.

	  ^62And Isaac came from the way of the well Lahairoi; for he dwelt in
	  the south country.

	  ^63And Isaac went out to meditate in the field at the eventide: and he
	  lifted up his eyes, and saw, and, behold, the camels were coming.

	  ^64And Rebekah lifted up her eyes, and when she saw Isaac, she lighted
	  off the camel.

	  ^65For she had said unto the servant, What man is this that walketh in
	  the field to meet us? And the servant had said, It is my master:
	  therefore she took a vail, and covered herself.

	  ^66And the servant told Isaac all things that he had done.

	  ^67And Isaac brought her into his mother Sarah's tent, and took
	  Rebekah, and she became his wife; and he loved her: and Isaac was
	  comforted after his mother's death.
	  __________________________________________________________________

	  Chapter 25

	  Then again Abraham took a wife, and her name was Keturah.

	  ^2And she bare him Zimran, and Jokshan, and Medan, and Midian, and
	  Ishbak, and Shuah.

	  ^3And Jokshan begat Sheba, and Dedan. And the sons of Dedan were
	  Asshurim, and Letushim, and Leummim.

	  ^4And the sons of Midian; Ephah, and Epher, and Hanoch, and Abida, and
	  Eldaah. All these were the children of Keturah.

	  ^5And Abraham gave all that he had unto Isaac.

	  ^6But unto the sons of the concubines, which Abraham had, Abraham gave
	  gifts, and sent them away from Isaac his son, while he yet lived,
	  eastward, unto the east country.

	  ^7And these are the days of the years of Abraham's life which he lived,
	  an hundred threescore and fifteen years.

	  ^8Then Abraham gave up the ghost, and died in a good old age, an old
	  man, and full of years; and was gathered to his people.

	  ^9And his sons Isaac and Ishmael buried him in the cave of Machpelah,
	  in the field of Ephron the son of Zohar the Hittite, which is before
	  Mamre;

	  ^10The field which Abraham purchased of the sons of Heth: there was
	  Abraham buried, and Sarah his wife.

	  ^11And it came to pass after the death of Abraham, that God blessed his
	  son Isaac; and Isaac dwelt by the well Lahairoi.

	  ^12Now these are the generations of Ishmael, Abraham's son, whom Hagar
	  the Egyptian, Sarah's handmaid, bare unto Abraham:

	  ^13And these are the names of the sons of Ishmael, by their names,
	  according to their generations: the firstborn of Ishmael, Nebajoth; and
	  Kedar, and Adbeel, and Mibsam,

	  ^14And Mishma, and Dumah, and Massa,

	  ^15Hadar, and Tema, Jetur, Naphish, and Kedemah:

	  ^16These are the sons of Ishmael, and these are their names, by their
	  towns, and by their castles; twelve princes according to their nations.

	  ^17And these are the years of the life of Ishmael, an hundred and
	  thirty and seven years: and he gave up the ghost and died; and was
	  gathered unto his people.

	  ^18And they dwelt from Havilah unto Shur, that is before Egypt, as thou
	  goest toward Assyria: and he died in the presence of all his brethren.

	  ^19And these are the generations of Isaac, Abraham's son: Abraham begat
	  Isaac:

	  ^20And Isaac was forty years old when he took Rebekah to wife, the
	  daughter of Bethuel the Syrian of Padanaram, the sister to Laban the
	  Syrian.

	  ^21And Isaac intreated the Lord for his wife, because she was barren:
	  and the Lord was intreated of him, and Rebekah his wife conceived.

	  ^22And the children struggled together within her; and she said, If it
	  be so, why am I thus? And she went to enquire of the Lord.

	  ^23And the Lord said unto her, Two nations are in thy womb, and two
	  manner of people shall be separated from thy bowels; and the one people
	  shall be stronger than the other people; and the elder shall serve the
	  younger.

	  ^24And when her days to be delivered were fulfilled, behold, there were
	  twins in her womb.

	  ^25And the first came out red, all over like an hairy garment; and they
	  called his name Esau.

	  ^26And after that came his brother out, and his hand took hold on
	  Esau's heel; and his name was called Jacob: and Isaac was threescore
	  years old when she bare them.

	  ^27And the boys grew: and Esau was a cunning hunter, a man of the
	  field; and Jacob was a plain man, dwelling in tents.

	  ^28And Isaac loved Esau, because he did eat of his venison: but Rebekah
	  loved Jacob.

	  ^29And Jacob sod pottage: and Esau came from the field, and he was
	  faint:

	  ^30And Esau said to Jacob, Feed me, I pray thee, with that same red
	  pottage; for I am faint: therefore was his name called Edom.

	  ^31And Jacob said, Sell me this day thy birthright.

	  ^32And Esau said, Behold, I am at the point to die: and what profit
	  shall this birthright do to me?

	  ^33And Jacob said, Swear to me this day; and he sware unto him: and he
	  sold his birthright unto Jacob.

	  ^34Then Jacob gave Esau bread and pottage of lentiles; and he did eat
	  and drink, and rose up, and went his way: thus Esau despised his
	  birthright.
	  __________________________________________________________________

	  Chapter 26

	  And there was a famine in the land, beside the first famine that was in
	  the days of Abraham. And Isaac went unto Abimelech king of the
	  Philistines unto Gerar.

	  ^2And the Lord appeared unto him, and said, Go not down into Egypt;
	  dwell in the land which I shall tell thee of:

	  ^3Sojourn in this land, and I will be with thee, and will bless thee;
	  for unto thee, and unto thy seed, I will give all these countries, and
	  I will perform the oath which I sware unto Abraham thy father;

	  ^4And I will make thy seed to multiply as the stars of heaven, and will
	  give unto thy seed all these countries; and in thy seed shall all the
	  nations of the earth be blessed;

	  ^5Because that Abraham obeyed my voice, and kept my charge, my
	  commandments, my statutes, and my laws.

	  ^6And Isaac dwelt in Gerar:

	  ^7And the men of the place asked him of his wife; and he said, She is
	  my sister: for he feared to say, She is my wife; lest, said he, the men
	  of the place should kill me for Rebekah; because she was fair to look
	  upon.

	  ^8And it came to pass, when he had been there a long time, that
	  Abimelech king of the Philistines looked out at a window, and saw, and,
	  behold, Isaac was sporting with Rebekah his wife.

	  ^9And Abimelech called Isaac, and said, Behold, of a surety she is thy
	  wife: and how saidst thou, She is my sister? And Isaac said unto him,
	  Because I said, Lest I die for her.

	  ^10And Abimelech said, What is this thou hast done unto us? one of the
	  people might lightly have lien with thy wife, and thou shouldest have
	  brought guiltiness upon us.

	  ^11And Abimelech charged all his people, saying, He that toucheth this
	  man or his wife shall surely be put to death.

	  ^12Then Isaac sowed in that land, and received in the same year an
	  hundredfold: and the Lord blessed him.

	  ^13And the man waxed great, and went forward, and grew until he became
	  very great:

	  ^14For he had possession of flocks, and possession of herds, and great
	  store of servants: and the Philistines envied him.

	  ^15For all the wells which his father's servants had digged in the days
	  of Abraham his father, the Philistines had stopped them, and filled
	  them with earth.

	  ^16And Abimelech said unto Isaac, Go from us; for thou art much
	  mightier than we.

	  ^17And Isaac departed thence, and pitched his tent in the valley of
	  Gerar, and dwelt there.

	  ^18And Isaac digged again the wells of water, which they had digged in
	  the days of Abraham his father; for the philistines had stopped them
	  after the death of Abraham: and he called their names after the names
	  by which his father had called them.

	  ^19And Isaac's servants digged in the valley, and found there a well of
	  springing water.

	  ^20And the herdmen of Gerar did strive with Isaac's herdmen, saying,
	  The water is ours: and he called the name of the well Esek; because
	  they strove with him.

	  ^21And they digged another well, and strove for that also: and he
	  called the name of it Sitnah.

	  ^22And he removed from thence, and digged another well; and for that
	  they strove not: and he called the name of it Rehoboth; and he said,
	  For now the Lord hath made room for us, and we shall be fruitful in the
	  land.

	  ^23And he went up from thence to Beersheba.

	  ^24And the Lord appeared unto him the same night, and said, I am the
	  God of Abraham thy father: fear not, for I am with thee, and will bless
	  thee, and multiply thy seed for my servant Abraham's sake.

	  ^25And he builded an altar there, and called upon the name of the Lord,
	  and pitched his tent there: and there Isaac's servants digged a well.

	  ^26Then Abimelech went to him from Gerar, and Ahuzzath one of his
	  friends, and Phichol the chief captain of his army.

	  ^27And Isaac said unto them, Wherefore come ye to me, seeing ye hate
	  me, and have sent me away from you?

	  ^28And they said, We saw certainly that the Lord was with thee: and we
	  said, Let there be now an oath betwixt us, even betwixt us and thee,
	  and let us make a covenant with thee;

^29That thou wilt do us no hurt, as we have not touched thee, and as we
have done unto thee nothing but good, and have sent thee away in peace:
thou art now the blessed of the Lord.

^30And he made them a feast, and they did eat and drink.

^31And they rose up betimes in the morning, and sware one to another:
and Isaac sent them away, and they departed from him in peace.

^32And it came to pass the same day, that Isaac's servants came, and
told him concerning the well which they had digged, and said unto him,
	 We have found water.

	 ^33And he called it Shebah: therefore the name of the city is Beersheba
	 unto this day.

	 ^34And Esau was forty years old when he took to wife Judith the
	 daughter of Beeri the Hittite, and Bashemath the daughter of Elon the
	 Hittite:

	 ^35Which were a grief of mind unto Isaac and to Rebekah.
	 __________________________________________________________________

	 Chapter 27

	 And it came to pass, that when Isaac was old, and his eyes were dim, so
	 that he could not see, he called Esau his eldest son, and said unto
	 him, My son: and he said unto him, Behold, here am I.

	 ^2And he said, Behold now, I am old, I know not the day of my death:

	 ^3Now therefore take, I pray thee, thy weapons, thy quiver and thy bow,
	 and go out to the field, and take me some venison;

^4And make me savoury meat, such as I love, and bring it to me, that I
may eat; that my soul may bless thee before I die.

^5And Rebekah heard when Isaac spake to Esau his son. And Esau went to
the field to hunt for venison, and to bring it.

^6And Rebekah spake unto Jacob her son, saying, Behold, I heard thy
father speak unto Esau thy brother, saying,

	   ^7Bring me venison, and make me savoury meat, that I may eat, and bless
	   thee before the Lord before my death.

	   ^8Now therefore, my son, obey my voice according to that which I
	   command thee.

	   ^9Go now to the flock, and fetch me from thence two good kids of the
	   goats; and I will make them savoury meat for thy father, such as he
	   loveth:

	   ^10And thou shalt bring it to thy father, that he may eat, and that he
	   may bless thee before his death.

	   ^11And Jacob said to Rebekah his mother, Behold, Esau my brother is a
	   hairy man, and I am a smooth man:

	   ^12My father peradventure will feel me, and I shall seem to him as a
	   deceiver; and I shall bring a curse upon me, and not a blessing.

	   ^13And his mother said unto him, Upon me be thy curse, my son: only
	   obey my voice, and go fetch me them.

	   ^14And he went, and fetched, and brought them to his mother: and his
	   mother made savoury meat, such as his father loved.

	   ^15And Rebekah took goodly raiment of her eldest son Esau, which were
	   with her in the house, and put them upon Jacob her younger son:

	   ^16And she put the skins of the kids of the goats upon his hands, and
	   upon the smooth of his neck:

	   ^17And she gave the savoury meat and the bread, which she had prepared,
	   into the hand of her son Jacob.

	   ^18And he came unto his father, and said, My father: and he said, Here
	   am I; who art thou, my son?

	   ^19And Jacob said unto his father, I am Esau thy firstborn; I have done
	   according as thou badest me: arise, I pray thee, sit and eat of my
	   venison, that thy soul may bless me.

	   ^20And Isaac said unto his son, How is it that thou hast found it so
	   quickly, my son? And he said, Because the Lord thy God brought it to
	   me.

	   ^21And Isaac said unto Jacob, Come near, I pray thee, that I may feel
	   thee, my son, whether thou be my very son Esau or not.

	   ^22And Jacob went near unto Isaac his father; and he felt him, and
	   said, The voice is Jacob's voice, but the hands are the hands of Esau.

	   ^23And he discerned him not, because his hands were hairy, as his
	   brother Esau's hands: so he blessed him.

	   ^24And he said, Art thou my very son Esau? And he said, I am.

	   ^25And he said, Bring it near to me, and I will eat of my son's
	   venison, that my soul may bless thee. And he brought it near to him,
	   and he did eat: and he brought him wine, and he drank.

	   ^26And his father Isaac said unto him, Come near now, and kiss me, my
	   son.

	   ^27And he came near, and kissed him: and he smelled the smell of his
	   raiment, and blessed him, and said, See, the smell of my son is as the
	   smell of a field which the Lord hath blessed:

	   ^28Therefore God give thee of the dew of heaven, and the fatness of the
	   earth, and plenty of corn and wine:

	   ^29Let people serve thee, and nations bow down to thee: be lord over
	   thy brethren, and let thy mother's sons bow down to thee: cursed be
	   every one that curseth thee, and blessed be he that blesseth thee.

	   ^30And it came to pass, as soon as Isaac had made an end of blessing
	   Jacob, and Jacob was yet scarce gone out from the presence of Isaac his
	   father, that Esau his brother came in from his hunting.

	   ^31And he also had made savoury meat, and brought it unto his father,
	   and said unto his father, Let my father arise, and eat of his son's
	   venison, that thy soul may bless me.

	   ^32And Isaac his father said unto him, Who art thou? And he said, I am
	   thy son, thy firstborn Esau.

	   ^33And Isaac trembled very exceedingly, and said, Who? where is he that
	   hath taken venison, and brought it me, and I have eaten of all before
	   thou camest, and have blessed him? yea, and he shall be blessed.

	   ^34And when Esau heard the words of his father, he cried with a great
	   and exceeding bitter cry, and said unto his father, Bless me, even me
	   also, O my father.

	   ^35And he said, Thy brother came with subtilty, and hath taken away thy
	   blessing.

	   ^36And he said, Is not he rightly named Jacob? for he hath supplanted
	   me these two times: he took away my birthright; and, behold, now he
	   hath taken away my blessing. And he said, Hast thou not reserved a
	   blessing for me?

	   ^37And Isaac answered and said unto Esau, Behold, I have made him thy
	   lord, and all his brethren have I given to him for servants; and with
	   corn and wine have I sustained him: and what shall I do now unto thee,
	   my son?

	   ^38And Esau said unto his father, Hast thou but one blessing, my
	   father? bless me, even me also, O my father. And Esau lifted up his
	   voice, and wept.

	   ^39And Isaac his father answered and said unto him, Behold, thy
	   dwelling shall be the fatness of the earth, and of the dew of heaven
	   from above;

	   ^40And by thy sword shalt thou live, and shalt serve thy brother; and
	   it shall come to pass when thou shalt have the dominion, that thou
	   shalt break his yoke from off thy neck.

	   ^41And Esau hated Jacob because of the blessing wherewith his father
	   blessed him: and Esau said in his heart, The days of mourning for my
	   father are at hand; then will I slay my brother Jacob.

	   ^42And these words of Esau her elder son were told to Rebekah: and she
	   sent and called Jacob her younger son, and said unto him, Behold, thy
	   brother Esau, as touching thee, doth comfort himself, purposing to kill
	   thee.

	   ^43Now therefore, my son, obey my voice; and arise, flee thou to Laban
	   my brother to Haran;

	   ^44And tarry with him a few days, until thy brother's fury turn away;

	   ^45Until thy brother's anger turn away from thee, and he forget that
	   which thou hast done to him: then I will send, and fetch thee from
	   thence: why should I be deprived also of you both in one day?

	   ^46And Rebekah said to Isaac, I am weary of my life because of the
	   daughters of Heth: if Jacob take a wife of the daughters of Heth, such
	   as these which are of the daughters of the land, what good shall my
	   life do me?
	   __________________________________________________________________

	   Chapter 28

	   And Isaac called Jacob, and blessed him, and charged him, and said unto
	   him, Thou shalt not take a wife of the daughters of Canaan.

	   ^2Arise, go to Padanaram, to the house of Bethuel thy mother's father;
	   and take thee a wife from thence of the daughters of Laban thy mother's
	   brother.

	   ^3And God Almighty bless thee, and make thee fruitful, and multiply
	   thee, that thou mayest be a multitude of people;

	   ^4And give thee the blessing of Abraham, to thee, and to thy seed with
	   thee; that thou mayest inherit the land wherein thou art a stranger,
	   which God gave unto Abraham.

	   ^5And Isaac sent away Jacob: and he went to Padanaram unto Laban, son
	   of Bethuel the Syrian, the brother of Rebekah, Jacob's and Esau's
	   mother.

	   ^6When Esau saw that Isaac had blessed Jacob, and sent him away to
	   Padanaram, to take him a wife from thence; and that as he blessed him
	   he gave him a charge, saying, Thou shalt not take a wife of the
	   daughters of Canaan;

	   ^7And that Jacob obeyed his father and his mother, and was gone to
	   Padanaram;

	   ^8And Esau seeing that the daughters of Canaan pleased not Isaac his
	   father;

	   ^9Then went Esau unto Ishmael, and took unto the wives which he had
	   Mahalath the daughter of Ishmael Abraham's son, the sister of Nebajoth,
	   to be his wife.

	   ^10And Jacob went out from Beersheba, and went toward Haran.

	   ^11And he lighted upon a certain place, and tarried there all night,
	   because the sun was set; and he took of the stones of that place, and
	   put them for his pillows, and lay down in that place to sleep.

	   ^12And he dreamed, and behold a ladder set up on the earth, and the top
	   of it reached to heaven: and behold the angels of God ascending and
	   descending on it.

	   ^13And, behold, the Lord stood above it, and said, I am the Lord God of
	   Abraham thy father, and the God of Isaac: the land whereon thou liest,
	   to thee will I give it, and to thy seed;

^14And thy seed shall be as the dust of the earth, and thou shalt
spread abroad to the west, and to the east, and to the north, and to
the south: and in thee and in thy seed shall all the families of the
earth be blessed.

^15And, behold, I am with thee, and will keep thee in all places
whither thou goest, and will bring thee again into this land; for I
will not leave thee, until I have done that which I have spoken to thee
of.

^16And Jacob awaked out of his sleep, and he said, Surely the Lord is
in this place; and I knew it not.

^17And he was afraid, and said, How dreadful is this place! this is
none other but the house of God, and this is the gate of heaven.

^18And Jacob rose up early in the morning, and took the stone that he
had put for his pillows, and set it up for a pillar, and poured oil
upon the top of it.

^19And he called the name of that place Bethel: but the name of that
city was called Luz at the first.

^20And Jacob vowed a vow, saying, If God will be with me, and will keep
me in this way that I go, and will give me bread to eat, and raiment to
put on,

	^21So that I come again to my father's house in peace; then shall the
	Lord be my God:

	^22And this stone, which I have set for a pillar, shall be God's house:
	and of all that thou shalt give me I will surely give the tenth unto
	thee.
	__________________________________________________________________

	Chapter 29

	Then Jacob went on his journey, and came into the land of the people of
	the east.

	^2And he looked, and behold a well in the field, and, lo, there were
	three flocks of sheep lying by it; for out of that well they watered
	the flocks: and a great stone was upon the well's mouth.

	^3And thither were all the flocks gathered: and they rolled the stone
	from the well's mouth, and watered the sheep, and put the stone again
	upon the well's mouth in his place.

	^4And Jacob said unto them, My brethren, whence be ye? And they said,
	Of Haran are we.

	^5And he said unto them, Know ye Laban the son of Nahor? And they said,
	We know him.

	^6And he said unto them, Is he well? And they said, He is well: and,
	behold, Rachel his daughter cometh with the sheep.

	^7And he said, Lo, it is yet high day, neither is it time that the
	cattle should be gathered together: water ye the sheep, and go and feed
	them.

	^8And they said, We cannot, until all the flocks be gathered together,
	and till they roll the stone from the well's mouth; then we water the
	sheep.

	^9And while he yet spake with them, Rachel came with her father's
	sheep: for she kept them.

	^10And it came to pass, when Jacob saw Rachel the daughter of Laban his
	mother's brother, and the sheep of Laban his mother's brother, that
	Jacob went near, and rolled the stone from the well's mouth, and
	watered the flock of Laban his mother's brother.

	^11And Jacob kissed Rachel, and lifted up his voice, and wept.

	^12And Jacob told Rachel that he was her father's brother, and that he
	was Rebekah's son: and she ran and told her father.

	^13And it came to pass, when Laban heard the tidings of Jacob his
	sister's son, that he ran to meet him, and embraced him, and kissed
	him, and brought him to his house. And he told Laban all these things.

	^14And Laban said to him, Surely thou art my bone and my flesh. And he
	abode with him the space of a month.

	^15And Laban said unto Jacob, Because thou art my brother, shouldest
	thou therefore serve me for nought? tell me, what shall thy wages be?

	^16And Laban had two daughters: the name of the elder was Leah, and the
	name of the younger was Rachel.

	^17Leah was tender eyed; but Rachel was beautiful and well favoured.

	^18And Jacob loved Rachel; and said, I will serve thee seven years for
	Rachel thy younger daughter.

	^19And Laban said, It is better that I give her to thee, than that I
	should give her to another man: abide with me.

	^20And Jacob served seven years for Rachel; and they seemed unto him
	but a few days, for the love he had to her.

	^21And Jacob said unto Laban, Give me my wife, for my days are
	fulfilled, that I may go in unto her.

	^22And Laban gathered together all the men of the place, and made a
	feast.

	^23And it came to pass in the evening, that he took Leah his daughter,
	and brought her to him; and he went in unto her.

	^24And Laban gave unto his daughter Leah Zilpah his maid for an
	handmaid.

	^25And it came to pass, that in the morning, behold, it was Leah: and
	he said to Laban, What is this thou hast done unto me? did not I serve
	with thee for Rachel? wherefore then hast thou beguiled me?

	^26And Laban said, It must not be so done in our country, to give the
	younger before the firstborn.

	^27Fulfil her week, and we will give thee this also for the service
	which thou shalt serve with me yet seven other years.

	^28And Jacob did so, and fulfilled her week: and he gave him Rachel his
	daughter to wife also.

	^29And Laban gave to Rachel his daughter Bilhah his handmaid to be her
	maid.

	^30And he went in also unto Rachel, and he loved also Rachel more than
	Leah, and served with him yet seven other years.

	^31And when the Lord saw that Leah was hated, he opened her womb: but
	Rachel was barren.

	^32And Leah conceived, and bare a son, and she called his name Reuben:
	for she said, Surely the Lord hath looked upon my affliction; now
	therefore my husband will love me.

	^33And she conceived again, and bare a son; and said, Because the Lord
	hath heard that I was hated, he hath therefore given me this son also:
	and she called his name Simeon.

	^34And she conceived again, and bare a son; and said, Now this time
	will my husband be joined unto me, because I have born him three sons:
	therefore was his name called Levi.

	^35And she conceived again, and bare a son: and she said, Now will I
	praise the Lord: therefore she called his name Judah; and left bearing.
	__________________________________________________________________

	Chapter 30

	And when Rachel saw that she bare Jacob no children, Rachel envied her
	sister; and said unto Jacob, Give me children, or else I die.

	^2And Jacob's anger was kindled against Rachel: and he said, Am I in
	God's stead, who hath withheld from thee the fruit of the womb?

	^3And she said, Behold my maid Bilhah, go in unto her; and she shall
	bear upon my knees that I may also have children by her.

	^4And she gave him Bilhah her handmaid to wife: and Jacob went in unto
	her.

	^5And Bilhah conceived, and bare Jacob a son.

	^6And Rachel said, God hath judged me, and hath also heard my voice,
	and hath given me a son: therefore called she his name Dan.

	^7And Bilhah Rachel's maid conceived again, and bare Jacob a second
	son.

	^8And Rachel said, With great wrestlings have I wrestled with my
	sister, and I have prevailed: and she called his name Naphtali.

	^9When Leah saw that she had left bearing, she took Zilpah her maid,
	and gave her Jacob to wife.

	^10And Zilpah Leah's maid bare Jacob a son.

	^11And Leah said, A troop cometh: and she called his name Gad.

	^12And Zilpah Leah's maid bare Jacob a second son.

	^13And Leah said, Happy am I, for the daughters will call me blessed:
	and she called his name Asher.

	^14And Reuben went in the days of wheat harvest, and found mandrakes in
	the field, and brought them unto his mother Leah. Then Rachel said to
	Leah, Give me, I pray thee, of thy son's mandrakes.

	^15And she said unto her, Is it a small matter that thou hast taken my
	husband? and wouldest thou take away my son's mandrakes also? And
	Rachel said, Therefore he shall lie with thee to night for thy son's
	mandrakes.

	^16And Jacob came out of the field in the evening, and Leah went out to
	meet him, and said, Thou must come in unto me; for surely I have hired
	thee with my son's mandrakes. And he lay with her that night.

	^17And God hearkened unto Leah, and she conceived, and bare Jacob the
	fifth son.

	^18And Leah said, God hath given me my hire, because I have given my
	maiden to my husband: and she called his name Issachar.

	^19And Leah conceived again, and bare Jacob the sixth son.

	^20And Leah said, God hath endued me with a good dowry; now will my
	husband dwell with me, because I have born him six sons: and she called
	his name Zebulun.

	^21And afterwards she bare a daughter, and called her name Dinah.

	^22And God remembered Rachel, and God hearkened to her, and opened her
	womb.

	^23And she conceived, and bare a son; and said, God hath taken away my
	reproach:

	^24And she called his name Joseph; and said, The Lord shall add to me
	another son.

	^25And it came to pass, when Rachel had born Joseph, that Jacob said
	unto Laban, Send me away, that I may go unto mine own place, and to my
	country.

	^26Give me my wives and my children, for whom I have served thee, and
	let me go: for thou knowest my service which I have done thee.

	^27And Laban said unto him, I pray thee, if I have found favour in
	thine eyes, tarry: for I have learned by experience that the Lord hath
	blessed me for thy sake.

	^28And he said, Appoint me thy wages, and I will give it.

	^29And he said unto him, Thou knowest how I have served thee, and how
	thy cattle was with me.

	^30For it was little which thou hadst before I came, and it is now
	increased unto a multitude; and the Lord hath blessed thee since my
	coming: and now when shall I provide for mine own house also?

	^31And he said, What shall I give thee? And Jacob said, Thou shalt not
	give me any thing: if thou wilt do this thing for me, I will again feed
	and keep thy flock:

	^32I will pass through all thy flock to day, removing from thence all
	the speckled and spotted cattle, and all the brown cattle among the
	sheep, and the spotted and speckled among the goats: and of such shall
	be my hire.

	^33So shall my righteousness answer for me in time to come, when it
	shall come for my hire before thy face: every one that is not speckled
	and spotted among the goats, and brown among the sheep, that shall be
	counted stolen with me.

	^34And Laban said, Behold, I would it might be according to thy word.

	^35And he removed that day the he goats that were ringstraked and
	spotted, and all the she goats that were speckled and spotted, and
	every one that had some white in it, and all the brown among the sheep,
	and gave them into the hand of his sons.

	^36And he set three days' journey betwixt himself and Jacob: and Jacob
	fed the rest of Laban's flocks.

	^37And Jacob took him rods of green poplar, and of the hazel and
	chesnut tree; and pilled white strakes in them, and made the white
	appear which was in the rods.

	^38And he set the rods which he had pilled before the flocks in the
	gutters in the watering troughs when the flocks came to drink, that
	they should conceive when they came to drink.

	^39And the flocks conceived before the rods, and brought forth cattle
	ringstraked, speckled, and spotted.

	^40And Jacob did separate the lambs, and set the faces of the flocks
	toward the ringstraked, and all the brown in the flock of Laban; and he
	put his own flocks by themselves, and put them not unto Laban's cattle.

	^41And it came to pass, whensoever the stronger cattle did conceive,
	that Jacob laid the rods before the eyes of the cattle in the gutters,
	that they might conceive among the rods.

	^42But when the cattle were feeble, he put them not in: so the feebler
	were Laban's, and the stronger Jacob's.

	^43And the man increased exceedingly, and had much cattle, and
	maidservants, and menservants, and camels, and asses.
	__________________________________________________________________

	Chapter 31

	And he heard the words of Laban's sons, saying, Jacob hath taken away
	all that was our father's; and of that which was our father's hath he
	gotten all this glory.

	^2And Jacob beheld the countenance of Laban, and, behold, it was not
	toward him as before.

	^3And the Lord said unto Jacob, Return unto the land of thy fathers,
	and to thy kindred; and I will be with thee.

	^4And Jacob sent and called Rachel and Leah to the field unto his
	flock,

	^5And said unto them, I see your father's countenance, that it is not
	toward me as before; but the God of my father hath been with me.

	^6And ye know that with all my power I have served your father.

	^7And your father hath deceived me, and changed my wages ten times; but
	God suffered him not to hurt me.

	^8If he said thus, The speckled shall be thy wages; then all the cattle
	bare speckled: and if he said thus, The ringstraked shall be thy hire;
	then bare all the cattle ringstraked.

	^9Thus God hath taken away the cattle of your father, and given them to
	me.

	^10And it came to pass at the time that the cattle conceived, that I
	lifted up mine eyes, and saw in a dream, and, behold, the rams which
	leaped upon the cattle were ringstraked, speckled, and grisled.

	^11And the angel of God spake unto me in a dream, saying, Jacob: And I
	said, Here am I.

	^12And he said, Lift up now thine eyes, and see, all the rams which
	leap upon the cattle are ringstraked, speckled, and grisled: for I have
	seen all that Laban doeth unto thee.

	^13I am the God of Bethel, where thou anointedst the pillar, and where
	thou vowedst a vow unto me: now arise, get thee out from this land, and
	return unto the land of thy kindred.

	^14And Rachel and Leah answered and said unto him, Is there yet any
	portion or inheritance for us in our father's house?

	^15Are we not counted of him strangers? for he hath sold us, and hath
	quite devoured also our money.

	^16For all the riches which God hath taken from our father, that is
	ours, and our children's: now then, whatsoever God hath said unto thee,
	do.

	^17Then Jacob rose up, and set his sons and his wives upon camels;

	^18And he carried away all his cattle, and all his goods which he had
	gotten, the cattle of his getting, which he had gotten in Padanaram,
	for to go to Isaac his father in the land of Canaan.

	^19And Laban went to shear his sheep: and Rachel had stolen the images
	that were her father's.

	^20And Jacob stole away unawares to Laban the Syrian, in that he told
	him not that he fled.

	^21So he fled with all that he had; and he rose up, and passed over the
	river, and set his face toward the mount Gilead.

	^22And it was told Laban on the third day that Jacob was fled.

	^23And he took his brethren with him, and pursued after him seven days'
	journey; and they overtook him in the mount Gilead.

	^24And God came to Laban the Syrian in a dream by night, and said unto
	him, Take heed that thou speak not to Jacob either good or bad.

	^25Then Laban overtook Jacob. Now Jacob had pitched his tent in the
	mount: and Laban with his brethren pitched in the mount of Gilead.

	^26And Laban said to Jacob, What hast thou done, that thou hast stolen
	away unawares to me, and carried away my daughters, as captives taken
	with the sword?

	^27Wherefore didst thou flee away secretly, and steal away from me; and
	didst not tell me, that I might have sent thee away with mirth, and
	with songs, with tabret, and with harp?

	^28And hast not suffered me to kiss my sons and my daughters? thou hast
	now done foolishly in so doing.

	^29It is in the power of my hand to do you hurt: but the God of your
	father spake unto me yesternight, saying, Take thou heed that thou
	speak not to Jacob either good or bad.

	^30And now, though thou wouldest needs be gone, because thou sore
	longedst after thy father's house, yet wherefore hast thou stolen my
	gods?

	^31And Jacob answered and said to Laban, Because I was afraid: for I
	said, Peradventure thou wouldest take by force thy daughters from me.

	^32With whomsoever thou findest thy gods, let him not live: before our
	brethren discern thou what is thine with me, and take it to thee. For
	Jacob knew not that Rachel had stolen them.

	^33And Laban went into Jacob's tent, and into Leah's tent, and into the
	two maidservants' tents; but he found them not. Then went he out of
	Leah's tent, and entered into Rachel's tent.

	^34Now Rachel had taken the images, and put them in the camel's
	furniture, and sat upon them. And Laban searched all the tent, but
	found them not.

	^35And she said to her father, Let it not displease my lord that I
	cannot rise up before thee; for the custom of women is upon me. And he
	searched, but found not the images.

	^36And Jacob was wroth, and chode with Laban: and Jacob answered and
	said to Laban, What is my trespass? what is my sin, that thou hast so
	hotly pursued after me?

	^37Whereas thou hast searched all my stuff, what hast thou found of all
	thy household stuff? set it here before my brethren and thy brethren,
	that they may judge betwixt us both.

	^38This twenty years have I been with thee; thy ewes and thy she goats
	have not cast their young, and the rams of thy flock have I not eaten.

	^39That which was torn of beasts I brought not unto thee; I bare the
	loss of it; of my hand didst thou require it, whether stolen by day, or
	stolen by night.

	^40Thus I was; in the day the drought consumed me, and the frost by
	night; and my sleep departed from mine eyes.

	^41Thus have I been twenty years in thy house; I served thee fourteen
	years for thy two daughters, and six years for thy cattle: and thou
	hast changed my wages ten times.

	^42Except the God of my father, the God of Abraham, and the fear of
	Isaac, had been with me, surely thou hadst sent me away now empty. God
	hath seen mine affliction and the labour of my hands, and rebuked thee
	yesternight.

	^43And Laban answered and said unto Jacob, These daughters are my
	daughters, and these children are my children, and these cattle are my
	cattle, and all that thou seest is mine: and what can I do this day
	unto these my daughters, or unto their children which they have born?

	^44Now therefore come thou, let us make a covenant, I and thou; and let
	it be for a witness between me and thee.

	^45And Jacob took a stone, and set it up for a pillar.

	^46And Jacob said unto his brethren, Gather stones; and they took
	stones, and made an heap: and they did eat there upon the heap.

	^47And Laban called it Jegarsahadutha: but Jacob called it Galeed.

	^48And Laban said, This heap is a witness between me and thee this day.
	Therefore was the name of it called Galeed;

	^49And Mizpah; for he said, The Lord watch between me and thee, when we
	are absent one from another.

	^50If thou shalt afflict my daughters, or if thou shalt take other
	wives beside my daughters, no man is with us; see, God is witness
	betwixt me and thee.

	^51And Laban said to Jacob, Behold this heap, and behold this pillar,
	which I have cast betwixt me and thee;

^52This heap be witness, and this pillar be witness, that I will not
pass over this heap to thee, and that thou shalt not pass over this
heap and this pillar unto me, for harm.

^53The God of Abraham, and the God of Nahor, the God of their father,
	judge betwixt us. And Jacob sware by the fear of his father Isaac.

	^54Then Jacob offered sacrifice upon the mount, and called his brethren
	to eat bread: and they did eat bread, and tarried all night in the
	mount.

	^55And early in the morning Laban rose up, and kissed his sons and his
	daughters, and blessed them: and Laban departed, and returned unto his
	place.
	__________________________________________________________________

	Chapter 32

	And Jacob went on his way, and the angels of God met him.

	^2And when Jacob saw them, he said, This is God's host: and he called
	the name of that place Mahanaim.

	^3And Jacob sent messengers before him to Esau his brother unto the
	land of Seir, the country of Edom.

	^4And he commanded them, saying, Thus shall ye speak unto my lord Esau;
	Thy servant Jacob saith thus, I have sojourned with Laban, and stayed
	there until now:

	^5And I have oxen, and asses, flocks, and menservants, and
	womenservants: and I have sent to tell my lord, that I may find grace
	in thy sight.

	^6And the messengers returned to Jacob, saying, We came to thy brother
	Esau, and also he cometh to meet thee, and four hundred men with him.

	^7Then Jacob was greatly afraid and distressed: and he divided the
	people that was with him, and the flocks, and herds, and the camels,
	into two bands;

^8And said, If Esau come to the one company, and smite it, then the
other company which is left shall escape.

^9And Jacob said, O God of my father Abraham, and God of my father
Isaac, the Lord which saidst unto me, Return unto thy country, and to
thy kindred, and I will deal well with thee:

^10I am not worthy of the least of all the mercies, and of all the
truth, which thou hast shewed unto thy servant; for with my staff I
passed over this Jordan; and now I am become two bands.

^11Deliver me, I pray thee, from the hand of my brother, from the hand
of Esau: for I fear him, lest he will come and smite me, and the mother
with the children.

^12And thou saidst, I will surely do thee good, and make thy seed as
the sand of the sea, which cannot be numbered for multitude.

^13And he lodged there that same night; and took of that which came to
his hand a present for Esau his brother;

^14Two hundred she goats, and twenty he goats, two hundred ewes, and
twenty rams,

	   ^15Thirty milch camels with their colts, forty kine, and ten bulls,
	   twenty she asses, and ten foals.

	   ^16And he delivered them into the hand of his servants, every drove by
	   themselves; and said unto his servants, Pass over before me, and put a
	   space betwixt drove and drove.

	   ^17And he commanded the foremost, saying, When Esau my brother meeteth
	   thee, and asketh thee, saying, Whose art thou? and whither goest thou?
	   and whose are these before thee?

	   ^18Then thou shalt say, They be thy servant Jacob's; it is a present
	   sent unto my lord Esau: and, behold, also he is behind us.

	   ^19And so commanded he the second, and the third, and all that followed
	   the droves, saying, On this manner shall ye speak unto Esau, when ye
	   find him.

	   ^20And say ye moreover, Behold, thy servant Jacob is behind us. For he
	   said, I will appease him with the present that goeth before me, and
	   afterward I will see his face; peradventure he will accept of me.

	   ^21So went the present over before him: and himself lodged that night
	   in the company.

	   ^22And he rose up that night, and took his two wives, and his two
	   womenservants, and his eleven sons, and passed over the ford Jabbok.

	   ^23And he took them, and sent them over the brook, and sent over that
	   he had.

	   ^24And Jacob was left alone; and there wrestled a man with him until
	   the breaking of the day.

	   ^25And when he saw that he prevailed not against him, he touched the
	   hollow of his thigh; and the hollow of Jacob's thigh was out of joint,
	   as he wrestled with him.

	   ^26And he said, Let me go, for the day breaketh. And he said, I will
	   not let thee go, except thou bless me.

	   ^27And he said unto him, What is thy name? And he said, Jacob.

	   ^28And he said, Thy name shall be called no more Jacob, but Israel: for
	   as a prince hast thou power with God and with men, and hast prevailed.

	   ^29And Jacob asked him, and said, Tell me, I pray thee, thy name. And
	   he said, Wherefore is it that thou dost ask after my name? And he
	   blessed him there.

	   ^30And Jacob called the name of the place Peniel: for I have seen God
	   face to face, and my life is preserved.

	   ^31And as he passed over Penuel the sun rose upon him, and he halted
	   upon his thigh.

	   ^32Therefore the children of Israel eat not of the sinew which shrank,
	   which is upon the hollow of the thigh, unto this day: because he
	   touched the hollow of Jacob's thigh in the sinew that shrank.
	   __________________________________________________________________

	   Chapter 33

	   And Jacob lifted up his eyes, and looked, and, behold, Esau came, and
	   with him four hundred men. And he divided the children unto Leah, and
	   unto Rachel, and unto the two handmaids.

	   ^2And he put the handmaids and their children foremost, and Leah and
	   her children after, and Rachel and Joseph hindermost.

	   ^3And he passed over before them, and bowed himself to the ground seven
	   times, until he came near to his brother.

	   ^4And Esau ran to meet him, and embraced him, and fell on his neck, and
	   kissed him: and they wept.

	   ^5And he lifted up his eyes, and saw the women and the children; and
	   said, Who are those with thee? And he said, The children which God hath
	   graciously given thy servant.

	   ^6Then the handmaidens came near, they and their children, and they
	   bowed themselves.

	   ^7And Leah also with her children came near, and bowed themselves: and
	   after came Joseph near and Rachel, and they bowed themselves.

	   ^8And he said, What meanest thou by all this drove which I met? And he
	   said, These are to find grace in the sight of my lord.

	   ^9And Esau said, I have enough, my brother; keep that thou hast unto
	   thyself.

	   ^10And Jacob said, Nay, I pray thee, if now I have found grace in thy
	   sight, then receive my present at my hand: for therefore I have seen
	   thy face, as though I had seen the face of God, and thou wast pleased
	   with me.

	   ^11Take, I pray thee, my blessing that is brought to thee; because God
	   hath dealt graciously with me, and because I have enough. And he urged
	   him, and he took it.

	   ^12And he said, Let us take our journey, and let us go, and I will go
	   before thee.

	   ^13And he said unto him, My lord knoweth that the children are tender,
	   and the flocks and herds with young are with me: and if men should
	   overdrive them one day, all the flock will die.

	   ^14Let my lord, I pray thee, pass over before his servant: and I will
	   lead on softly, according as the cattle that goeth before me and the
	   children be able to endure, until I come unto my lord unto Seir.

	   ^15And Esau said, Let me now leave with thee some of the folk that are
	   with me. And he said, What needeth it? let me find grace in the sight
	   of my lord.

	   ^16So Esau returned that day on his way unto Seir.

	   ^17And Jacob journeyed to Succoth, and built him an house, and made
	   booths for his cattle: therefore the name of the place is called
	   Succoth.

	   ^18And Jacob came to Shalem, a city of Shechem, which is in the land of
	   Canaan, when he came from Padanaram; and pitched his tent before the
	   city.

	   ^19And he bought a parcel of a field, where he had spread his tent, at
	   the hand of the children of Hamor, Shechem's father, for an hundred
	   pieces of money.

	   ^20And he erected there an altar, and called it Elelohe-Israel.
	   __________________________________________________________________

	   Chapter 34

	   And Dinah the daughter of Leah, which she bare unto Jacob, went out to
	   see the daughters of the land.

	   ^2And when Shechem the son of Hamor the Hivite, prince of the country,
	   saw her, he took her, and lay with her, and defiled her.

	   ^3And his soul clave unto Dinah the daughter of Jacob, and he loved the
	   damsel, and spake kindly unto the damsel.

	   ^4And Shechem spake unto his father Hamor, saying, Get me this damsel
	   to wife.

	   ^5And Jacob heard that he had defiled Dinah his daughter: now his sons
	   were with his cattle in the field: and Jacob held his peace until they
	   were come.

	   ^6And Hamor the father of Shechem went out unto Jacob to commune with
	   him.

	   ^7And the sons of Jacob came out of the field when they heard it: and
	   the men were grieved, and they were very wroth, because he had wrought
	   folly in Israel in lying with Jacob's daughter; which thing ought not
	   to be done.

	   ^8And Hamor communed with them, saying, The soul of my son Shechem
	   longeth for your daughter: I pray you give her him to wife.

	   ^9And make ye marriages with us, and give your daughters unto us, and
	   take our daughters unto you.

	   ^10And ye shall dwell with us: and the land shall be before you; dwell
	   and trade ye therein, and get you possessions therein.

	   ^11And Shechem said unto her father and unto her brethren, Let me find
	   grace in your eyes, and what ye shall say unto me I will give.

	   ^12Ask me never so much dowry and gift, and I will give according as ye
	   shall say unto me: but give me the damsel to wife.

	   ^13And the sons of Jacob answered Shechem and Hamor his father
	   deceitfully, and said, because he had defiled Dinah their sister:

	   ^14And they said unto them, We cannot do this thing, to give our sister
	   to one that is uncircumcised; for that were a reproach unto us:

	   ^15But in this will we consent unto you: If ye will be as we be, that
	   every male of you be circumcised;

	   ^16Then will we give our daughters unto you, and we will take your
	   daughters to us, and we will dwell with you, and we will become one
	   people.

	   ^17But if ye will not hearken unto us, to be circumcised; then will we
	   take our daughter, and we will be gone.

	   ^18And their words pleased Hamor, and Shechem Hamor's son.

	   ^19And the young man deferred not to do the thing, because he had
	   delight in Jacob's daughter: and he was more honourable than all the
	   house of his father.

	   ^20And Hamor and Shechem his son came unto the gate of their city, and
	   communed with the men of their city, saying,

	   ^21These men are peaceable with us; therefore let them dwell in the
	   land, and trade therein; for the land, behold, it is large enough for
	   them; let us take their daughters to us for wives, and let us give them
	   our daughters.

	   ^22Only herein will the men consent unto us for to dwell with us, to be
	   one people, if every male among us be circumcised, as they are
	   circumcised.

	   ^23Shall not their cattle and their substance and every beast of theirs
	   be ours? only let us consent unto them, and they will dwell with us.

	   ^24And unto Hamor and unto Shechem his son hearkened all that went out
	   of the gate of his city; and every male was circumcised, all that went
	   out of the gate of his city.

	   ^25And it came to pass on the third day, when they were sore, that two
	   of the sons of Jacob, Simeon and Levi, Dinah's brethren, took each man
	   his sword, and came upon the city boldly, and slew all the males.

	   ^26And they slew Hamor and Shechem his son with the edge of the sword,
	   and took Dinah out of Shechem's house, and went out.

	   ^27The sons of Jacob came upon the slain, and spoiled the city, because
	   they had defiled their sister.

	   ^28They took their sheep, and their oxen, and their asses, and that
	   which was in the city, and that which was in the field,

	   ^29And all their wealth, and all their little ones, and their wives
	   took they captive, and spoiled even all that was in the house.

	   ^30And Jacob said to Simeon and Levi, Ye have troubled me to make me to
	   stink among the inhabitants of the land, among the Canaanites and the
	   Perizzites: and I being few in number, they shall gather themselves
	   together against me, and slay me; and I shall be destroyed, I and my
	   house.

	   ^31And they said, Should he deal with our sister as with an harlot?
	   __________________________________________________________________

	   Chapter 35

	   And God said unto Jacob, Arise, go up to Bethel, and dwell there: and
	   make there an altar unto God, that appeared unto thee when thou
	   fleddest from the face of Esau thy brother.

	   ^2Then Jacob said unto his household, and to all that were with him,
	   Put away the strange gods that are among you, and be clean, and change
	   your garments:

	   ^3And let us arise, and go up to Bethel; and I will make there an altar
	   unto God, who answered me in the day of my distress, and was with me in
	   the way which I went.

	   ^4And they gave unto Jacob all the strange gods which were in their
	   hand, and all their earrings which were in their ears; and Jacob hid
	   them under the oak which was by Shechem.

	   ^5And they journeyed: and the terror of God was upon the cities that
	   were round about them, and they did not pursue after the sons of Jacob.

	   ^6So Jacob came to Luz, which is in the land of Canaan, that is,
	   Bethel, he and all the people that were with him.

	   ^7And he built there an altar, and called the place Elbethel: because
	   there God appeared unto him, when he fled from the face of his brother.

	   ^8But Deborah Rebekah's nurse died, and she was buried beneath Bethel
	   under an oak: and the name of it was called Allonbachuth.

	   ^9And God appeared unto Jacob again, when he came out of Padanaram, and
	   blessed him.

	   ^10And God said unto him, Thy name is Jacob: thy name shall not be
	   called any more Jacob, but Israel shall be thy name: and he called his
	   name Israel.

	   ^11And God said unto him, I am God Almighty: be fruitful and multiply;
	   a nation and a company of nations shall be of thee, and kings shall
	   come out of thy loins;

	   ^12And the land which I gave Abraham and Isaac, to thee I will give it,
	   and to thy seed after thee will I give the land.

	   ^13And God went up from him in the place where he talked with him.

	   ^14And Jacob set up a pillar in the place where he talked with him,
	   even a pillar of stone: and he poured a drink offering thereon, and he
	   poured oil thereon.

	   ^15And Jacob called the name of the place where God spake with him,
	   Bethel.

	   ^16And they journeyed from Bethel; and there was but a little way to
	   come to Ephrath: and Rachel travailed, and she had hard labour.

	   ^17And it came to pass, when she was in hard labour, that the midwife
	   said unto her, Fear not; thou shalt have this son also.

^18And it came to pass, as her soul was in departing, (for she died)
	that she called his name Benoni: but his father called him Benjamin.

	^19And Rachel died, and was buried in the way to Ephrath, which is
	Bethlehem.

	^20And Jacob set a pillar upon her grave: that is the pillar of
	Rachel's grave unto this day.

	^21And Israel journeyed, and spread his tent beyond the tower of Edar.

	^22And it came to pass, when Israel dwelt in that land, that Reuben
	went and lay with Bilhah his father's concubine: and Israel heard it.
	Now the sons of Jacob were twelve:

	^23The sons of Leah; Reuben, Jacob's firstborn, and Simeon, and Levi,
	and Judah, and Issachar, and Zebulun:

	^24The sons of Rachel; Joseph, and Benjamin:

	^25And the sons of Bilhah, Rachel's handmaid; Dan, and Naphtali:

	^26And the sons of Zilpah, Leah's handmaid; Gad, and Asher: these are
	the sons of Jacob, which were born to him in Padanaram.

	^27And Jacob came unto Isaac his father unto Mamre, unto the city of
	Arbah, which is Hebron, where Abraham and Isaac sojourned.

	^28And the days of Isaac were an hundred and fourscore years.

	^29And Isaac gave up the ghost, and died, and was gathered unto his
	people, being old and full of days: and his sons Esau and Jacob buried
	him.
	__________________________________________________________________

	Chapter 36

	Now these are the generations of Esau, who is Edom.

	^2Esau took his wives of the daughters of Canaan; Adah the daughter of
	Elon the Hittite, and Aholibamah the daughter of Anah the daughter of
	Zibeon the Hivite;

	^3And Bashemath Ishmael's daughter, sister of Nebajoth.

	^4And Adah bare to Esau Eliphaz; and Bashemath bare Reuel;

	^5And Aholibamah bare Jeush, and Jaalam, and Korah: these are the sons
	of Esau, which were born unto him in the land of Canaan.

	^6And Esau took his wives, and his sons, and his daughters, and all the
	persons of his house, and his cattle, and all his beasts, and all his
	substance, which he had got in the land of Canaan; and went into the
	country from the face of his brother Jacob.

	^7For their riches were more than that they might dwell together; and
	the land wherein they were strangers could not bear them because of
	their cattle.

	^8Thus dwelt Esau in mount Seir: Esau is Edom.

	^9And these are the generations of Esau the father of the Edomites in
	mount Seir:

	^10These are the names of Esau's sons; Eliphaz the son of Adah the wife
	of Esau, Reuel the son of Bashemath the wife of Esau.

	^11And the sons of Eliphaz were Teman, Omar, Zepho, and Gatam, and
	Kenaz.

	^12And Timna was concubine to Eliphaz Esau's son; and she bare to
	Eliphaz Amalek: these were the sons of Adah Esau's wife.

	^13And these are the sons of Reuel; Nahath, and Zerah, Shammah, and
	Mizzah: these were the sons of Bashemath Esau's wife.

	^14And these were the sons of Aholibamah, the daughter of Anah the
	daughter of Zibeon, Esau's wife: and she bare to Esau Jeush, and
	Jaalam, and Korah.

	^15These were dukes of the sons of Esau: the sons of Eliphaz the
	firstborn son of Esau; duke Teman, duke Omar, duke Zepho, duke Kenaz,

	^16Duke Korah, duke Gatam, and duke Amalek: these are the dukes that
	came of Eliphaz in the land of Edom; these were the sons of Adah.

	^17And these are the sons of Reuel Esau's son; duke Nahath, duke Zerah,
	duke Shammah, duke Mizzah: these are the dukes that came of Reuel in
	the land of Edom; these are the sons of Bashemath Esau's wife.

	^18And these are the sons of Aholibamah Esau's wife; duke Jeush, duke
	Jaalam, duke Korah: these were the dukes that came of Aholibamah the
	daughter of Anah, Esau's wife.

	^19These are the sons of Esau, who is Edom, and these are their dukes.

	^20These are the sons of Seir the Horite, who inhabited the land;
	Lotan, and Shobal, and Zibeon, and Anah,

	^21And Dishon, and Ezer, and Dishan: these are the dukes of the
	Horites, the children of Seir in the land of Edom.

	^22And the children of Lotan were Hori and Hemam; and Lotan's sister
	was Timna.

	^23And the children of Shobal were these; Alvan, and Manahath, and
	Ebal, Shepho, and Onam.

	^24And these are the children of Zibeon; both Ajah, and Anah: this was
	that Anah that found the mules in the wilderness, as he fed the asses
	of Zibeon his father.

	^25And the children of Anah were these; Dishon, and Aholibamah the
	daughter of Anah.

	^26And these are the children of Dishon; Hemdan, and Eshban, and
	Ithran, and Cheran.

	^27The children of Ezer are these; Bilhan, and Zaavan, and Akan.

	^28The children of Dishan are these; Uz, and Aran.

	^29These are the dukes that came of the Horites; duke Lotan, duke
	Shobal, duke Zibeon, duke Anah,

	^30Duke Dishon, duke Ezer, duke Dishan: these are the dukes that came
	of Hori, among their dukes in the land of Seir.

	^31And these are the kings that reigned in the land of Edom, before
	there reigned any king over the children of Israel.

	^32And Bela the son of Beor reigned in Edom: and the name of his city
	was Dinhabah.

	^33And Bela died, and Jobab the son of Zerah of Bozrah reigned in his
	stead.

	^34And Jobab died, and Husham of the land of Temani reigned in his
	stead.

	^35And Husham died, and Hadad the son of Bedad, who smote Midian in the
	field of Moab, reigned in his stead: and the name of his city was
	Avith.

	^36And Hadad died, and Samlah of Masrekah reigned in his stead.

	^37And Samlah died, and Saul of Rehoboth by the river reigned in his
	stead.

	^38And Saul died, and Baalhanan the son of Achbor reigned in his stead.

	^39And Baalhanan the son of Achbor died, and Hadar reigned in his
	stead: and the name of his city was Pau; and his wife's name was
	Mehetabel, the daughter of Matred, the daughter of Mezahab.

	^40And these are the names of the dukes that came of Esau, according to
	their families, after their places, by their names; duke Timnah, duke
	Alvah, duke Jetheth,

	^41Duke Aholibamah, duke Elah, duke Pinon,

	^42Duke Kenaz, duke Teman, duke Mibzar,

	^43Duke Magdiel, duke Iram: these be the dukes of Edom, according to
	their habitations in the land of their possession: he is Esau the
	father of the Edomites.
	__________________________________________________________________

	Chapter 37

	And Jacob dwelt in the land wherein his father was a stranger, in the
	land of Canaan.

	^2These are the generations of Jacob. Joseph, being seventeen years
	old, was feeding the flock with his brethren; and the lad was with the
	sons of Bilhah, and with the sons of Zilpah, his father's wives: and
	Joseph brought unto his father their evil report.

	^3Now Israel loved Joseph more than all his children, because he was
	the son of his old age: and he made him a coat of many colours.

	^4And when his brethren saw that their father loved him more than all
	his brethren, they hated him, and could not speak peaceably unto him.

	^5And Joseph dreamed a dream, and he told it his brethren: and they
	hated him yet the more.

	^6And he said unto them, Hear, I pray you, this dream which I have
	dreamed:

	^7For, behold, we were binding sheaves in the field, and, lo, my sheaf
	arose, and also stood upright; and, behold, your sheaves stood round
	about, and made obeisance to my sheaf.

	^8And his brethren said to him, Shalt thou indeed reign over us? or
	shalt thou indeed have dominion over us? And they hated him yet the
	more for his dreams, and for his words.

	^9And he dreamed yet another dream, and told it his brethren, and said,
	Behold, I have dreamed a dream more; and, behold, the sun and the moon
	and the eleven stars made obeisance to me.

	^10And he told it to his father, and to his brethren: and his father
	rebuked him, and said unto him, What is this dream that thou hast
	dreamed? Shall I and thy mother and thy brethren indeed come to bow
	down ourselves to thee to the earth?

	^11And his brethren envied him; but his father observed the saying.

	^12And his brethren went to feed their father's flock in Shechem.

	^13And Israel said unto Joseph, Do not thy brethren feed the flock in
	Shechem? come, and I will send thee unto them. And he said to him, Here
	am I.

	^14And he said to him, Go, I pray thee, see whether it be well with thy
	brethren, and well with the flocks; and bring me word again. So he sent
	him out of the vale of Hebron, and he came to Shechem.

	^15And a certain man found him, and, behold, he was wandering in the
	field: and the man asked him, saying, What seekest thou?

	^16And he said, I seek my brethren: tell me, I pray thee, where they
	feed their flocks.

	^17And the man said, They are departed hence; for I heard them say, Let
	us go to Dothan. And Joseph went after his brethren, and found them in
	Dothan.

	^18And when they saw him afar off, even before he came near unto them,
	they conspired against him to slay him.

	^19And they said one to another, Behold, this dreamer cometh.

	^20Come now therefore, and let us slay him, and cast him into some pit,
	and we will say, Some evil beast hath devoured him: and we shall see
	what will become of his dreams.

	^21And Reuben heard it, and he delivered him out of their hands; and
	said, Let us not kill him.

	^22And Reuben said unto them, Shed no blood, but cast him into this pit
	that is in the wilderness, and lay no hand upon him; that he might rid
	him out of their hands, to deliver him to his father again.

	^23And it came to pass, when Joseph was come unto his brethren, that
	they stript Joseph out of his coat, his coat of many colours that was
	on him;

	^24And they took him, and cast him into a pit: and the pit was empty,
	there was no water in it.

	^25And they sat down to eat bread: and they lifted up their eyes and
	looked, and, behold, a company of Ishmeelites came from Gilead with
	their camels bearing spicery and balm and myrrh, going to carry it down
	to Egypt.

	^26And Judah said unto his brethren, What profit is it if we slay our
	brother, and conceal his blood?

	^27Come, and let us sell him to the Ishmeelites, and let not our hand
	be upon him; for he is our brother and our flesh. And his brethren were
	content.

	^28Then there passed by Midianites merchantmen; and they drew and
	lifted up Joseph out of the pit, and sold Joseph to the Ishmeelites for
	twenty pieces of silver: and they brought Joseph into Egypt.

	^29And Reuben returned unto the pit; and, behold, Joseph was not in the
	pit; and he rent his clothes.

	^30And he returned unto his brethren, and said, The child is not; and
	I, whither shall I go?

	^31And they took Joseph's coat, and killed a kid of the goats, and
	dipped the coat in the blood;

	^32And they sent the coat of many colours, and they brought it to their
	father; and said, This have we found: know now whether it be thy son's
	coat or no.

	^33And he knew it, and said, It is my son's coat; an evil beast hath
	devoured him; Joseph is without doubt rent in pieces.

	^34And Jacob rent his clothes, and put sackcloth upon his loins, and
	mourned for his son many days.

	^35And all his sons and all his daughters rose up to comfort him; but
	he refused to be comforted; and he said, For I will go down into the
	grave unto my son mourning. Thus his father wept for him.

	^36And the Midianites sold him into Egypt unto Potiphar, an officer of
	Pharaoh's, and captain of the guard.
	__________________________________________________________________

	Chapter 38

	And it came to pass at that time, that Judah went down from his
	brethren, and turned in to a certain Adullamite, whose name was Hirah.

	^2And Judah saw there a daughter of a certain Canaanite, whose name was
	Shuah; and he took her, and went in unto her.

	^3And she conceived, and bare a son; and he called his name Er.

	^4And she conceived again, and bare a son; and she called his name
	Onan.

	^5And she yet again conceived, and bare a son; and called his name
	Shelah: and he was at Chezib, when she bare him.

	^6And Judah took a wife for Er his firstborn, whose name was Tamar.

	^7And Er, Judah's firstborn, was wicked in the sight of the Lord; and
	the Lord slew him.

	^8And Judah said unto Onan, Go in unto thy brother's wife, and marry
	her, and raise up seed to thy brother.

	^9And Onan knew that the seed should not be his; and it came to pass,
	when he went in unto his brother's wife, that he spilled it on the
	ground, lest that he should give seed to his brother.

	^10And the thing which he did displeased the Lord: wherefore he slew
	him also.

	^11Then said Judah to Tamar his daughter in law, Remain a widow at thy
	father's house, till Shelah my son be grown: for he said, Lest
	peradventure he die also, as his brethren did. And Tamar went and dwelt
	in her father's house.

	^12And in process of time the daughter of Shuah Judah's wife died; and
	Judah was comforted, and went up unto his sheepshearers to Timnath, he
	and his friend Hirah the Adullamite.

	^13And it was told Tamar, saying, Behold thy father in law goeth up to
	Timnath to shear his sheep.

	^14And she put her widow's garments off from her, and covered her with
	a vail, and wrapped herself, and sat in an open place, which is by the
	way to Timnath; for she saw that Shelah was grown, and she was not
	given unto him to wife.

	^15When Judah saw her, he thought her to be an harlot; because she had
	covered her face.

	^16And he turned unto her by the way, and said, Go to, I pray thee, let
	me come in unto thee; (for he knew not that she was his daughter in
			law.) And she said, What wilt thou give me, that thou mayest come in
	unto me?

	^17And he said, I will send thee a kid from the flock. And she said,
	Wilt thou give me a pledge, till thou send it?

	^18And he said, What pledge shall I give thee? And she said, Thy
	signet, and thy bracelets, and thy staff that is in thine hand. And he
	gave it her, and came in unto her, and she conceived by him.

	^19And she arose, and went away, and laid by her vail from her, and put
	on the garments of her widowhood.

	^20And Judah sent the kid by the hand of his friend the Adullamite, to
	receive his pledge from the woman's hand: but he found her not.

	^21Then he asked the men of that place, saying, Where is the harlot,
	that was openly by the way side? And they said, There was no harlot in
	this place.

	^22And he returned to Judah, and said, I cannot find her; and also the
	men of the place said, that there was no harlot in this place.

	^23And Judah said, Let her take it to her, lest we be shamed: behold, I
	sent this kid, and thou hast not found her.

	^24And it came to pass about three months after, that it was told
	Judah, saying, Tamar thy daughter in law hath played the harlot; and
	also, behold, she is with child by whoredom. And Judah said, Bring her
	forth, and let her be burnt.

	^25When she was brought forth, she sent to her father in law, saying,
	By the man, whose these are, am I with child: and she said, Discern, I
	pray thee, whose are these, the signet, and bracelets, and staff.

	^26And Judah acknowledged them, and said, She hath been more righteous
	than I; because that I gave her not to Shelah my son. And he knew her
	again no more.

	^27And it came to pass in the time of her travail, that, behold, twins
	were in her womb.

	^28And it came to pass, when she travailed, that the one put out his
	hand: and the midwife took and bound upon his hand a scarlet thread,
	saying, This came out first.

	^29And it came to pass, as he drew back his hand, that, behold, his
	brother came out: and she said, How hast thou broken forth? this breach
	be upon thee: therefore his name was called Pharez.

	^30And afterward came out his brother, that had the scarlet thread upon
	his hand: and his name was called Zarah.
	__________________________________________________________________

	Chapter 39

	And Joseph was brought down to Egypt; and Potiphar, an officer of
	Pharaoh, captain of the guard, an Egyptian, bought him of the hands of
	the Ishmeelites, which had brought him down thither.

	^2And the Lord was with Joseph, and he was a prosperous man; and he was
	in the house of his master the Egyptian.

	^3And his master saw that the Lord was with him, and that the Lord made
	all that he did to prosper in his hand.

	^4And Joseph found grace in his sight, and he served him: and he made
	him overseer over his house, and all that he had he put into his hand.

	^5And it came to pass from the time that he had made him overseer in
	his house, and over all that he had, that the Lord blessed the
	Egyptian's house for Joseph's sake; and the blessing of the Lord was
	upon all that he had in the house, and in the field.

	^6And he left all that he had in Joseph's hand; and he knew not ought
	he had, save the bread which he did eat. And Joseph was a goodly
	person, and well favoured.

	^7And it came to pass after these things, that his master's wife cast
	her eyes upon Joseph; and she said, Lie with me.

	^8But he refused, and said unto his master's wife, Behold, my master
	wotteth not what is with me in the house, and he hath committed all
	that he hath to my hand;

	^9There is none greater in this house than I; neither hath he kept back
	any thing from me but thee, because thou art his wife: how then can I
	do this great wickedness, and sin against God?

	^10And it came to pass, as she spake to Joseph day by day, that he
	hearkened not unto her, to lie by her, or to be with her.

	^11And it came to pass about this time, that Joseph went into the house
	to do his business; and there was none of the men of the house there
	within.

	^12And she caught him by his garment, saying, Lie with me: and he left
	his garment in her hand, and fled, and got him out.

	^13And it came to pass, when she saw that he had left his garment in
	her hand, and was fled forth,

	^14That she called unto the men of her house, and spake unto them,
	saying, See, he hath brought in an Hebrew unto us to mock us; he came
	in unto me to lie with me, and I cried with a loud voice:

	^15And it came to pass, when he heard that I lifted up my voice and
	cried, that he left his garment with me, and fled, and got him out.

	^16And she laid up his garment by her, until his lord came home.

	^17And she spake unto him according to these words, saying, The Hebrew
	servant, which thou hast brought unto us, came in unto me to mock me:

	^18And it came to pass, as I lifted up my voice and cried, that he left
	his garment with me, and fled out.

	^19And it came to pass, when his master heard the words of his wife,
	which she spake unto him, saying, After this manner did thy servant to
	me; that his wrath was kindled.

	^20And Joseph's master took him, and put him into the prison, a place
	where the king's prisoners were bound: and he was there in the prison.

	^21But the Lord was with Joseph, and shewed him mercy, and gave him
	favour in the sight of the keeper of the prison.

	^22And the keeper of the prison committed to Joseph's hand all the
	prisoners that were in the prison; and whatsoever they did there, he
	was the doer of it.

	^23The keeper of the prison looked not to any thing that was under his
	hand; because the Lord was with him, and that which he did, the Lord
	made it to prosper.
	__________________________________________________________________

	Chapter 40

	And it came to pass after these things, that the butler of the king of
	Egypt and his baker had offended their lord the king of Egypt.

	^2And Pharaoh was wroth against two of his officers, against the chief
	of the butlers, and against the chief of the bakers.

	^3And he put them in ward in the house of the captain of the guard,
	into the prison, the place where Joseph was bound.

	^4And the captain of the guard charged Joseph with them, and he served
	them: and they continued a season in ward.

	^5And they dreamed a dream both of them, each man his dream in one
	night, each man according to the interpretation of his dream, the
	butler and the baker of the king of Egypt, which were bound in the
	prison.

	^6And Joseph came in unto them in the morning, and looked upon them,
	and, behold, they were sad.

	^7And he asked Pharaoh's officers that were with him in the ward of his
	lord's house, saying, Wherefore look ye so sadly to day?

	^8And they said unto him, We have dreamed a dream, and there is no
	interpreter of it. And Joseph said unto them, Do not interpretations
	belong to God? tell me them, I pray you.

	^9And the chief butler told his dream to Joseph, and said to him, In my
	dream, behold, a vine was before me;

	^10And in the vine were three branches: and it was as though it budded,
	and her blossoms shot forth; and the clusters thereof brought forth
	ripe grapes:

	^11And Pharaoh's cup was in my hand: and I took the grapes, and pressed
	them into Pharaoh's cup, and I gave the cup into Pharaoh's hand.

	^12And Joseph said unto him, This is the interpretation of it: The
	three branches are three days:

	^13Yet within three days shall Pharaoh lift up thine head, and restore
	thee unto thy place: and thou shalt deliver Pharaoh's cup into his
	hand, after the former manner when thou wast his butler.

	^14But think on me when it shall be well with thee, and shew kindness,
	I pray thee, unto me, and make mention of me unto Pharaoh, and bring me
	out of this house:

	^15For indeed I was stolen away out of the land of the Hebrews: and
	here also have I done nothing that they should put me into the dungeon.

	^16When the chief baker saw that the interpretation was good, he said
	unto Joseph, I also was in my dream, and, behold, I had three white
	baskets on my head:

	^17And in the uppermost basket there was of all manner of bakemeats for
	Pharaoh; and the birds did eat them out of the basket upon my head.

	^18And Joseph answered and said, This is the interpretation thereof:
	The three baskets are three days:

	^19Yet within three days shall Pharaoh lift up thy head from off thee,
	and shall hang thee on a tree; and the birds shall eat thy flesh from
	off thee.

	^20And it came to pass the third day, which was Pharaoh's birthday,
	that he made a feast unto all his servants: and he lifted up the head
	of the chief butler and of the chief baker among his servants.

	^21And he restored the chief butler unto his butlership again; and he
	gave the cup into Pharaoh's hand:

	^22But he hanged the chief baker: as Joseph had interpreted to them.

	^23Yet did not the chief butler remember Joseph, but forgat him.
	__________________________________________________________________

	Chapter 41

	And it came to pass at the end of two full years, that Pharaoh dreamed:
	and, behold, he stood by the river.

	^2And, behold, there came up out of the river seven well favoured kine
	and fatfleshed; and they fed in a meadow.

	^3And, behold, seven other kine came up after them out of the river,
	ill favoured and leanfleshed; and stood by the other kine upon the
	brink of the river.

	^4And the ill favoured and leanfleshed kine did eat up the seven well
	favoured and fat kine. So Pharaoh awoke.

	^5And he slept and dreamed the second time: and, behold, seven ears of
	corn came up upon one stalk, rank and good.

	^6And, behold, seven thin ears and blasted with the east wind sprung up
	after them.

	^7And the seven thin ears devoured the seven rank and full ears. And
	Pharaoh awoke, and, behold, it was a dream.

	^8And it came to pass in the morning that his spirit was troubled; and
	he sent and called for all the magicians of Egypt, and all the wise men
	thereof: and Pharaoh told them his dream; but there was none that could
	interpret them unto Pharaoh.

	^9Then spake the chief butler unto Pharaoh, saying, I do remember my
	faults this day:

	^10Pharaoh was wroth with his servants, and put me in ward in the
	captain of the guard's house, both me and the chief baker:

	^11And we dreamed a dream in one night, I and he; we dreamed each man
	according to the interpretation of his dream.

	^12And there was there with us a young man, an Hebrew, servant to the
	captain of the guard; and we told him, and he interpreted to us our
	dreams; to each man according to his dream he did interpret.

	^13And it came to pass, as he interpreted to us, so it was; me he
	restored unto mine office, and him he hanged.

	^14Then Pharaoh sent and called Joseph, and they brought him hastily
	out of the dungeon: and he shaved himself, and changed his raiment, and
	came in unto Pharaoh.

	^15And Pharaoh said unto Joseph, I have dreamed a dream, and there is
	none that can interpret it: and I have heard say of thee, that thou
	canst understand a dream to interpret it.

	^16And Joseph answered Pharaoh, saying, It is not in me: God shall give
	Pharaoh an answer of peace.

	^17And Pharaoh said unto Joseph, In my dream, behold, I stood upon the
	bank of the river:

	^18And, behold, there came up out of the river seven kine, fatfleshed
	and well favoured; and they fed in a meadow:

	^19And, behold, seven other kine came up after them, poor and very ill
	favoured and leanfleshed, such as I never saw in all the land of Egypt
	for badness:

	^20And the lean and the ill favoured kine did eat up the first seven
	fat kine:

	^21And when they had eaten them up, it could not be known that they had
	eaten them; but they were still ill favoured, as at the beginning. So I
	awoke.

	^22And I saw in my dream, and, behold, seven ears came up in one stalk,
	full and good:

	^23And, behold, seven ears, withered, thin, and blasted with the east
	wind, sprung up after them:

	^24And the thin ears devoured the seven good ears: and I told this unto
	the magicians; but there was none that could declare it to me.

	^25And Joseph said unto Pharaoh, The dream of Pharaoh is one: God hath
	shewed Pharaoh what he is about to do.

	^26The seven good kine are seven years; and the seven good ears are
	seven years: the dream is one.

	^27And the seven thin and ill favoured kine that came up after them are
	seven years; and the seven empty ears blasted with the east wind shall
	be seven years of famine.

	^28This is the thing which I have spoken unto Pharaoh: What God is
	about to do he sheweth unto Pharaoh.

	^29Behold, there come seven years of great plenty throughout all the
	land of Egypt:

	^30And there shall arise after them seven years of famine; and all the
	plenty shall be forgotten in the land of Egypt; and the famine shall
	consume the land;

	^31And the plenty shall not be known in the land by reason of that
	famine following; for it shall be very grievous.

	^32And for that the dream was doubled unto Pharaoh twice; it is because
	the thing is established by God, and God will shortly bring it to pass.

	^33Now therefore let Pharaoh look out a man discreet and wise, and set
	him over the land of Egypt.

	^34Let Pharaoh do this, and let him appoint officers over the land, and
	take up the fifth part of the land of Egypt in the seven plenteous
	years.

	^35And let them gather all the food of those good years that come, and
	lay up corn under the hand of Pharaoh, and let them keep food in the
	cities.

	^36And that food shall be for store to the land against the seven years
	of famine, which shall be in the land of Egypt; that the land perish
	not through the famine.

	^37And the thing was good in the eyes of Pharaoh, and in the eyes of
	all his servants.

	^38And Pharaoh said unto his servants, Can we find such a one as this
	is, a man in whom the Spirit of God is?

	^39And Pharaoh said unto Joseph, Forasmuch as God hath shewed thee all
	this, there is none so discreet and wise as thou art:

	^40Thou shalt be over my house, and according unto thy word shall all
	my people be ruled: only in the throne will I be greater than thou.

	^41And Pharaoh said unto Joseph, See, I have set thee over all the land
	of Egypt.

	^42And Pharaoh took off his ring from his hand, and put it upon
	Joseph's hand, and arrayed him in vestures of fine linen, and put a
	gold chain about his neck;

	^43And he made him to ride in the second chariot which he had; and they
	cried before him, Bow the knee: and he made him ruler over all the land
	of Egypt.

	^44And Pharaoh said unto Joseph, I am Pharaoh, and without thee shall
	no man lift up his hand or foot in all the land of Egypt.

	^45And Pharaoh called Joseph's name Zaphnathpaaneah; and he gave him to
	wife Asenath the daughter of Poti- pherah priest of On. And Joseph went
	out over all the land of Egypt.

	^46And Joseph was thirty years old when he stood before Pharaoh king of
	Egypt. And Joseph went out from the presence of Pharaoh, and went
	throughout all the land of Egypt.

	^47And in the seven plenteous years the earth brought forth by
	handfuls.

	^48And he gathered up all the food of the seven years, which were in
	the land of Egypt, and laid up the food in the cities: the food of the
	field, which was round about every city, laid he up in the same.

	^49And Joseph gathered corn as the sand of the sea, very much, until he
	left numbering; for it was without number.

	^50And unto Joseph were born two sons before the years of famine came,
	which Asenath the daughter of Poti- pherah priest of On bare unto him.

	^51And Joseph called the name of the firstborn Manasseh: For God, said
	he, hath made me forget all my toil, and all my father's house.

	^52And the name of the second called he Ephraim: For God hath caused me
	to be fruitful in the land of my affliction.

	^53And the seven years of plenteousness, that was in the land of Egypt,
	were ended.

	^54And the seven years of dearth began to come, according as Joseph had
	said: and the dearth was in all lands; but in all the land of Egypt
	there was bread.

	^55And when all the land of Egypt was famished, the people cried to
	Pharaoh for bread: and Pharaoh said unto all the Egyptians, Go unto
	Joseph; what he saith to you, do.

	^56And the famine was over all the face of the earth: And Joseph opened
	all the storehouses, and sold unto the Egyptians; and the famine waxed
	sore in the land of Egypt.

	^57And all countries came into Egypt to Joseph for to buy corn; because
	that the famine was so sore in all lands.
	__________________________________________________________________

	Chapter 42

	Now when Jacob saw that there was corn in Egypt, Jacob said unto his
	sons, Why do ye look one upon another?

	^2And he said, Behold, I have heard that there is corn in Egypt: get
	you down thither, and buy for us from thence; that we may live, and not
	die.

	^3And Joseph's ten brethren went down to buy corn in Egypt.

	^4But Benjamin, Joseph's brother, Jacob sent not with his brethren; for
	he said, Lest peradventure mischief befall him.

	^5And the sons of Israel came to buy corn among those that came: for
	the famine was in the land of Canaan.

	^6And Joseph was the governor over the land, and he it was that sold to
	all the people of the land: and Joseph's brethren came, and bowed down
	themselves before him with their faces to the earth.

	^7And Joseph saw his brethren, and he knew them, but made himself
	strange unto them, and spake roughly unto them; and he said unto them,
	Whence come ye? And they said, From the land of Canaan to buy food.

	^8And Joseph knew his brethren, but they knew not him.

	^9And Joseph remembered the dreams which he dreamed of them, and said
	unto them, Ye are spies; to see the nakedness of the land ye are come.

	^10And they said unto him, Nay, my lord, but to buy food are thy
	servants come.

	^11We are all one man's sons; we are true men, thy servants are no
	spies.

	^12And he said unto them, Nay, but to see the nakedness of the land ye
	are come.

	^13And they said, Thy servants are twelve brethren, the sons of one man
	in the land of Canaan; and, behold, the youngest is this day with our
	father, and one is not.

	^14And Joseph said unto them, That is it that I spake unto you, saying,
	Ye are spies:

	^15Hereby ye shall be proved: By the life of Pharaoh ye shall not go
	forth hence, except your youngest brother come hither.

	^16Send one of you, and let him fetch your brother, and ye shall be
	kept in prison, that your words may be proved, whether there be any
	truth in you: or else by the life of Pharaoh surely ye are spies.

	^17And he put them all together into ward three days.

	^18And Joseph said unto them the third day, This do, and live; for I
	fear God:

	^19If ye be true men, let one of your brethren be bound in the house of
	your prison: go ye, carry corn for the famine of your houses:

	^20But bring your youngest brother unto me; so shall your words be
	verified, and ye shall not die. And they did so.

	^21And they said one to another, We are verily guilty concerning our
	brother, in that we saw the anguish of his soul, when he besought us,
	and we would not hear; therefore is this distress come upon us.

	^22And Reuben answered them, saying, Spake I not unto you, saying, Do
	not sin against the child; and ye would not hear? therefore, behold,
	also his blood is required.

	^23And they knew not that Joseph understood them; for he spake unto
	them by an interpreter.

	^24And he turned himself about from them, and wept; and returned to
	them again, and communed with them, and took from them Simeon, and
	bound him before their eyes.

	^25Then Joseph commanded to fill their sacks with corn, and to restore
	every man's money into his sack, and to give them provision for the
	way: and thus did he unto them.

	^26And they laded their asses with the corn, and departed thence.

	^27And as one of them opened his sack to give his ass provender in the
	inn, he espied his money; for, behold, it was in his sack's mouth.

	^28And he said unto his brethren, My money is restored; and, lo, it is
	even in my sack: and their heart failed them, and they were afraid,
	saying one to another, What is this that God hath done unto us?

	^29And they came unto Jacob their father unto the land of Canaan, and
	told him all that befell unto them; saying,

	^30The man, who is the lord of the land, spake roughly to us, and took
	us for spies of the country.

	^31And we said unto him, We are true men; we are no spies:

	^32We be twelve brethren, sons of our father; one is not, and the
	youngest is this day with our father in the land of Canaan.

	^33And the man, the lord of the country, said unto us, Hereby shall I
	know that ye are true men; leave one of your brethren here with me, and
	take food for the famine of your households, and be gone:

	^34And bring your youngest brother unto me: then shall I know that ye
	are no spies, but that ye are true men: so will I deliver you your
	brother, and ye shall traffick in the land.

	^35And it came to pass as they emptied their sacks, that, behold, every
	man's bundle of money was in his sack: and when both they and their
	father saw the bundles of money, they were afraid.

	^36And Jacob their father said unto them, Me have ye bereaved of my
	children: Joseph is not, and Simeon is not, and ye will take Benjamin
	away: all these things are against me.

	^37And Reuben spake unto his father, saying, Slay my two sons, if I
	bring him not to thee: deliver him into my hand, and I will bring him
	to thee again.

	^38And he said, My son shall not go down with you; for his brother is
	dead, and he is left alone: if mischief befall him by the way in the
	which ye go, then shall ye bring down my gray hairs with sorrow to the
	grave.
	__________________________________________________________________

	Chapter 43

	And the famine was sore in the land.

	^2And it came to pass, when they had eaten up the corn which they had
	brought out of Egypt, their father said unto them, Go again, buy us a
	little food.

	^3And Judah spake unto him, saying, The man did solemnly protest unto
	us, saying, Ye shall not see my face, except your brother be with you.

	^4If thou wilt send our brother with us, we will go down and buy thee
	food:

	^5But if thou wilt not send him, we will not go down: for the man said
	unto us, Ye shall not see my face, except your brother be with you.

	^6And Israel said, Wherefore dealt ye so ill with me, as to tell the
	man whether ye had yet a brother?

	^7And they said, The man asked us straitly of our state, and of our
	kindred, saying, Is your father yet alive? have ye another brother? and
	we told him according to the tenor of these words: could we certainly
	know that he would say, Bring your brother down?

	^8And Judah said unto Israel his father, Send the lad with me, and we
	will arise and go; that we may live, and not die, both we, and thou,
	and also our little ones.

	^9I will be surety for him; of my hand shalt thou require him: if I
	bring him not unto thee, and set him before thee, then let me bear the
	blame for ever:

	^10For except we had lingered, surely now we had returned this second
	time.

	^11And their father Israel said unto them, If it must be so now, do
	this; take of the best fruits in the land in your vessels, and carry
	down the man a present, a little balm, and a little honey, spices, and
	myrrh, nuts, and almonds:

	^12And take double money in your hand; and the money that was brought
	again in the mouth of your sacks, carry it again in your hand;
	peradventure it was an oversight:

	^13Take also your brother, and arise, go again unto the man:

	^14And God Almighty give you mercy before the man, that he may send
	away your other brother, and Benjamin. If I be bereaved of my children,
	I am bereaved.

	^15And the men took that present, and they took double money in their
	hand, and Benjamin; and rose up, and went down to Egypt, and stood
	before Joseph.

	^16And when Joseph saw Benjamin with them, he said to the ruler of his
	house, Bring these men home, and slay, and make ready; for these men
	shall dine with me at noon.

	^17And the man did as Joseph bade; and the man brought the men into
	Joseph's house.

	^18And the men were afraid, because they were brought into Joseph's
	house; and they said, Because of the money that was returned in our
	sacks at the first time are we brought in; that he may seek occasion
	against us, and fall upon us, and take us for bondmen, and our asses.

	^19And they came near to the steward of Joseph's house, and they
	communed with him at the door of the house,

	^20And said, O sir, we came indeed down at the first time to buy food:

	^21And it came to pass, when we came to the inn, that we opened our
	sacks, and, behold, every man's money was in the mouth of his sack, our
	money in full weight: and we have brought it again in our hand.

	^22And other money have we brought down in our hands to buy food: we
	cannot tell who put our money in our sacks.

	^23And he said, Peace be to you, fear not: your God, and the God of
	your father, hath given you treasure in your sacks: I had your money.
	And he brought Simeon out unto them.

	^24And the man brought the men into Joseph's house, and gave them
	water, and they washed their feet; and he gave their asses provender.

	^25And they made ready the present against Joseph came at noon: for
	they heard that they should eat bread there.

	^26And when Joseph came home, they brought him the present which was in
	their hand into the house, and bowed themselves to him to the earth.

	^27And he asked them of their welfare, and said, Is your father well,
	the old man of whom ye spake? Is he yet alive?

	^28And they answered, Thy servant our father is in good health, he is
	yet alive. And they bowed down their heads, and made obeisance.

	^29And he lifted up his eyes, and saw his brother Benjamin, his
	mother's son, and said, Is this your younger brother, of whom ye spake
	unto me? And he said, God be gracious unto thee, my son.

	^30And Joseph made haste; for his bowels did yearn upon his brother:
	and he sought where to weep; and he entered into his chamber, and wept
	there.

	^31And he washed his face, and went out, and refrained himself, and
	said, Set on bread.

	^32And they set on for him by himself, and for them by themselves, and
	for the Egyptians, which did eat with him, by themselves: because the
	Egyptians might not eat bread with the Hebrews; for that is an
	abomination unto the Egyptians.

	^33And they sat before him, the firstborn according to his birthright,
	and the youngest according to his youth: and the men marvelled one at
	another.

	^34And he took and sent messes unto them from before him: but
	Benjamin's mess was five times so much as any of theirs. And they
	drank, and were merry with him.
	__________________________________________________________________

	Chapter 44

	And he commanded the steward of his house, saying, Fill the men's sacks
	with food, as much as they can carry, and put every man's money in his
	sack's mouth.

	^2And put my cup, the silver cup, in the sack's mouth of the youngest,
	and his corn money. And he did according to the word that Joseph had
	spoken.

	^3As soon as the morning was light, the men were sent away, they and
	their asses.

	^4And when they were gone out of the city, and not yet far off, Joseph
	said unto his steward, Up, follow after the men; and when thou dost
	overtake them, say unto them, Wherefore have ye rewarded evil for good?

	^5Is not this it in which my lord drinketh, and whereby indeed he
	divineth? ye have done evil in so doing.

	^6And he overtook them, and he spake unto them these same words.

	^7And they said unto him, Wherefore saith my lord these words? God
	forbid that thy servants should do according to this thing:

	^8Behold, the money, which we found in our sacks' mouths, we brought
	again unto thee out of the land of Canaan: how then should we steal out
	of thy lord's house silver or gold?

	^9With whomsoever of thy servants it be found, both let him die, and we
	also will be my lord's bondmen.

	^10And he said, Now also let it be according unto your words: he with
	whom it is found shall be my servant; and ye shall be blameless.

	^11Then they speedily took down every man his sack to the ground, and
	opened every man his sack.

	^12And he searched, and began at the eldest, and left at the youngest:
	and the cup was found in Benjamin's sack.

	^13Then they rent their clothes, and laded every man his ass, and
	returned to the city.

	^14And Judah and his brethren came to Joseph's house; for he was yet
	there: and they fell before him on the ground.

	^15And Joseph said unto them, What deed is this that ye have done? wot
	ye not that such a man as I can certainly divine?

	^16And Judah said, What shall we say unto my lord? what shall we speak?
	or how shall we clear ourselves? God hath found out the iniquity of thy
	servants: behold, we are my lord's servants, both we, and he also with
	whom the cup is found.

	^17And he said, God forbid that I should do so: but the man in whose
	hand the cup is found, he shall be my servant; and as for you, get you
	up in peace unto your father.

	^18Then Judah came near unto him, and said, Oh my lord, let thy
	servant, I pray thee, speak a word in my lord's ears, and let not thine
	anger burn against thy servant: for thou art even as Pharaoh.

	^19My lord asked his servants, saying, Have ye a father, or a brother?

	^20And we said unto my lord, We have a father, an old man, and a child
	of his old age, a little one; and his brother is dead, and he alone is
	left of his mother, and his father loveth him.

	^21And thou saidst unto thy servants, Bring him down unto me, that I
	may set mine eyes upon him.

	^22And we said unto my lord, The lad cannot leave his father: for if he
	should leave his father, his father would die.

	^23And thou saidst unto thy servants, Except your youngest brother come
	down with you, ye shall see my face no more.

	^24And it came to pass when we came up unto thy servant my father, we
	told him the words of my lord.

	^25And our father said, Go again, and buy us a little food.

	^26And we said, We cannot go down: if our youngest brother be with us,
	then will we go down: for we may not see the man's face, except our
	youngest brother be with us.

	^27And thy servant my father said unto us, Ye know that my wife bare me
	two sons:

	^28And the one went out from me, and I said, Surely he is torn in
	pieces; and I saw him not since:

	^29And if ye take this also from me, and mischief befall him, ye shall
	bring down my gray hairs with sorrow to the grave.

	^30Now therefore when I come to thy servant my father, and the lad be
	not with us; seeing that his life is bound up in the lad's life;

	^31It shall come to pass, when he seeth that the lad is not with us,
	that he will die: and thy servants shall bring down the gray hairs of
	thy servant our father with sorrow to the grave.

	^32For thy servant became surety for the lad unto my father, saying, If
	I bring him not unto thee, then I shall bear the blame to my father for
	ever.

	^33Now therefore, I pray thee, let thy servant abide instead of the lad
	a bondman to my lord; and let the lad go up with his brethren.

	^34For how shall I go up to my father, and the lad be not with me? lest
	peradventure I see the evil that shall come on my father.
	__________________________________________________________________

	Chapter 45

	Then Joseph could not refrain himself before all them that stood by
	him; and he cried, Cause every man to go out from me. And there stood
	no man with him, while Joseph made himself known unto his brethren.

	^2And he wept aloud: and the Egyptians and the house of Pharaoh heard.

	^3And Joseph said unto his brethren, I am Joseph; doth my father yet
	live? And his brethren could not answer him; for they were troubled at
	his presence.

	^4And Joseph said unto his brethren, Come near to me, I pray you. And
	they came near. And he said, I am Joseph your brother, whom ye sold
	into Egypt.

	^5Now therefore be not grieved, nor angry with yourselves, that ye sold
	me hither: for God did send me before you to preserve life.

	^6For these two years hath the famine been in the land: and yet there
	are five years, in the which there shall neither be earing nor harvest.

	^7And God sent me before you to preserve you a posterity in the earth,
	and to save your lives by a great deliverance.

	^8So now it was not you that sent me hither, but God: and he hath made
	me a father to Pharaoh, and lord of all his house, and a ruler
	throughout all the land of Egypt.

	^9Haste ye, and go up to my father, and say unto him, Thus saith thy
	son Joseph, God hath made me lord of all Egypt: come down unto me,
	tarry not:

	^10And thou shalt dwell in the land of Goshen, and thou shalt be near
	unto me, thou, and thy children, and thy children's children, and thy
	flocks, and thy herds, and all that thou hast:

	^11And there will I nourish thee; for yet there are five years of
	famine; lest thou, and thy household, and all that thou hast, come to
	poverty.

	^12And, behold, your eyes see, and the eyes of my brother Benjamin,
	that it is my mouth that speaketh unto you.

	^13And ye shall tell my father of all my glory in Egypt, and of all
	that ye have seen; and ye shall haste and bring down my father hither.

	^14And he fell upon his brother Benjamin's neck, and wept; and Benjamin
	wept upon his neck.

	^15Moreover he kissed all his brethren, and wept upon them: and after
	that his brethren talked with him.

	^16And the fame thereof was heard in Pharaoh's house, saying, Joseph's
	brethren are come: and it pleased Pharaoh well, and his servants.

	^17And Pharaoh said unto Joseph, Say unto thy brethren, This do ye;
	lade your beasts, and go, get you unto the land of Canaan;

	^18And take your father and your households, and come unto me: and I
	will give you the good of the land of Egypt, and ye shall eat the fat
	of the land.

	^19Now thou art commanded, this do ye; take you wagons out of the land
	of Egypt for your little ones, and for your wives, and bring your
	father, and come.

	^20Also regard not your stuff; for the good of all the land of Egypt is
	yours.

	^21And the children of Israel did so: and Joseph gave them wagons,
	according to the commandment of Pharaoh, and gave them provision for
	the way.

	^22To all of them he gave each man changes of raiment; but to Benjamin
	he gave three hundred pieces of silver, and five changes of raiment.

	^23And to his father he sent after this manner; ten asses laden with
	the good things of Egypt, and ten she asses laden with corn and bread
	and meat for his father by the way.

	^24So he sent his brethren away, and they departed: and he said unto
	them, See that ye fall not out by the way.

	^25And they went up out of Egypt, and came into the land of Canaan unto
	Jacob their father,

	^26And told him, saying, Joseph is yet alive, and he is governor over
	all the land of Egypt. And Jacob's heart fainted, for he believed them
	not.

	^27And they told him all the words of Joseph, which he had said unto
	them: and when he saw the wagons which Joseph had sent to carry him,
	the spirit of Jacob their father revived:

	^28And Israel said, It is enough; Joseph my son is yet alive: I will go
	and see him before I die.
	__________________________________________________________________

	Chapter 46

	And Israel took his journey with all that he had, and came to
	Beersheba, and offered sacrifices unto the God of his father Isaac.

	^2And God spake unto Israel in the visions of the night, and said,
	Jacob, Jacob. And he said, Here am I.

	^3And he said, I am God, the God of thy father: fear not to go down
	into Egypt; for I will there make of thee a great nation:

	^4I will go down with thee into Egypt; and I will also surely bring
	thee up again: and Joseph shall put his hand upon thine eyes.

	^5And Jacob rose up from Beersheba: and the sons of Israel carried
	Jacob their father, and their little ones, and their wives, in the
	wagons which Pharaoh had sent to carry him.

	^6And they took their cattle, and their goods, which they had gotten in
	the land of Canaan, and came into Egypt, Jacob, and all his seed with
	him:

	^7His sons, and his sons' sons with him, his daughters, and his sons'
	daughters, and all his seed brought he with him into Egypt.

	^8And these are the names of the children of Israel, which came into
	Egypt, Jacob and his sons: Reuben, Jacob's firstborn.

	^9And the sons of Reuben; Hanoch, and Phallu, and Hezron, and Carmi.

	^10And the sons of Simeon; Jemuel, and Jamin, and Ohad, and Jachin, and
	Zohar, and Shaul the son of a Canaanitish woman.

	^11And the sons of Levi; Gershon, Kohath, and Merari.

	^12And the sons of Judah; Er, and Onan, and Shelah, and Pharez, and
	Zarah: but Er and Onan died in the land of Canaan. And the sons of
	Pharez were Hezron and Hamul.

	^13And the sons of Issachar; Tola, and Phuvah, and Job, and Shimron.

	^14And the sons of Zebulun; Sered, and Elon, and Jahleel.

	^15These be the sons of Leah, which she bare unto Jacob in Padanaram,
	with his daughter Dinah: all the souls of his sons and his daughters
	were thirty and three.

	^16And the sons of Gad; Ziphion, and Haggi, Shuni, and Ezbon, Eri, and
	Arodi, and Areli.

	^17And the sons of Asher; Jimnah, and Ishuah, and Isui, and Beriah, and
	Serah their sister: and the sons of Beriah; Heber, and Malchiel.

	^18These are the sons of Zilpah, whom Laban gave to Leah his daughter,
	and these she bare unto Jacob, even sixteen souls.

	^19The sons of Rachel Jacob's wife; Joseph, and Benjamin.

	^20And unto Joseph in the land of Egypt were born Manasseh and Ephraim,
	which Asenath the daughter of Potipherah priest of On bare unto him.

	^21And the sons of Benjamin were Belah, and Becher, and Ashbel, Gera,
	and Naaman, Ehi, and Rosh, Muppim, and Huppim, and Ard.

	^22These are the sons of Rachel, which were born to Jacob: all the
	souls were fourteen.

	^23And the sons of Dan; Hushim.

	^24And the sons of Naphtali; Jahzeel, and Guni, and Jezer, and Shillem.

	^25These are the sons of Bilhah, which Laban gave unto Rachel his
	daughter, and she bare these unto Jacob: all the souls were seven.

	^26All the souls that came with Jacob into Egypt, which came out of his
	loins, besides Jacob's sons' wives, all the souls were threescore and
	six;

	^27And the sons of Joseph, which were born him in Egypt, were two
	souls: all the souls of the house of Jacob, which came into Egypt, were
	threescore and ten.

	^28And he sent Judah before him unto Joseph, to direct his face unto
	Goshen; and they came into the land of Goshen.

	^29And Joseph made ready his chariot, and went up to meet Israel his
	father, to Goshen, and presented himself unto him; and he fell on his
	neck, and wept on his neck a good while.

	^30And Israel said unto Joseph, Now let me die, since I have seen thy
	face, because thou art yet alive.

	^31And Joseph said unto his brethren, and unto his father's house, I
	will go up, and shew Pharaoh, and say unto him, My brethren, and my
	father's house, which were in the land of Canaan, are come unto me;

	^32And the men are shepherds, for their trade hath been to feed cattle;
	and they have brought their flocks, and their herds, and all that they
	have.

	^33And it shall come to pass, when Pharaoh shall call you, and shall
	say, What is your occupation?

	^34That ye shall say, Thy servants' trade hath been about cattle from
	our youth even until now, both we, and also our fathers: that ye may
	dwell in the land of Goshen; for every shepherd is an abomination unto
	the Egyptians.
	__________________________________________________________________

	Chapter 47

	Then Joseph came and told Pharaoh, and said, My father and my brethren,
	and their flocks, and their herds, and all that they have, are come out
	of the land of Canaan; and, behold, they are in the land of Goshen.

	^2And he took some of his brethren, even five men, and presented them
	unto Pharaoh.

	^3And Pharaoh said unto his brethren, What is your occupation? And they
	said unto Pharaoh, Thy servants are shepherds, both we, and also our
	fathers.

	^4They said moreover unto Pharaoh, For to sojourn in the land are we
	come; for thy servants have no pasture for their flocks; for the famine
	is sore in the land of Canaan: now therefore, we pray thee, let thy
	servants dwell in the land of Goshen.

	^5And Pharaoh spake unto Joseph, saying, Thy father and thy brethren
	are come unto thee:

	^6The land of Egypt is before thee; in the best of the land make thy
	father and brethren to dwell; in the land of Goshen let them dwell: and
	if thou knowest any men of activity among them, then make them rulers
	over my cattle.

	^7And Joseph brought in Jacob his father, and set him before Pharaoh:
	and Jacob blessed Pharaoh.

	^8And Pharaoh said unto Jacob, How old art thou?

	^9And Jacob said unto Pharaoh, The days of the years of my pilgrimage
	are an hundred and thirty years: few and evil have the days of the
	years of my life been, and have not attained unto the days of the years
	of the life of my fathers in the days of their pilgrimage.

	^10And Jacob blessed Pharaoh, and went out from before Pharaoh.

	^11And Joseph placed his father and his brethren, and gave them a
	possession in the land of Egypt, in the best of the land, in the land
	of Rameses, as Pharaoh had commanded.

	^12And Joseph nourished his father, and his brethren, and all his
	father's household, with bread, according to their families.

	^13And there was no bread in all the land; for the famine was very
	sore, so that the land of Egypt and all the land of Canaan fainted by
	reason of the famine.

	^14And Joseph gathered up all the money that was found in the land of
	Egypt, and in the land of Canaan, for the corn which they bought: and
	Joseph brought the money into Pharaoh's house.

	^15And when money failed in the land of Egypt, and in the land of
	Canaan, all the Egyptians came unto Joseph, and said, Give us bread:
	for why should we die in thy presence? for the money faileth.

	^16And Joseph said, Give your cattle; and I will give you for your
	cattle, if money fail.

	^17And they brought their cattle unto Joseph: and Joseph gave them
	bread in exchange for horses, and for the flocks, and for the cattle of
	the herds, and for the asses: and he fed them with bread for all their
	cattle for that year.

	^18When that year was ended, they came unto him the second year, and
	said unto him, We will not hide it from my lord, how that our money is
	spent; my lord also hath our herds of cattle; there is not ought left
	in the sight of my lord, but our bodies, and our lands:

	^19Wherefore shall we die before thine eyes, both we and our land? buy
	us and our land for bread, and we and our land will be servants unto
	Pharaoh: and give us seed, that we may live, and not die, that the land
	be not desolate.

	^20And Joseph bought all the land of Egypt for Pharaoh; for the
	Egyptians sold every man his field, because the famine prevailed over
	them: so the land became Pharaoh's.

	^21And as for the people, he removed them to cities from one end of the
	borders of Egypt even to the other end thereof.

	^22Only the land of the priests bought he not; for the priests had a
	portion assigned them of Pharaoh, and did eat their portion which
	Pharaoh gave them: wherefore they sold not their lands.

	^23Then Joseph said unto the people, Behold, I have bought you this day
	and your land for Pharaoh: lo, here is seed for you, and ye shall sow
	the land.

	^24And it shall come to pass in the increase, that ye shall give the
	fifth part unto Pharaoh, and four parts shall be your own, for seed of
	the field, and for your food, and for them of your households, and for
	food for your little ones.

	^25And they said, Thou hast saved our lives: let us find grace in the
	sight of my lord, and we will be Pharaoh's servants.

	^26And Joseph made it a law over the land of Egypt unto this day, that
	Pharaoh should have the fifth part; except the land of the priests
	only, which became not Pharaoh's.

	^27And Israel dwelt in the land of Egypt, in the country of Goshen; and
	they had possessions therein, and grew, and multiplied exceedingly.

	^28And Jacob lived in the land of Egypt seventeen years: so the whole
	age of Jacob was an hundred forty and seven years.

	^29And the time drew nigh that Israel must die: and he called his son
	Joseph, and said unto him, If now I have found grace in thy sight, put,
	I pray thee, thy hand under my thigh, and deal kindly and truly with
	me; bury me not, I pray thee, in Egypt:

	^30But I will lie with my fathers, and thou shalt carry me out of
	Egypt, and bury me in their buryingplace. And he said, I will do as
	thou hast said.

	^31And he said, Swear unto me. And he sware unto him. And Israel bowed
	himself upon the bed's head.
	__________________________________________________________________

	Chapter 48

	And it came to pass after these things, that one told Joseph, Behold,
	thy father is sick: and he took with him his two sons, Manasseh and
	Ephraim.

	^2And one told Jacob, and said, Behold, thy son Joseph cometh unto
	thee: and Israel strengthened himself, and sat upon the bed.

	^3And Jacob said unto Joseph, God Almighty appeared unto me at Luz in
	the land of Canaan, and blessed me,

	^4And said unto me, Behold, I will make thee fruitful, and multiply
	thee, and I will make of thee a multitude of people; and will give this
	land to thy seed after thee for an everlasting possession.

	^5And now thy two sons, Ephraim and Manasseh, which were born unto thee
	in the land of Egypt before I came unto thee into Egypt, are mine; as
	Reuben and Simeon, they shall be mine.

	^6And thy issue, which thou begettest after them, shall be thine, and
	shall be called after the name of their brethren in their inheritance.

	^7And as for me, when I came from Padan, Rachel died by me in the land
	of Canaan in the way, when yet there was but a little way to come unto
	Ephrath: and I buried her there in the way of Ephrath; the same is
	Bethlehem.

	^8And Israel beheld Joseph's sons, and said, Who are these?

	^9And Joseph said unto his father, They are my sons, whom God hath
	given me in this place. And he said, Bring them, I pray thee, unto me,
	and I will bless them.

	^10Now the eyes of Israel were dim for age, so that he could not see.
	And he brought them near unto him; and he kissed them, and embraced
	them.

	^11And Israel said unto Joseph, I had not thought to see thy face: and,
	lo, God hath shewed me also thy seed.

	^12And Joseph brought them out from between his knees, and he bowed
	himself with his face to the earth.

	^13And Joseph took them both, Ephraim in his right hand toward Israel's
	left hand, and Manasseh in his left hand toward Israel's right hand,
	and brought them near unto him.

	^14And Israel stretched out his right hand, and laid it upon Ephraim's
	head, who was the younger, and his left hand upon Manasseh's head,
	guiding his hands wittingly; for Manasseh was the firstborn.

	^15And he blessed Joseph, and said, God, before whom my fathers Abraham
	and Isaac did walk, the God which fed me all my life long unto this
	day,

	^16The Angel which redeemed me from all evil, bless the lads; and let
	my name be named on them, and the name of my fathers Abraham and Isaac;
	and let them grow into a multitude in the midst of the earth.

	^17And when Joseph saw that his father laid his right hand upon the
	head of Ephraim, it displeased him: and he held up his father's hand,
	to remove it from Ephraim's head unto Manasseh's head.

	^18And Joseph said unto his father, Not so, my father: for this is the
	firstborn; put thy right hand upon his head.

	^19And his father refused, and said, I know it, my son, I know it: he
	also shall become a people, and he also shall be great: but truly his
	younger brother shall be greater than he, and his seed shall become a
	multitude of nations.

	^20And he blessed them that day, saying, In thee shall Israel bless,
	saying, God make thee as Ephraim and as Manasseh: and he set Ephraim
	before Manasseh.

	^21And Israel said unto Joseph, Behold, I die: but God shall be with
	you, and bring you again unto the land of your fathers.

	^22Moreover I have given to thee one portion above thy brethren, which
	I took out of the hand of the Amorite with my sword and with my bow.
	__________________________________________________________________

	Chapter 49

	And Jacob called unto his sons, and said, Gather yourselves together,
	that I may tell you that which shall befall you in the last days.

	^2Gather yourselves together, and hear, ye sons of Jacob; and hearken
	unto Israel your father.

	^3Reuben, thou art my firstborn, my might, and the beginning of my
	strength, the excellency of dignity, and the excellency of power:

	^4Unstable as water, thou shalt not excel; because thou wentest up to
	thy father's bed; then defiledst thou it: he went up to my couch.

	^5Simeon and Levi are brethren; instruments of cruelty are in their
	habitations.

	^6O my soul, come not thou into their secret; unto their assembly, mine
	honour, be not thou united: for in their anger they slew a man, and in
	their selfwill they digged down a wall.

	^7Cursed be their anger, for it was fierce; and their wrath, for it was
	cruel: I will divide them in Jacob, and scatter them in Israel.

	^8Judah, thou art he whom thy brethren shall praise: thy hand shall be
	in the neck of thine enemies; thy father's children shall bow down
	before thee.

	^9Judah is a lion's whelp: from the prey, my son, thou art gone up: he
	stooped down, he couched as a lion, and as an old lion; who shall rouse
	him up?

	^10The sceptre shall not depart from Judah, nor a lawgiver from between
	his feet, until Shiloh come; and unto him shall the gathering of the
	people be.

	^11Binding his foal unto the vine, and his ass's colt unto the choice
	vine; he washed his garments in wine, and his clothes in the blood of
	grapes:

	^12His eyes shall be red with wine, and his teeth white with milk.

	^13Zebulun shall dwell at the haven of the sea; and he shall be for an
	haven of ships; and his border shall be unto Zidon.

	^14Issachar is a strong ass couching down between two burdens:

	^15And he saw that rest was good, and the land that it was pleasant;
	and bowed his shoulder to bear, and became a servant unto tribute.

	^16Dan shall judge his people, as one of the tribes of Israel.

	^17Dan shall be a serpent by the way, an adder in the path, that biteth
	the horse heels, so that his rider shall fall backward.

	^18I have waited for thy salvation, O Lord.

	^19Gad, a troop shall overcome him: but he shall overcome at the last.

	^20Out of Asher his bread shall be fat, and he shall yield royal
	dainties.

	^21Naphtali is a hind let loose: he giveth goodly words.

	^22Joseph is a fruitful bough, even a fruitful bough by a well; whose
	branches run over the wall:

	^23The archers have sorely grieved him, and shot at him, and hated him:

	^24But his bow abode in strength, and the arms of his hands were made
	strong by the hands of the mighty God of Jacob; (from thence is the
			shepherd, the stone of Israel:)

	^25Even by the God of thy father, who shall help thee; and by the
	Almighty, who shall bless thee with blessings of heaven above,
	blessings of the deep that lieth under, blessings of the breasts, and
	of the womb:

	^26The blessings of thy father have prevailed above the blessings of my
	progenitors unto the utmost bound of the everlasting hills: they shall
	be on the head of Joseph, and on the crown of the head of him that was
	separate from his brethren.

	^27Benjamin shall ravin as a wolf: in the morning he shall devour the
	prey, and at night he shall divide the spoil.

	^28All these are the twelve tribes of Israel: and this is it that their
	father spake unto them, and blessed them; every one according to his
	blessing he blessed them.

	^29And he charged them, and said unto them, I am to be gathered unto my
	people: bury me with my fathers in the cave that is in the field of
	Ephron the Hittite,

	^30In the cave that is in the field of Machpelah, which is before
	Mamre, in the land of Canaan, which Abraham bought with the field of
	Ephron the Hittite for a possession of a buryingplace.

	^31There they buried Abraham and Sarah his wife; there they buried
	Isaac and Rebekah his wife; and there I buried Leah.

	^32The purchase of the field and of the cave that is therein was from
	the children of Heth.

	^33And when Jacob had made an end of commanding his sons, he gathered
	up his feet into the bed, and yielded up the ghost, and was gathered
	unto his people.
	__________________________________________________________________

	Chapter 50

	And Joseph fell upon his father's face, and wept upon him, and kissed
	him.

	^2And Joseph commanded his servants the physicians to embalm his
	father: and the physicians embalmed Israel.

	^3And forty days were fulfilled for him; for so are fulfilled the days
	of those which are embalmed: and the Egyptians mourned for him
	threescore and ten days.

	^4And when the days of his mourning were past, Joseph spake unto the
	house of Pharaoh, saying, If now I have found grace in your eyes,
	speak, I pray you, in the ears of Pharaoh, saying,

	^5My father made me swear, saying, Lo, I die: in my grave which I have
	digged for me in the land of Canaan, there shalt thou bury me. Now
	therefore let me go up, I pray thee, and bury my father, and I will
	come again.

	^6And Pharaoh said, Go up, and bury thy father, according as he made
	thee swear.

	^7And Joseph went up to bury his father: and with him went up all the
	servants of Pharaoh, the elders of his house, and all the elders of the
	land of Egypt,

	^8And all the house of Joseph, and his brethren, and his father's
	house: only their little ones, and their flocks, and their herds, they
	left in the land of Goshen.

	^9And there went up with him both chariots and horsemen: and it was a
	very great company.

	^10And they came to the threshingfloor of Atad, which is beyond Jordan,
	and there they mourned with a great and very sore lamentation: and he
	made a mourning for his father seven days.

	^11And when the inhabitants of the land, the Canaanites, saw the
	mourning in the floor of Atad, they said, This is a grievous mourning
	to the Egyptians: wherefore the name of it was called Abelmizraim,
	which is beyond Jordan.

	^12And his sons did unto him according as he commanded them:

	^13For his sons carried him into the land of Canaan, and buried him in
	the cave of the field of Machpelah, which Abraham bought with the field
	for a possession of a buryingplace of Ephron the Hittite, before Mamre.

	^14And Joseph returned into Egypt, he, and his brethren, and all that
	went up with him to bury his father, after he had buried his father.

	^15And when Joseph's brethren saw that their father was dead, they
	said, Joseph will peradventure hate us, and will certainly requite us
	all the evil which we did unto him.

	^16And they sent a messenger unto Joseph, saying, Thy father did
	command before he died, saying,

	^17So shall ye say unto Joseph, Forgive, I pray thee now, the trespass
	of thy brethren, and their sin; for they did unto thee evil: and now,
	we pray thee, forgive the trespass of the servants of the God of thy
	father. And Joseph wept when they spake unto him.

	^18And his brethren also went and fell down before his face; and they
	said, Behold, we be thy servants.

	^19And Joseph said unto them, Fear not: for am I in the place of God?

	^20But as for you, ye thought evil against me; but God meant it unto
	good, to bring to pass, as it is this day, to save much people alive.

	^21Now therefore fear ye not: I will nourish you, and your little ones.
	And he comforted them, and spake kindly unto them.

	^22And Joseph dwelt in Egypt, he, and his father's house: and Joseph
	lived an hundred and ten years.

	^23And Joseph saw Ephraim's children of the third generation: the
	children also of Machir the son of Manasseh were brought up upon
	Joseph's knees.

	^24And Joseph said unto his brethren, I die: and God will surely visit
	you, and bring you out of this land unto the land which he sware to
	Abraham, to Isaac, and to Jacob.

	^25And Joseph took an oath of the children of Israel, saying, God will
	surely visit you, and ye shall carry up my bones from hence.

	^26So Joseph died, being an hundred and ten years old: and they
	embalmed him, and he was put in a coffin in Egypt.
	__________________________________________________________________

	The Second Book of Moses, Called

	Exodus
	__________________________________________________________________

	Chapter 1

	Now these are the names of the children of Israel, which came into
	Egypt; every man and his household came with Jacob.

	^2Reuben, Simeon, Levi, and Judah,

	^3Issachar, Zebulun, and Benjamin,

	^4Dan, and Naphtali, Gad, and Asher.

	^5And all the souls that came out of the loins of Jacob were seventy
	souls: for Joseph was in Egypt already.

	^6And Joseph died, and all his brethren, and all that generation.

	^7And the children of Israel were fruitful, and increased abundantly,
	and multiplied, and waxed exceeding mighty; and the land was filled
	with them.

	^8Now there arose up a new king over Egypt, which knew not Joseph.

	^9And he said unto his people, Behold, the people of the children of
	Israel are more and mightier than we:

	^10Come on, let us deal wisely with them; lest they multiply, and it
	come to pass, that, when there falleth out any war, they join also unto
	our enemies, and fight against us, and so get them up out of the land.

	^11Therefore they did set over them taskmasters to afflict them with
	their burdens. And they built for Pharaoh treasure cities, Pithom and
	Raamses.

	^12But the more they afflicted them, the more they multiplied and grew.
	And they were grieved because of the children of Israel.

	^13And the Egyptians made the children of Israel to serve with rigour:

	^14And they made their lives bitter with hard bondage, in morter, and
	in brick, and in all manner of service in the field: all their service,
	wherein they made them serve, was with rigour.

	^15And the king of Egypt spake to the Hebrew midwives, of which the
	name of the one was Shiphrah, and the name of the other Puah:

	^16And he said, When ye do the office of a midwife to the Hebrew women,
	and see them upon the stools; if it be a son, then ye shall kill him:
	but if it be a daughter, then she shall live.

	^17But the midwives feared God, and did not as the king of Egypt
	commanded them, but saved the men children alive.

	^18And the king of Egypt called for the midwives, and said unto them,
	Why have ye done this thing, and have saved the men children alive?

	^19And the midwives said unto Pharaoh, Because the Hebrew women are not
	as the Egyptian women; for they are lively, and are delivered ere the
	midwives come in unto them.

	^20Therefore God dealt well with the midwives: and the people
	multiplied, and waxed very mighty.

	^21And it came to pass, because the midwives feared God, that he made
	them houses.

	^22And Pharaoh charged all his people, saying, Every son that is born
	ye shall cast into the river, and every daughter ye shall save alive.
	__________________________________________________________________

	Chapter 2

	And there went a man of the house of Levi, and took to wife a daughter
	of Levi.

	^2And the woman conceived, and bare a son: and when she saw him that he
	was a goodly child, she hid him three months.

	^3And when she could not longer hide him, she took for him an ark of
	bulrushes, and daubed it with slime and with pitch, and put the child
	therein; and she laid it in the flags by the river's brink.

	^4And his sister stood afar off, to wit what would be done to him.

	^5And the daughter of Pharaoh came down to wash herself at the river;
	and her maidens walked along by the river's side; and when she saw the
	ark among the flags, she sent her maid to fetch it.

	^6And when she had opened it, she saw the child: and, behold, the babe
	wept. And she had compassion on him, and said, This is one of the
	Hebrews' children.

	^7Then said his sister to Pharaoh's daughter, Shall I go and call to
	thee a nurse of the Hebrew women, that she may nurse the child for
	thee?

	^8And Pharaoh's daughter said to her, Go. And the maid went and called
	the child's mother.

	^9And Pharaoh's daughter said unto her, Take this child away, and nurse
	it for me, and I will give thee thy wages. And the woman took the
	child, and nursed it.

	^10And the child grew, and she brought him unto Pharaoh's daughter, and
	he became her son. And she called his name Moses: and she said, Because
	I drew him out of the water.

	^11And it came to pass in those days, when Moses was grown, that he
	went out unto his brethren, and looked on their burdens: and he spied
	an Egyptian smiting an Hebrew, one of his brethren.

	^12And he looked this way and that way, and when he saw that there was
	no man, he slew the Egyptian, and hid him in the sand.

	^13And when he went out the second day, behold, two men of the Hebrews
	strove together: and he said to him that did the wrong, Wherefore
	smitest thou thy fellow?

	^14And he said, Who made thee a prince and a judge over us? intendest
	thou to kill me, as thou killedst the Egyptian? And Moses feared, and
	said, Surely this thing is known.

	^15Now when Pharaoh heard this thing, he sought to slay Moses. But
	Moses fled from the face of Pharaoh, and dwelt in the land of Midian:
	and he sat down by a well.

	^16Now the priest of Midian had seven daughters: and they came and drew
	water, and filled the troughs to water their father's flock.

	^17And the shepherds came and drove them away: but Moses stood up and
	helped them, and watered their flock.

	^18And when they came to Reuel their father, he said, How is it that ye
	are come so soon to day?

	^19And they said, An Egyptian delivered us out of the hand of the
	shepherds, and also drew water enough for us, and watered the flock.

	^20And he said unto his daughters, And where is he? why is it that ye
	have left the man? call him, that he may eat bread.

	^21And Moses was content to dwell with the man: and he gave Moses
	Zipporah his daughter.

	^22And she bare him a son, and he called his name Gershom: for he said,
	I have been a stranger in a strange land.

	^23And it came to pass in process of time, that the king of Egypt died:
	and the children of Israel sighed by reason of the bondage, and they
	cried, and their cry came up unto God by reason of the bondage.

	^24And God heard their groaning, and God remembered his covenant with
	Abraham, with Isaac, and with Jacob.

	^25And God looked upon the children of Israel, and God had respect unto
	them.
	__________________________________________________________________

	Chapter 3

	Now Moses kept the flock of Jethro his father in law, the priest of
	Midian: and he led the flock to the backside of the desert, and came to
	the mountain of God, even to Horeb.

	^2And the angel of the Lord appeared unto him in a flame of fire out of
	the midst of a bush: and he looked, and, behold, the bush burned with
	fire, and the bush was not consumed.

	^3And Moses said, I will now turn aside, and see this great sight, why
	the bush is not burnt.

	^4And when the Lord saw that he turned aside to see, God called unto
	him out of the midst of the bush, and said, Moses, Moses. And he said,
	Here am I.

	^5And he said, Draw not nigh hither: put off thy shoes from off thy
	feet, for the place whereon thou standest is holy ground.

	^6Moreover he said, I am the God of thy father, the God of Abraham, the
	God of Isaac, and the God of Jacob. And Moses hid his face; for he was
	afraid to look upon God.

	^7And the Lord said, I have surely seen the affliction of my people
	which are in Egypt, and have heard their cry by reason of their
	taskmasters; for I know their sorrows;

	^8And I am come down to deliver them out of the hand of the Egyptians,
	and to bring them up out of that land unto a good land and a large,
	unto a land flowing with milk and honey; unto the place of the
	Canaanites, and the Hittites, and the Amorites, and the Perizzites, and
	the Hivites, and the Jebusites.

	^9Now therefore, behold, the cry of the children of Israel is come unto
	me: and I have also seen the oppression wherewith the Egyptians oppress
	them.

	^10Come now therefore, and I will send thee unto Pharaoh, that thou
	mayest bring forth my people the children of Israel out of Egypt.

	^11And Moses said unto God, Who am I, that I should go unto Pharaoh,
	and that I should bring forth the children of Israel out of Egypt?

	^12And he said, Certainly I will be with thee; and this shall be a
	token unto thee, that I have sent thee: When thou hast brought forth
	the people out of Egypt, ye shall serve God upon this mountain.

	^13And Moses said unto God, Behold, when I come unto the children of
	Israel, and shall say unto them, The God of your fathers hath sent me
	unto you; and they shall say to me, What is his name? what shall I say
	unto them?

	^14And God said unto Moses, I AM THAT I AM: and he said, Thus shalt
	thou say unto the children of Israel, I AM hath sent me unto you.

	^15And God said moreover unto Moses, Thus shalt thou say unto the
	children of Israel, The Lord God of your fathers, the God of Abraham,
	the God of Isaac, and the God of Jacob, hath sent me unto you: this is
	my name for ever, and this is my memorial unto all generations.

	^16Go, and gather the elders of Israel together, and say unto them, The
	Lord God of your fathers, the God of Abraham, of Isaac, and of Jacob,
	appeared unto me, saying, I have surely visited you, and seen that
	which is done to you in Egypt:

	^17And I have said, I will bring you up out of the affliction of Egypt
	unto the land of the Canaanites, and the Hittites, and the Amorites,
	and the Perizzites, and the Hivites, and the Jebusites, unto a land
	flowing with milk and honey.

	^18And they shall hearken to thy voice: and thou shalt come, thou and
	the elders of Israel, unto the king of Egypt, and ye shall say unto
	him, The Lord God of the Hebrews hath met with us: and now let us go,
	we beseech thee, three days' journey into the wilderness, that we may
	sacrifice to the Lord our God.

	^19And I am sure that the king of Egypt will not let you go, no, not by
	a mighty hand.

	^20And I will stretch out my hand, and smite Egypt with all my wonders
	which I will do in the midst thereof: and after that he will let you
	go.

	^21And I will give this people favour in the sight of the Egyptians:
	and it shall come to pass, that, when ye go, ye shall not go empty:

	^22But every woman shall borrow of her neighbour, and of her that
	sojourneth in her house, jewels of silver, and jewels of gold, and
	raiment: and ye shall put them upon your sons, and upon your daughters;
	and ye shall spoil the Egyptians.
	__________________________________________________________________

	Chapter 4

	And Moses answered and said, But, behold, they will not believe me, nor
	hearken unto my voice: for they will say, The Lord hath not appeared
	unto thee.

	^2And the Lord said unto him, What is that in thine hand? And he said,
	A rod.

	^3And he said, Cast it on the ground. And he cast it on the ground, and
	it became a serpent; and Moses fled from before it.

	^4And the Lord said unto Moses, Put forth thine hand, and take it by
	the tail. And he put forth his hand, and caught it, and it became a rod
	in his hand:

	^5That they may believe that the Lord God of their fathers, the God of
	Abraham, the God of Isaac, and the God of Jacob, hath appeared unto
	thee.

	^6And the Lord said furthermore unto him, Put now thine hand into thy
	bosom. And he put his hand into his bosom: and when he took it out,
	behold, his hand was leprous as snow.

	^7And he said, Put thine hand into thy bosom again. And he put his hand
	into his bosom again; and plucked it out of his bosom, and, behold, it
	was turned again as his other flesh.

	^8And it shall come to pass, if they will not believe thee, neither
	hearken to the voice of the first sign, that they will believe the
	voice of the latter sign.

	^9And it shall come to pass, if they will not believe also these two
	signs, neither hearken unto thy voice, that thou shalt take of the
	water of the river, and pour it upon the dry land: and the water which
	thou takest out of the river shall become blood upon the dry land.

	^10And Moses said unto the Lord, O my Lord, I am not eloquent, neither
	heretofore, nor since thou hast spoken unto thy servant: but I am slow
	of speech, and of a slow tongue.

	^11And the Lord said unto him, Who hath made man's mouth? or who maketh
	the dumb, or deaf, or the seeing, or the blind? have not I the Lord?

	^12Now therefore go, and I will be with thy mouth, and teach thee what
	thou shalt say.

	^13And he said, O my Lord, send, I pray thee, by the hand of him whom
	thou wilt send.

	^14And the anger of the Lord was kindled against Moses, and he said, Is
	not Aaron the Levite thy brother? I know that he can speak well. And
	also, behold, he cometh forth to meet thee: and when he seeth thee, he
	will be glad in his heart.

	^15And thou shalt speak unto him, and put words in his mouth: and I
	will be with thy mouth, and with his mouth, and will teach you what ye
	shall do.

	^16And he shall be thy spokesman unto the people: and he shall be, even
	he shall be to thee instead of a mouth, and thou shalt be to him
	instead of God.

	^17And thou shalt take this rod in thine hand, wherewith thou shalt do
	signs.

	^18And Moses went and returned to Jethro his father in law, and said
	unto him, Let me go, I pray thee, and return unto my brethren which are
	in Egypt, and see whether they be yet alive. And Jethro said to Moses,
	Go in peace.

	^19And the Lord said unto Moses in Midian, Go, return into Egypt: for
	all the men are dead which sought thy life.

	^20And Moses took his wife and his sons, and set them upon an ass, and
	he returned to the land of Egypt: and Moses took the rod of God in his
	hand.

	^21And the Lord said unto Moses, When thou goest to return into Egypt,
	see that thou do all those wonders before Pharaoh, which I have put in
	thine hand: but I will harden his heart, that he shall not let the
	people go.

	^22And thou shalt say unto Pharaoh, Thus saith the Lord, Israel is my
	son, even my firstborn:

	^23And I say unto thee, Let my son go, that he may serve me: and if
	thou refuse to let him go, behold, I will slay thy son, even thy
	firstborn.

	^24And it came to pass by the way in the inn, that the Lord met him,
	and sought to kill him.

	^25Then Zipporah took a sharp stone, and cut off the foreskin of her
	son, and cast it at his feet, and said, Surely a bloody husband art
	thou to me.

	^26So he let him go: then she said, A bloody husband thou art, because
	of the circumcision.

	^27And the Lord said to Aaron, Go into the wilderness to meet Moses.
	And he went, and met him in the mount of God, and kissed him.

	^28And Moses told Aaron all the words of the Lord who had sent him, and
	all the signs which he had commanded him.

	^29And Moses and Aaron went and gathered together all the elders of the
	children of Israel:

	^30And Aaron spake all the words which the Lord had spoken unto Moses,
	and did the signs in the sight of the people.

	^31And the people believed: and when they heard that the Lord had
	visited the children of Israel, and that he had looked upon their
	affliction, then they bowed their heads and worshipped.
	__________________________________________________________________

	Chapter 5

	And afterward Moses and Aaron went in, and told Pharaoh, Thus saith the
	Lord God of Israel, Let my people go, that they may hold a feast unto
	me in the wilderness.

	^2And Pharaoh said, Who is the Lord, that I should obey his voice to
	let Israel go? I know not the Lord, neither will I let Israel go.

	^3And they said, The God of the Hebrews hath met with us: let us go, we
	pray thee, three days' journey into the desert, and sacrifice unto the
	Lord our God; lest he fall upon us with pestilence, or with the sword.

	^4And the king of Egypt said unto them, Wherefore do ye, Moses and
	Aaron, let the people from their works? get you unto your burdens.

	^5And Pharaoh said, Behold, the people of the land now are many, and ye
	make them rest from their burdens.

	^6And Pharaoh commanded the same day the taskmasters of the people, and
	their officers, saying,

	^7Ye shall no more give the people straw to make brick, as heretofore:
	let them go and gather straw for themselves.

	^8And the tale of the bricks, which they did make heretofore, ye shall
	lay upon them; ye shall not diminish ought thereof: for they be idle;
	therefore they cry, saying, Let us go and sacrifice to our God.

	^9Let there more work be laid upon the men, that they may labour
	therein; and let them not regard vain words.

	^10And the taskmasters of the people went out, and their officers, and
	they spake to the people, saying, Thus saith Pharaoh, I will not give
	you straw.

	^11Go ye, get you straw where ye can find it: yet not ought of your
	work shall be diminished.

	^12So the people were scattered abroad throughout all the land of Egypt
	to gather stubble instead of straw.

	^13And the taskmasters hasted them, saying, Fulfil your works, your
	daily tasks, as when there was straw.

	^14And the officers of the children of Israel, which Pharaoh's
	taskmasters had set over them, were beaten, and demanded, Wherefore
	have ye not fulfilled your task in making brick both yesterday and to
	day, as heretofore?

	^15Then the officers of the children of Israel came and cried unto
	Pharaoh, saying, Wherefore dealest thou thus with thy servants?

	^16There is no straw given unto thy servants, and they say to us, Make
	brick: and, behold, thy servants are beaten; but the fault is in thine
	own people.

	^17But he said, Ye are idle, ye are idle: therefore ye say, Let us go
	and do sacrifice to the Lord.

	^18Go therefore now, and work; for there shall no straw be given you,
	yet shall ye deliver the tale of bricks.

	^19And the officers of the children of Israel did see that they were in
	evil case, after it was said, Ye shall not minish ought from your
	bricks of your daily task.

	^20And they met Moses and Aaron, who stood in the way, as they came
	forth from Pharaoh:

	^21And they said unto them, The Lord look upon you, and judge; because
	ye have made our savour to be abhorred in the eyes of Pharaoh, and in
	the eyes of his servants, to put a sword in their hand to slay us.

	^22And Moses returned unto the Lord, and said, Lord, wherefore hast
	thou so evil entreated this people? why is it that thou hast sent me?

	^23For since I came to Pharaoh to speak in thy name, he hath done evil
	to this people; neither hast thou delivered thy people at all.
	__________________________________________________________________

	Chapter 6

	Then the Lord said unto Moses, Now shalt thou see what I will do to
	Pharaoh: for with a strong hand shall he let them go, and with a strong
	hand shall he drive them out of his land.

	^2And God spake unto Moses, and said unto him, I am the Lord:

	^3And I appeared unto Abraham, unto Isaac, and unto Jacob, by the name
	of God Almighty, but by my name JEHOVAH was I not known to them.

	^4And I have also established my covenant with them, to give them the
	land of Canaan, the land of their pilgrimage, wherein they were
	strangers.

	^5And I have also heard the groaning of the children of Israel, whom
	the Egyptians keep in bondage; and I have remembered my covenant.

	^6Wherefore say unto the children of Israel, I am the Lord, and I will
	bring you out from under the burdens of the Egyptians, and I will rid
	you out of their bondage, and I will redeem you with a stretched out
	arm, and with great judgments:

	^7And I will take you to me for a people, and I will be to you a God:
	and ye shall know that I am the Lord your God, which bringeth you out
	from under the burdens of the Egyptians.

	^8And I will bring you in unto the land, concerning the which I did
	swear to give it to Abraham, to Isaac, and to Jacob; and I will give it
	you for an heritage: I am the Lord.

	^9And Moses spake so unto the children of Israel: but they hearkened
	not unto Moses for anguish of spirit, and for cruel bondage.

	^10And the Lord spake unto Moses, saying,

	^11Go in, speak unto Pharaoh king of Egypt, that he let the children of
	Israel go out of his land.

	^12And Moses spake before the Lord, saying, Behold, the children of
	Israel have not hearkened unto me; how then shall Pharaoh hear me, who
	am of uncircumcised lips?

	^13And the Lord spake unto Moses and unto Aaron, and gave them a charge
	unto the children of Israel, and unto Pharaoh king of Egypt, to bring
	the children of Israel out of the land of Egypt.

	^14These be the heads of their fathers' houses: The sons of Reuben the
	firstborn of Israel; Hanoch, and Pallu, Hezron, and Carmi: these be the
	families of Reuben.

	^15And the sons of Simeon; Jemuel, and Jamin, and Ohad, and Jachin, and
	Zohar, and Shaul the son of a Canaanitish woman: these are the families
	of Simeon.

	^16And these are the names of the sons of Levi according to their
	generations; Gershon, and Kohath, and Merari: and the years of the life
	of Levi were an hundred thirty and seven years.

	^17The sons of Gershon; Libni, and Shimi, according to their families.

	^18And the sons of Kohath; Amram, and Izhar, and Hebron, and Uzziel:
	and the years of the life of Kohath were an hundred thirty and three
	years.

	^19And the sons of Merari; Mahali and Mushi: these are the families of
	Levi according to their generations.

	^20And Amram took him Jochebed his father's sister to wife; and she
	bare him Aaron and Moses: and the years of the life of Amram were an
	hundred and thirty and seven years.

	^21And the sons of Izhar; Korah, and Nepheg, and Zichri.

	^22And the sons of Uzziel; Mishael, and Elzaphan, and Zithri.

	^23And Aaron took him Elisheba, daughter of Amminadab, sister of
	Naashon, to wife; and she bare him Nadab, and Abihu, Eleazar, and
	Ithamar.

	^24And the sons of Korah; Assir, and Elkanah, and Abiasaph: these are
	the families of the Korhites.

	^25And Eleazar Aaron's son took him one of the daughters of Putiel to
	wife; and she bare him Phinehas: these are the heads of the fathers of
	the Levites according to their families.

	^26These are that Aaron and Moses, to whom the Lord said, Bring out the
	children of Israel from the land of Egypt according to their armies.

	^27These are they which spake to Pharaoh king of Egypt, to bring out
	the children of Israel from Egypt: these are that Moses and Aaron.

	^28And it came to pass on the day when the Lord spake unto Moses in the
	land of Egypt,

	^29That the Lord spake unto Moses, saying, I am the Lord: speak thou
	unto Pharaoh king of Egypt all that I say unto thee.

	^30And Moses said before the Lord, Behold, I am of uncircumcised lips,
	and how shall Pharaoh hearken unto me?
	__________________________________________________________________

	Chapter 7

	And the Lord said unto Moses, See, I have made thee a god to Pharaoh:
	and Aaron thy brother shall be thy prophet.

	^2Thou shalt speak all that I command thee: and Aaron thy brother shall
	speak unto Pharaoh, that he send the children of Israel out of his
	land.

	^3And I will harden Pharaoh's heart, and multiply my signs and my
	wonders in the land of Egypt.

	^4But Pharaoh shall not hearken unto you, that I may lay my hand upon
	Egypt, and bring forth mine armies, and my people the children of
	Israel, out of the land of Egypt by great judgments.

	^5And the Egyptians shall know that I am the Lord, when I stretch forth
	mine hand upon Egypt, and bring out the children of Israel from among
	them.

	^6And Moses and Aaron did as the Lord commanded them, so did they.

	^7And Moses was fourscore years old, and Aaron fourscore and three
	years old, when they spake unto Pharaoh.

	^8And the Lord spake unto Moses and unto Aaron, saying,

	^9When Pharaoh shall speak unto you, saying, Shew a miracle for you:
	then thou shalt say unto Aaron, Take thy rod, and cast it before
	Pharaoh, and it shall become a serpent.

	^10And Moses and Aaron went in unto Pharaoh, and they did so as the
	Lord had commanded: and Aaron cast down his rod before Pharaoh, and
	before his servants, and it became a serpent.

	^11Then Pharaoh also called the wise men and the sorcerers: now the
	magicians of Egypt, they also did in like manner with their
	enchantments.

	^12For they cast down every man his rod, and they became serpents: but
	Aaron's rod swallowed up their rods.

	^13And he hardened Pharaoh's heart, that he hearkened not unto them; as
	the Lord had said.

	^14And the Lord said unto Moses, Pharaoh's heart is hardened, he
	refuseth to let the people go.

	^15Get thee unto Pharaoh in the morning; lo, he goeth out unto the
	water; and thou shalt stand by the river's brink against he come; and
	the rod which was turned to a serpent shalt thou take in thine hand.

	^16And thou shalt say unto him, The Lord God of the Hebrews hath sent
	me unto thee, saying, Let my people go, that they may serve me in the
	wilderness: and, behold, hitherto thou wouldest not hear.

	^17Thus saith the Lord, In this thou shalt know that I am the Lord:
	behold, I will smite with the rod that is in mine hand upon the waters
	which are in the river, and they shall be turned to blood.

	^18And the fish that is in the river shall die, and the river shall
	stink; and the Egyptians shall lothe to drink of the water of the
	river.

	^19And the Lord spake unto Moses, Say unto Aaron, Take thy rod, and
	stretch out thine hand upon the waters of Egypt, upon their streams,
	upon their rivers, and upon their ponds, and upon all their pools of
	water, that they may become blood; and that there may be blood
	throughout all the land of Egypt, both in vessels of wood, and in
	vessels of stone.

	^20And Moses and Aaron did so, as the Lord commanded; and he lifted up
	the rod, and smote the waters that were in the river, in the sight of
	Pharaoh, and in the sight of his servants; and all the waters that were
	in the river were turned to blood.

	^21And the fish that was in the river died; and the river stank, and
	the Egyptians could not drink of the water of the river; and there was
	blood throughout all the land of Egypt.

	^22And the magicians of Egypt did so with their enchantments: and
	Pharaoh's heart was hardened, neither did he hearken unto them; as the
	Lord had said.

	^23And Pharaoh turned and went into his house, neither did he set his
	heart to this also.

	^24And all the Egyptians digged round about the river for water to
	drink; for they could not drink of the water of the river.

	^25And seven days were fulfilled, after that the Lord had smitten the
	river.
	__________________________________________________________________

	Chapter 8

	And the Lord spake unto Moses, Go unto Pharaoh, and say unto him, Thus
	saith the Lord, Let my people go, that they may serve me.

	^2And if thou refuse to let them go, behold, I will smite all thy
	borders with frogs:

	^3And the river shall bring forth frogs abundantly, which shall go up
	and come into thine house, and into thy bedchamber, and upon thy bed,
	and into the house of thy servants, and upon thy people, and into thine
	ovens, and into thy kneadingtroughs:

	^4And the frogs shall come up both on thee, and upon thy people, and
	upon all thy servants.

	^5And the Lord spake unto Moses, Say unto Aaron, Stretch forth thine
	hand with thy rod over the streams, over the rivers, and over the
	ponds, and cause frogs to come up upon the land of Egypt.

	^6And Aaron stretched out his hand over the waters of Egypt; and the
	frogs came up, and covered the land of Egypt.

	^7And the magicians did so with their enchantments, and brought up
	frogs upon the land of Egypt.

	^8Then Pharaoh called for Moses and Aaron, and said, Intreat the Lord,
	that he may take away the frogs from me, and from my people; and I will
	let the people go, that they may do sacrifice unto the Lord.

	^9And Moses said unto Pharaoh, Glory over me: when shall I intreat for
	thee, and for thy servants, and for thy people, to destroy the frogs
	from thee and thy houses, that they may remain in the river only?

	^10And he said, To morrow. And he said, Be it according to thy word:
	that thou mayest know that there is none like unto the Lord our God.

	^11And the frogs shall depart from thee, and from thy houses, and from
	thy servants, and from thy people; they shall remain in the river only.

	^12And Moses and Aaron went out from Pharaoh: and Moses cried unto the
	Lord because of the frogs which he had brought against Pharaoh.

	^13And the Lord did according to the word of Moses; and the frogs died
	out of the houses, out of the villages, and out of the fields.

	^14And they gathered them together upon heaps: and the land stank.

	^15But when Pharaoh saw that there was respite, he hardened his heart,
	and hearkened not unto them; as the Lord had said.

	^16And the Lord said unto Moses, Say unto Aaron, Stretch out thy rod,
	and smite the dust of the land, that it may become lice throughout all
	the land of Egypt.

	^17And they did so; for Aaron stretched out his hand with his rod, and
	smote the dust of the earth, and it became lice in man, and in beast;
	all the dust of the land became lice throughout all the land of Egypt.

	^18And the magicians did so with their enchantments to bring forth
	lice, but they could not: so there were lice upon man, and upon beast.

	^19Then the magicians said unto Pharaoh, This is the finger of God: and
	Pharaoh's heart was hardened, and he hearkened not unto them; as the
	Lord had said.

	^20And the Lord said unto Moses, Rise up early in the morning, and
	stand before Pharaoh; lo, he cometh forth to the water; and say unto
	him, Thus saith the Lord, Let my people go, that they may serve me.

	^21Else, if thou wilt not let my people go, behold, I will send swarms
	of flies upon thee, and upon thy servants, and upon thy people, and
	into thy houses: and the houses of the Egyptians shall be full of
	swarms of flies, and also the ground whereon they are.

	^22And I will sever in that day the land of Goshen, in which my people
	dwell, that no swarms of flies shall be there; to the end thou mayest
	know that I am the Lord in the midst of the earth.

	^23And I will put a division between my people and thy people: to
	morrow shall this sign be.

	^24And the Lord did so; and there came a grievous swarm of flies into
	the house of Pharaoh, and into his servants' houses, and into all the
	land of Egypt: the land was corrupted by reason of the swarm of flies.

	^25And Pharaoh called for Moses and for Aaron, and said, Go ye,
	sacrifice to your God in the land.

	^26And Moses said, It is not meet so to do; for we shall sacrifice the
	abomination of the Egyptians to the Lord our God: lo, shall we
	sacrifice the abomination of the Egyptians before their eyes, and will
	they not stone us?

	^27We will go three days' journey into the wilderness, and sacrifice to
	the Lord our God, as he shall command us.

	^28And Pharaoh said, I will let you go, that ye may sacrifice to the
	Lord your God in the wilderness; only ye shall not go very far away:
	intreat for me.

	^29And Moses said, Behold, I go out from thee, and I will intreat the
	Lord that the swarms of flies may depart from Pharaoh, from his
	servants, and from his people, to morrow: but let not Pharaoh deal
	deceitfully any more in not letting the people go to sacrifice to the
	Lord.

	^30And Moses went out from Pharaoh, and intreated the Lord.

	^31And the Lord did according to the word of Moses; and he removed the
	swarms of flies from Pharaoh, from his servants, and from his people;
	there remained not one.

	^32And Pharaoh hardened his heart at this time also, neither would he
	let the people go.
	__________________________________________________________________

	Chapter 9

	Then the Lord said unto Moses, Go in unto Pharaoh, and tell him, Thus
	saith the Lord God of the Hebrews, Let my people go, that they may
	serve me.

	^2For if thou refuse to let them go, and wilt hold them still,

	^3Behold, the hand of the Lord is upon thy cattle which is in the
	field, upon the horses, upon the asses, upon the camels, upon the oxen,
	and upon the sheep: there shall be a very grievous murrain.

	^4And the Lord shall sever between the cattle of Israel and the cattle
	of Egypt: and there shall nothing die of all that is the children's of
	Israel.

	^5And the Lord appointed a set time, saying, To morrow the Lord shall
	do this thing in the land.

	^6And the Lord did that thing on the morrow, and all the cattle of
	Egypt died: but of the cattle of the children of Israel died not one.

	^7And Pharaoh sent, and, behold, there was not one of the cattle of the
	Israelites dead. And the heart of Pharaoh was hardened, and he did not
	let the people go.

	^8And the Lord said unto Moses and unto Aaron, Take to you handfuls of
	ashes of the furnace, and let Moses sprinkle it toward the heaven in
	the sight of Pharaoh.

	^9And it shall become small dust in all the land of Egypt, and shall be
	a boil breaking forth with blains upon man, and upon beast, throughout
	all the land of Egypt.

	^10And they took ashes of the furnace, and stood before Pharaoh; and
	Moses sprinkled it up toward heaven; and it became a boil breaking
	forth with blains upon man, and upon beast.

	^11And the magicians could not stand before Moses because of the boils;
	for the boil was upon the magicians, and upon all the Egyptians.

	^12And the Lord hardened the heart of Pharaoh, and he hearkened not
	unto them; as the Lord had spoken unto Moses.

	^13And the Lord said unto Moses, Rise up early in the morning, and
	stand before Pharaoh, and say unto him, Thus saith the Lord God of the
	Hebrews, Let my people go, that they may serve me.

	^14For I will at this time send all my plagues upon thine heart, and
	upon thy servants, and upon thy people; that thou mayest know that
	there is none like me in all the earth.

	^15For now I will stretch out my hand, that I may smite thee and thy
	people with pestilence; and thou shalt be cut off from the earth.

	^16And in very deed for this cause have I raised thee up, for to shew
	in thee my power; and that my name may be declared throughout all the
	earth.

	^17As yet exaltest thou thyself against my people, that thou wilt not
	let them go?

	^18Behold, to morrow about this time I will cause it to rain a very
	grievous hail, such as hath not been in Egypt since the foundation
	thereof even until now.

	^19Send therefore now, and gather thy cattle, and all that thou hast in
	the field; for upon every man and beast which shall be found in the
	field, and shall not be brought home, the hail shall come down upon
	them, and they shall die.

	^20He that feared the word of the Lord among the servants of Pharaoh
	made his servants and his cattle flee into the houses:

	^21And he that regarded not the word of the Lord left his servants and
	his cattle in the field.

	^22And the Lord said unto Moses, Stretch forth thine hand toward
	heaven, that there may be hail in all the land of Egypt, upon man, and
	upon beast, and upon every herb of the field, throughout the land of
	Egypt.

	^23And Moses stretched forth his rod toward heaven: and the Lord sent
	thunder and hail, and the fire ran along upon the ground; and the Lord
	rained hail upon the land of Egypt.

	^24So there was hail, and fire mingled with the hail, very grievous,
	such as there was none like it in all the land of Egypt since it became
	a nation.

	^25And the hail smote throughout all the land of Egypt all that was in
	the field, both man and beast; and the hail smote every herb of the
	field, and brake every tree of the field.

	^26Only in the land of Goshen, where the children of Israel were, was
	there no hail.

	^27And Pharaoh sent, and called for Moses and Aaron, and said unto
	them, I have sinned this time: the Lord is righteous, and I and my
	people are wicked.

	^28Intreat the Lord (for it is enough) that there be no more mighty
	thunderings and hail; and I will let you go, and ye shall stay no
	longer.

	^29And Moses said unto him, As soon as I am gone out of the city, I
	will spread abroad my hands unto the Lord; and the thunder shall cease,
	neither shall there be any more hail; that thou mayest know how that
	the earth is the Lord'S.

	^30But as for thee and thy servants, I know that ye will not yet fear
	the Lord God.

	^31And the flax and the barley was smitten: for the barley was in the
	ear, and the flax was bolled.

	^32But the wheat and the rie were not smitten: for they were not grown
	up.

	^33And Moses went out of the city from Pharaoh, and spread abroad his
	hands unto the Lord: and the thunders and hail ceased, and the rain was
	not poured upon the earth.

	^34And when Pharaoh saw that the rain and the hail and the thunders
	were ceased, he sinned yet more, and hardened his heart, he and his
	servants.

	^35And the heart of Pharaoh was hardened, neither would he let the
	children of Israel go; as the Lord had spoken by Moses.
	__________________________________________________________________

	Chapter 10

	And the Lord said unto Moses, Go in unto Pharaoh: for I have hardened
	his heart, and the heart of his servants, that I might shew these my
	signs before him:

	^2And that thou mayest tell in the ears of thy son, and of thy son's
	son, what things I have wrought in Egypt, and my signs which I have
	done among them; that ye may know how that I am the Lord.

	^3And Moses and Aaron came in unto Pharaoh, and said unto him, Thus
	saith the Lord God of the Hebrews, How long wilt thou refuse to humble
	thyself before me? let my people go, that they may serve me.

	^4Else, if thou refuse to let my people go, behold, to morrow will I
	bring the locusts into thy coast:

	^5And they shall cover the face of the earth, that one cannot be able
	to see the earth: and they shall eat the residue of that which is
	escaped, which remaineth unto you from the hail, and shall eat every
	tree which groweth for you out of the field:

	^6And they shall fill thy houses, and the houses of all thy servants,
	and the houses of all the Egyptians; which neither thy fathers, nor thy
	fathers' fathers have seen, since the day that they were upon the earth
	unto this day. And he turned himself, and went out from Pharaoh.

	^7And Pharaoh's servants said unto him, How long shall this man be a
	snare unto us? let the men go, that they may serve the Lord their God:
	knowest thou not yet that Egypt is destroyed?

	^8And Moses and Aaron were brought again unto Pharaoh: and he said unto
	them, Go, serve the Lord your God: but who are they that shall go?

	^9And Moses said, We will go with our young and with our old, with our
	sons and with our daughters, with our flocks and with our herds will we
	go; for we must hold a feast unto the Lord.

	^10And he said unto them, Let the Lord be so with you, as I will let
	you go, and your little ones: look to it; for evil is before you.

	^11Not so: go now ye that are men, and serve the Lord; for that ye did
	desire. And they were driven out from Pharaoh's presence.

	^12And the Lord said unto Moses, Stretch out thine hand over the land
	of Egypt for the locusts, that they may come up upon the land of Egypt,
	and eat every herb of the land, even all that the hail hath left.

	^13And Moses stretched forth his rod over the land of Egypt, and the
	Lord brought an east wind upon the land all that day, and all that
	night; and when it was morning, the east wind brought the locusts.

	^14And the locusts went up over all the land of Egypt, and rested in
	all the coasts of Egypt: very grievous were they; before them there
	were no such locusts as they, neither after them shall be such.

	^15For they covered the face of the whole earth, so that the land was
	darkened; and they did eat every herb of the land, and all the fruit of
	the trees which the hail had left: and there remained not any green
	thing in the trees, or in the herbs of the field, through all the land
	of Egypt.

	^16Then Pharaoh called for Moses and Aaron in haste; and he said, I
	have sinned against the Lord your God, and against you.

	^17Now therefore forgive, I pray thee, my sin only this once, and
	intreat the Lord your God, that he may take away from me this death
	only.

	^18And he went out from Pharaoh, and intreated the Lord.

	^19And the Lord turned a mighty strong west wind, which took away the
	locusts, and cast them into the Red sea; there remained not one locust
	in all the coasts of Egypt.

	^20But the Lord hardened Pharaoh's heart, so that he would not let the
	children of Israel go.

	^21And the Lord said unto Moses, Stretch out thine hand toward heaven,
	that there may be darkness over the land of Egypt, even darkness which
	may be felt.

	^22And Moses stretched forth his hand toward heaven; and there was a
	thick darkness in all the land of Egypt three days:

	^23They saw not one another, neither rose any from his place for three
	days: but all the children of Israel had light in their dwellings.

	^24And Pharaoh called unto Moses, and said, Go ye, serve the Lord; only
	let your flocks and your herds be stayed: let your little ones also go
	with you.

	^25And Moses said, Thou must give us also sacrifices and burnt
	offerings, that we may sacrifice unto the Lord our God.

	^26Our cattle also shall go with us; there shall not an hoof be left
	behind; for thereof must we take to serve the Lord our God; and we know
	not with what we must serve the Lord, until we come thither.

	^27But the Lord hardened Pharaoh's heart, and he would not let them go.

	^28And Pharaoh said unto him, Get thee from me, take heed to thyself,
	see my face no more; for in that day thou seest my face thou shalt die.

	^29And Moses said, Thou hast spoken well, I will see thy face again no
	more.
	__________________________________________________________________

	Chapter 11

	And the Lord said unto Moses, Yet will I bring one plague more upon
	Pharaoh, and upon Egypt; afterwards he will let you go hence: when he
	shall let you go, he shall surely thrust you out hence altogether.

	^2Speak now in the ears of the people, and let every man borrow of his
	neighbour, and every woman of her neighbour, jewels of silver, and
	jewels of gold.

	^3And the Lord gave the people favour in the sight of the Egyptians.
	Moreover the man Moses was very great in the land of Egypt, in the
	sight of Pharaoh's servants, and in the sight of the people.

	^4And Moses said, Thus saith the Lord, About midnight will I go out
	into the midst of Egypt:

	^5And all the firstborn in the land of Egypt shall die, from the
	firstborn of Pharaoh that sitteth upon his throne, even unto the
	firstborn of the maidservant that is behind the mill; and all the
	firstborn of beasts.

	^6And there shall be a great cry throughout all the land of Egypt, such
	as there was none like it, nor shall be like it any more.

	^7But against any of the children of Israel shall not a dog move his
	tongue, against man or beast: that ye may know how that the Lord doth
	put a difference between the Egyptians and Israel.

	^8And all these thy servants shall come down unto me, and bow down
	themselves unto me, saying, Get thee out, and all the people that
	follow thee: and after that I will go out. And he went out from Pharaoh
	in a great anger.

	^9And the Lord said unto Moses, Pharaoh shall not hearken unto you;
	that my wonders may be multiplied in the land of Egypt.

	^10And Moses and Aaron did all these wonders before Pharaoh: and the
	Lord hardened Pharaoh's heart, so that he would not let the children of
	Israel go out of his land.
	__________________________________________________________________

	Chapter 12

	And the Lord spake unto Moses and Aaron in the land of Egypt, saying,

	^2This month shall be unto you the beginning of months: it shall be the
	first month of the year to you.

	^3Speak ye unto all the congregation of Israel, saying, In the tenth
	day of this month they shall take to them every man a lamb, according
	to the house of their fathers, a lamb for an house:

	^4And if the household be too little for the lamb, let him and his
	neighbour next unto his house take it according to the number of the
	souls; every man according to his eating shall make your count for the
	lamb.

	^5Your lamb shall be without blemish, a male of the first year: ye
	shall take it out from the sheep, or from the goats:

	^6And ye shall keep it up until the fourteenth day of the same month:
	and the whole assembly of the congregation of Israel shall kill it in
	the evening.

	^7And they shall take of the blood, and strike it on the two side posts
	and on the upper door post of the houses, wherein they shall eat it.

	^8And they shall eat the flesh in that night, roast with fire, and
	unleavened bread; and with bitter herbs they shall eat it.

	^9Eat not of it raw, nor sodden at all with water, but roast with fire;
	his head with his legs, and with the purtenance thereof.

	^10And ye shall let nothing of it remain until the morning; and that
	which remaineth of it until the morning ye shall burn with fire.

	^11And thus shall ye eat it; with your loins girded, your shoes on your
	feet, and your staff in your hand; and ye shall eat it in haste: it is
	the Lord'S passover.

	^12For I will pass through the land of Egypt this night, and will smite
	all the firstborn in the land of Egypt, both man and beast; and against
	all the gods of Egypt I will execute judgment: I am the Lord.

	^13And the blood shall be to you for a token upon the houses where ye
	are: and when I see the blood, I will pass over you, and the plague
	shall not be upon you to destroy you, when I smite the land of Egypt.

	^14And this day shall be unto you for a memorial; and ye shall keep it
	a feast to the Lord throughout your generations; ye shall keep it a
	feast by an ordinance for ever.

	^15Seven days shall ye eat unleavened bread; even the first day ye
	shall put away leaven out of your houses: for whosoever eateth leavened
	bread from the first day until the seventh day, that soul shall be cut
	off from Israel.

	^16And in the first day there shall be an holy convocation, and in the
	seventh day there shall be an holy convocation to you; no manner of
	work shall be done in them, save that which every man must eat, that
	only may be done of you.

	^17And ye shall observe the feast of unleavened bread; for in this
	selfsame day have I brought your armies out of the land of Egypt:
	therefore shall ye observe this day in your generations by an ordinance
	for ever.

	^18In the first month, on the fourteenth day of the month at even, ye
	shall eat unleavened bread, until the one and twentieth day of the
	month at even.

	^19Seven days shall there be no leaven found in your houses: for
	whosoever eateth that which is leavened, even that soul shall be cut
	off from the congregation of Israel, whether he be a stranger, or born
	in the land.

	^20Ye shall eat nothing leavened; in all your habitations shall ye eat
	unleavened bread.

	^21Then Moses called for all the elders of Israel, and said unto them,
	Draw out and take you a lamb according to your families, and kill the
	passover.

	^22And ye shall take a bunch of hyssop, and dip it in the blood that is
	in the bason, and strike the lintel and the two side posts with the
	blood that is in the bason; and none of you shall go out at the door of
	his house until the morning.

	^23For the Lord will pass through to smite the Egyptians; and when he
	seeth the blood upon the lintel, and on the two side posts, the Lord
	will pass over the door, and will not suffer the destroyer to come in
	unto your houses to smite you.

	^24And ye shall observe this thing for an ordinance to thee and to thy
	sons for ever.

	^25And it shall come to pass, when ye be come to the land which the
	Lord will give you, according as he hath promised, that ye shall keep
	this service.

	^26And it shall come to pass, when your children shall say unto you,
	What mean ye by this service?

	^27That ye shall say, It is the sacrifice of the Lord'S passover, who
	passed over the houses of the children of Israel in Egypt, when he
	smote the Egyptians, and delivered our houses. And the people bowed the
	head and worshipped.

	^28And the children of Israel went away, and did as the Lord had
	commanded Moses and Aaron, so did they.

	^29And it came to pass, that at midnight the Lord smote all the
	firstborn in the land of Egypt, from the firstborn of Pharaoh that sat
	on his throne unto the firstborn of the captive that was in the
	dungeon; and all the firstborn of cattle.

	^30And Pharaoh rose up in the night, he, and all his servants, and all
	the Egyptians; and there was a great cry in Egypt; for there was not a
	house where there was not one dead.

	^31And he called for Moses and Aaron by night, and said, Rise up, and
	get you forth from among my people, both ye and the children of Israel;
	and go, serve the Lord, as ye have said.

	^32Also take your flocks and your herds, as ye have said, and be gone;
	and bless me also.

	^33And the Egyptians were urgent upon the people, that they might send
	them out of the land in haste; for they said, We be all dead men.

	^34And the people took their dough before it was leavened, their
	kneadingtroughs being bound up in their clothes upon their shoulders.

	^35And the children of Israel did according to the word of Moses; and
	they borrowed of the Egyptians jewels of silver, and jewels of gold,
	and raiment:

	^36And the Lord gave the people favour in the sight of the Egyptians,
	so that they lent unto them such things as they required. And they
	spoiled the Egyptians.

	^37And the children of Israel journeyed from Rameses to Succoth, about
	six hundred thousand on foot that were men, beside children.

	^38And a mixed multitude went up also with them; and flocks, and herds,
	even very much cattle.

	^39And they baked unleavened cakes of the dough which they brought
	forth out of Egypt, for it was not leavened; because they were thrust
	out of Egypt, and could not tarry, neither had they prepared for
	themselves any victual.

	^40Now the sojourning of the children of Israel, who dwelt in Egypt,
	was four hundred and thirty years.

	^41And it came to pass at the end of the four hundred and thirty years,
	even the selfsame day it came to pass, that all the hosts of the Lord
	went out from the land of Egypt.

	^42It is a night to be much observed unto the Lord for bringing them
	out from the land of Egypt: this is that night of the Lord to be
	observed of all the children of Israel in their generations.

	^43And the Lord said unto Moses and Aaron, This is the ordinance of the
	passover: There shall no stranger eat thereof:

	^44But every man's servant that is bought for money, when thou hast
	circumcised him, then shall he eat thereof.

	^45A foreigner and an hired servant shall not eat thereof.

	^46In one house shall it be eaten; thou shalt not carry forth ought of
	the flesh abroad out of the house; neither shall ye break a bone
	thereof.

	^47All the congregation of Israel shall keep it.

	^48And when a stranger shall sojourn with thee, and will keep the
	passover to the Lord, let all his males be circumcised, and then let
	him come near and keep it; and he shall be as one that is born in the
	land: for no uncircumcised person shall eat thereof.

	^49One law shall be to him that is homeborn, and unto the stranger that
	sojourneth among you.

	^50Thus did all the children of Israel; as the Lord commanded Moses and
	Aaron, so did they.

	^51And it came to pass the selfsame day, that the Lord did bring the
	children of Israel out of the land of Egypt by their armies.
	__________________________________________________________________

	Chapter 13

	And the Lord spake unto Moses, saying,

	^2Sanctify unto me all the firstborn, whatsoever openeth the womb among
	the children of Israel, both of man and of beast: it is mine.

	^3And Moses said unto the people, Remember this day, in which ye came
	out from Egypt, out of the house of bondage; for by strength of hand
	the Lord brought you out from this place: there shall no leavened bread
	be eaten.

	^4This day came ye out in the month Abib.

	^5And it shall be when the Lord shall bring thee into the land of the
	Canaanites, and the Hittites, and the Amorites, and the Hivites, and
	the Jebusites, which he sware unto thy fathers to give thee, a land
	flowing with milk and honey, that thou shalt keep this service in this
	month.

	^6Seven days thou shalt eat unleavened bread, and in the seventh day
	shall be a feast to the Lord.

	^7Unleavened bread shall be eaten seven days; and there shall no
	leavened bread be seen with thee, neither shall there be leaven seen
	with thee in all thy quarters.

	^8And thou shalt shew thy son in that day, saying, This is done because
	of that which the Lord did unto me when I came forth out of Egypt.

	^9And it shall be for a sign unto thee upon thine hand, and for a
	memorial between thine eyes, that the Lord'S law may be in thy mouth:
	for with a strong hand hath the Lord brought thee out of Egypt.

	^10Thou shalt therefore keep this ordinance in his season from year to
	year.

	^11And it shall be when the Lord shall bring thee into the land of the
	Canaanites, as he sware unto thee and to thy fathers, and shall give it
	thee,

	^12That thou shalt set apart unto the Lord all that openeth the matrix,
	and every firstling that cometh of a beast which thou hast; the males
	shall be the Lord'S.

	^13And every firstling of an ass thou shalt redeem with a lamb; and if
	thou wilt not redeem it, then thou shalt break his neck: and all the
	firstborn of man among thy children shalt thou redeem.

	^14And it shall be when thy son asketh thee in time to come, saying,
	What is this? that thou shalt say unto him, By strength of hand the
	Lord brought us out from Egypt, from the house of bondage:

	^15And it came to pass, when Pharaoh would hardly let us go, that the
	Lord slew all the firstborn in the land of Egypt, both the firstborn of
	man, and the firstborn of beast: therefore I sacrifice to the Lord all
	that openeth the matrix, being males; but all the firstborn of my
	children I redeem.

	^16And it shall be for a token upon thine hand, and for frontlets
	between thine eyes: for by strength of hand the Lord brought us forth
	out of Egypt.

	^17And it came to pass, when Pharaoh had let the people go, that God
	led them not through the way of the land of the Philistines, although
	that was near; for God said, Lest peradventure the people repent when
	they see war, and they return to Egypt:

	^18But God led the people about, through the way of the wilderness of
	the Red sea: and the children of Israel went up harnessed out of the
	land of Egypt.

	^19And Moses took the bones of Joseph with him: for he had straitly
	sworn the children of Israel, saying, God will surely visit you; and ye
	shall carry up my bones away hence with you.

	^20And they took their journey from Succoth, and encamped in Etham, in
	the edge of the wilderness.

	^21And the Lord went before them by day in a pillar of a cloud, to lead
	them the way; and by night in a pillar of fire, to give them light; to
	go by day and night:

	^22He took not away the pillar of the cloud by day, nor the pillar of
	fire by night, from before the people.
	__________________________________________________________________

	Chapter 14

	And the Lord spake unto Moses, saying,

	^2Speak unto the children of Israel, that they turn and encamp before
	Pihahiroth, between Migdol and the sea, over against Baalzephon: before
	it shall ye encamp by the sea.

	^3For Pharaoh will say of the children of Israel, They are entangled in
	the land, the wilderness hath shut them in.

	^4And I will harden Pharaoh's heart, that he shall follow after them;
	and I will be honoured upon Pharaoh, and upon all his host; that the
	Egyptians may know that I am the Lord. And they did so.

	^5And it was told the king of Egypt that the people fled: and the heart
	of Pharaoh and of his servants was turned against the people, and they
	said, Why have we done this, that we have let Israel go from serving
	us?

	^6And he made ready his chariot, and took his people with him:

	^7And he took six hundred chosen chariots, and all the chariots of
	Egypt, and captains over every one of them.

	^8And the Lord hardened the heart of Pharaoh king of Egypt, and he
	pursued after the children of Israel: and the children of Israel went
	out with an high hand.

	^9But the Egyptians pursued after them, all the horses and chariots of
	Pharaoh, and his horsemen, and his army, and overtook them encamping by
	the sea, beside Pihahiroth, before Baalzephon.

	^10And when Pharaoh drew nigh, the children of Israel lifted up their
	eyes, and, behold, the Egyptians marched after them; and they were sore
	afraid: and the children of Israel cried out unto the Lord.

	^11And they said unto Moses, Because there were no graves in Egypt,
	hast thou taken us away to die in the wilderness? wherefore hast thou
	dealt thus with us, to carry us forth out of Egypt?

	^12Is not this the word that we did tell thee in Egypt, saying, Let us
	alone, that we may serve the Egyptians? For it had been better for us
	to serve the Egyptians, than that we should die in the wilderness.

	^13And Moses said unto the people, Fear ye not, stand still, and see
	the salvation of the Lord, which he will shew to you to day: for the
	Egyptians whom ye have seen to day, ye shall see them again no more for
	ever.

	^14The Lord shall fight for you, and ye shall hold your peace.

	^15And the Lord said unto Moses, Wherefore criest thou unto me? speak
	unto the children of Israel, that they go forward:

	^16But lift thou up thy rod, and stretch out thine hand over the sea,
	and divide it: and the children of Israel shall go on dry ground
	through the midst of the sea.

	^17And I, behold, I will harden the hearts of the Egyptians, and they
	shall follow them: and I will get me honour upon Pharaoh, and upon all
	his host, upon his chariots, and upon his horsemen.

	^18And the Egyptians shall know that I am the Lord, when I have gotten
	me honour upon Pharaoh, upon his chariots, and upon his horsemen.

	^19And the angel of God, which went before the camp of Israel, removed
	and went behind them; and the pillar of the cloud went from before
	their face, and stood behind them:

	^20And it came between the camp of the Egyptians and the camp of
	Israel; and it was a cloud and darkness to them, but it gave light by
	night to these: so that the one came not near the other all the night.

	^21And Moses stretched out his hand over the sea; and the Lord caused
	the sea to go back by a strong east wind all that night, and made the
	sea dry land, and the waters were divided.

	^22And the children of Israel went into the midst of the sea upon the
	dry ground: and the waters were a wall unto them on their right hand,
	and on their left.

	^23And the Egyptians pursued, and went in after them to the midst of
	the sea, even all Pharaoh's horses, his chariots, and his horsemen.

	^24And it came to pass, that in the morning watch the Lord looked unto
	the host of the Egyptians through the pillar of fire and of the cloud,
	and troubled the host of the Egyptians,

	^25And took off their chariot wheels, that they drave them heavily: so
	that the Egyptians said, Let us flee from the face of Israel; for the
	Lord fighteth for them against the Egyptians.

	^26And the Lord said unto Moses, Stretch out thine hand over the sea,
	that the waters may come again upon the Egyptians, upon their chariots,
	and upon their horsemen.

	^27And Moses stretched forth his hand over the sea, and the sea
	returned to his strength when the morning appeared; and the Egyptians
	fled against it; and the Lord overthrew the Egyptians in the midst of
	the sea.

	^28And the waters returned, and covered the chariots, and the horsemen,
	and all the host of Pharaoh that came into the sea after them; there
	remained not so much as one of them.

	^29But the children of Israel walked upon dry land in the midst of the
	sea; and the waters were a wall unto them on their right hand, and on
	their left.

	^30Thus the Lord saved Israel that day out of the hand of the
	Egyptians; and Israel saw the Egyptians dead upon the sea shore.

	^31And Israel saw that great work which the Lord did upon the
	Egyptians: and the people feared the Lord, and believed the Lord, and
	his servant Moses.
	__________________________________________________________________

	Chapter 15

	Then sang Moses and the children of Israel this song unto the Lord, and
	spake, saying, I will sing unto the Lord, for he hath triumphed
	gloriously: the horse and his rider hath he thrown into the sea.

	^2The Lord is my strength and song, and he is become my salvation: he
	is my God, and I will prepare him an habitation; my father's God, and I
	will exalt him.

	^3The Lord is a man of war: the Lord is his name.

	^4Pharaoh's chariots and his host hath he cast into the sea: his chosen
	captains also are drowned in the Red sea.

	^5The depths have covered them: they sank into the bottom as a stone.

	^6Thy right hand, O Lord, is become glorious in power: thy right hand,
	O Lord, hath dashed in pieces the enemy.

	^7And in the greatness of thine excellency thou hast overthrown them
	that rose up against thee: thou sentest forth thy wrath, which consumed
	them as stubble.

	^8And with the blast of thy nostrils the waters were gathered together,
	the floods stood upright as an heap, and the depths were congealed in
	the heart of the sea.

	^9The enemy said, I will pursue, I will overtake, I will divide the
	spoil; my lust shall be satisfied upon them; I will draw my sword, my
	hand shall destroy them.

	^10Thou didst blow with thy wind, the sea covered them: they sank as
	lead in the mighty waters.

	^11Who is like unto thee, O Lord, among the gods? who is like thee,
	glorious in holiness, fearful in praises, doing wonders?

	^12Thou stretchedst out thy right hand, the earth swallowed them.

	^13Thou in thy mercy hast led forth the people which thou hast
	redeemed: thou hast guided them in thy strength unto thy holy
	habitation.

	^14The people shall hear, and be afraid: sorrow shall take hold on the
	inhabitants of Palestina.

	^15Then the dukes of Edom shall be amazed; the mighty men of Moab,
	trembling shall take hold upon them; all the inhabitants of Canaan
	shall melt away.

	^16Fear and dread shall fall upon them; by the greatness of thine arm
	they shall be as still as a stone; till thy people pass over, O Lord,
	till the people pass over, which thou hast purchased.

	^17Thou shalt bring them in, and plant them in the mountain of thine
	inheritance, in the place, O Lord, which thou hast made for thee to
	dwell in, in the Sanctuary, O Lord, which thy hands have established.

	^18The Lord shall reign for ever and ever.

	^19For the horse of Pharaoh went in with his chariots and with his
	horsemen into the sea, and the Lord brought again the waters of the sea
	upon them; but the children of Israel went on dry land in the midst of
	the sea.

	^20And Miriam the prophetess, the sister of Aaron, took a timbrel in
	her hand; and all the women went out after her with timbrels and with
	dances.

	^21And Miriam answered them, Sing ye to the Lord, for he hath triumphed
	gloriously; the horse and his rider hath he thrown into the sea.

	^22So Moses brought Israel from the Red sea, and they went out into the
	wilderness of Shur; and they went three days in the wilderness, and
	found no water.

	^23And when they came to Marah, they could not drink of the waters of
	Marah, for they were bitter: therefore the name of it was called Marah.

	^24And the people murmured against Moses, saying, What shall we drink?

	^25And he cried unto the Lord; and the Lord shewed him a tree, which
	when he had cast into the waters, the waters were made sweet: there he
	made for them a statute and an ordinance, and there he proved them,

	^26And said, If thou wilt diligently hearken to the voice of the Lord
	thy God, and wilt do that which is right in his sight, and wilt give
	ear to his commandments, and keep all his statutes, I will put none of
	these diseases upon thee, which I have brought upon the Egyptians: for
	I am the Lord that healeth thee.

	^27And they came to Elim, where were twelve wells of water, and
	threescore and ten palm trees: and they encamped there by the waters.
	__________________________________________________________________

	Chapter 16

	And they took their journey from Elim, and all the congregation of the
	children of Israel came unto the wilderness of Sin, which is between
	Elim and Sinai, on the fifteenth day of the second month after their
	departing out of the land of Egypt.

	^2And the whole congregation of the children of Israel murmured against
	Moses and Aaron in the wilderness:

	^3And the children of Israel said unto them, Would to God we had died
	by the hand of the Lord in the land of Egypt, when we sat by the flesh
	pots, and when we did eat bread to the full; for ye have brought us
	forth into this wilderness, to kill this whole assembly with hunger.

	^4Then said the Lord unto Moses, Behold, I will rain bread from heaven
	for you; and the people shall go out and gather a certain rate every
	day, that I may prove them, whether they will walk in my law, or no.

	^5And it shall come to pass, that on the sixth day they shall prepare
	that which they bring in; and it shall be twice as much as they gather
	daily.

	^6And Moses and Aaron said unto all the children of Israel, At even,
	then ye shall know that the Lord hath brought you out from the land of
	Egypt:

	^7And in the morning, then ye shall see the glory of the Lord; for that
	he heareth your murmurings against the Lord: and what are we, that ye
	murmur against us?

	^8And Moses said, This shall be, when the Lord shall give you in the
	evening flesh to eat, and in the morning bread to the full; for that
	the Lord heareth your murmurings which ye murmur against him: and what
	are we? your murmurings are not against us, but against the Lord.

	^9And Moses spake unto Aaron, Say unto all the congregation of the
	children of Israel, Come near before the Lord: for he hath heard your
	murmurings.

	^10And it came to pass, as Aaron spake unto the whole congregation of
	the children of Israel, that they looked toward the wilderness, and,
	behold, the glory of the Lord appeared in the cloud.

	^11And the Lord spake unto Moses, saying,

	^12I have heard the murmurings of the children of Israel: speak unto
	them, saying, At even ye shall eat flesh, and in the morning ye shall
	be filled with bread; and ye shall know that I am the Lord your God.

	^13And it came to pass, that at even the quails came up, and covered
	the camp: and in the morning the dew lay round about the host.

	^14And when the dew that lay was gone up, behold, upon the face of the
	wilderness there lay a small round thing, as small as the hoar frost on
	the ground.

	^15And when the children of Israel saw it, they said one to another, It
	is manna: for they wist not what it was. And Moses said unto them, This
	is the bread which the Lord hath given you to eat.

	^16This is the thing which the Lord hath commanded, Gather of it every
	man according to his eating, an omer for every man, according to the
	number of your persons; take ye every man for them which are in his
	tents.

	^17And the children of Israel did so, and gathered, some more, some
	less.

	^18And when they did mete it with an omer, he that gathered much had
	nothing over, and he that gathered little had no lack; they gathered
	every man according to his eating.

	^19And Moses said, Let no man leave of it till the morning.

	^20Notwithstanding they hearkened not unto Moses; but some of them left
	of it until the morning, and it bred worms, and stank: and Moses was
	wroth with them.

	^21And they gathered it every morning, every man according to his
	eating: and when the sun waxed hot, it melted.

	^22And it came to pass, that on the sixth day they gathered twice as
	much bread, two omers for one man: and all the rulers of the
	congregation came and told Moses.

	^23And he said unto them, This is that which the Lord hath said, To
	morrow is the rest of the holy sabbath unto the Lord: bake that which
	ye will bake to day, and seethe that ye will seethe; and that which
	remaineth over lay up for you to be kept until the morning.

	^24And they laid it up till the morning, as Moses bade: and it did not
	stink, neither was there any worm therein.

	^25And Moses said, Eat that to day; for to day is a sabbath unto the
	Lord: to day ye shall not find it in the field.

	^26Six days ye shall gather it; but on the seventh day, which is the
	sabbath, in it there shall be none.

	^27And it came to pass, that there went out some of the people on the
	seventh day for to gather, and they found none.

	^28And the Lord said unto Moses, How long refuse ye to keep my
	commandments and my laws?

	^29See, for that the Lord hath given you the sabbath, therefore he
	giveth you on the sixth day the bread of two days; abide ye every man
	in his place, let no man go out of his place on the seventh day.

	^30So the people rested on the seventh day.

	^31And the house of Israel called the name thereof Manna: and it was
	like coriander seed, white; and the taste of it was like wafers made
	with honey.

	^32And Moses said, This is the thing which the Lord commandeth, Fill an
	omer of it to be kept for your generations; that they may see the bread
	wherewith I have fed you in the wilderness, when I brought you forth
	from the land of Egypt.

	^33And Moses said unto Aaron, Take a pot, and put an omer full of manna
	therein, and lay it up before the Lord, to be kept for your
	generations.

	^34As the Lord commanded Moses, so Aaron laid it up before the
	Testimony, to be kept.

	^35And the children of Israel did eat manna forty years, until they
	came to a land inhabited; they did eat manna, until they came unto the
	borders of the land of Canaan.

	^36Now an omer is the tenth part of an ephah.
	__________________________________________________________________

	Chapter 17

	And all the congregation of the children of Israel journeyed from the
	wilderness of Sin, after their journeys, according to the commandment
	of the Lord, and pitched in Rephidim: and there was no water for the
	people to drink.

	^2Wherefore the people did chide with Moses, and said, Give us water
	that we may drink. And Moses said unto them, Why chide ye with me?
	wherefore do ye tempt the Lord?

	^3And the people thirsted there for water; and the people murmured
	against Moses, and said, Wherefore is this that thou hast brought us up
	out of Egypt, to kill us and our children and our cattle with thirst?

	^4And Moses cried unto the Lord, saying, What shall I do unto this
	people? they be almost ready to stone me.

	^5And the Lord said unto Moses, Go on before the people, and take with
	thee of the elders of Israel; and thy rod, wherewith thou smotest the
	river, take in thine hand, and go.

	^6Behold, I will stand before thee there upon the rock in Horeb; and
	thou shalt smite the rock, and there shall come water out of it, that
	the people may drink. And Moses did so in the sight of the elders of
	Israel.

	^7And he called the name of the place Massah, and Meribah, because of
	the chiding of the children of Israel, and because they tempted the
	Lord, saying, Is the Lord among us, or not?

	^8Then came Amalek, and fought with Israel in Rephidim.

	^9And Moses said unto Joshua, Choose us out men, and go out, fight with
	Amalek: to morrow I will stand on the top of the hill with the rod of
	God in mine hand.

	^10So Joshua did as Moses had said to him, and fought with Amalek: and
	Moses, Aaron, and Hur went up to the top of the hill.

	^11And it came to pass, when Moses held up his hand, that Israel
	prevailed: and when he let down his hand, Amalek prevailed.

	^12But Moses' hands were heavy; and they took a stone, and put it under
	him, and he sat thereon; and Aaron and Hur stayed up his hands, the one
	on the one side, and the other on the other side; and his hands were
	steady until the going down of the sun.

	^13And Joshua discomfited Amalek and his people with the edge of the
	sword.

	^14And the Lord said unto Moses, Write this for a memorial in a book,
	and rehearse it in the ears of Joshua: for I will utterly put out the
	remembrance of Amalek from under heaven.

	^15And Moses built an altar, and called the name of it Jehovahnissi:

	^16For he said, Because the Lord hath sworn that the Lord will have war
	with Amalek from generation to generation.
	__________________________________________________________________

	Chapter 18

	When Jethro, the priest of Midian, Moses' father in law, heard of all
	that God had done for Moses, and for Israel his people, and that the
	Lord had brought Israel out of Egypt;

	^2Then Jethro, Moses' father in law, took Zipporah, Moses' wife, after
	he had sent her back,

	^3And her two sons; of which the name of the one was Gershom; for he
	said, I have been an alien in a strange land:

	^4And the name of the other was Eliezer; for the God of my father, said
	he, was mine help, and delivered me from the sword of Pharaoh:

	^5And Jethro, Moses' father in law, came with his sons and his wife
	unto Moses into the wilderness, where he encamped at the mount of God:

	^6And he said unto Moses, I thy father in law Jethro am come unto thee,
	and thy wife, and her two sons with her.

	^7And Moses went out to meet his father in law, and did obeisance, and
	kissed him; and they asked each other of their welfare; and they came
	into the tent.

	^8And Moses told his father in law all that the Lord had done unto
	Pharaoh and to the Egyptians for Israel's sake, and all the travail
	that had come upon them by the way, and how the Lord delivered them.

	^9And Jethro rejoiced for all the goodness which the Lord had done to
	Israel, whom he had delivered out of the hand of the Egyptians.

	^10And Jethro said, Blessed be the Lord, who hath delivered you out of
	the hand of the Egyptians, and out of the hand of Pharaoh, who hath
	delivered the people from under the hand of the Egyptians.

	^11Now I know that the Lord is greater than all gods: for in the thing
	wherein they dealt proudly he was above them.

	^12And Jethro, Moses' father in law, took a burnt offering and
	sacrifices for God: and Aaron came, and all the elders of Israel, to
	eat bread with Moses' father in law before God.

	^13And it came to pass on the morrow, that Moses sat to judge the
	people: and the people stood by Moses from the morning unto the
	evening.

	^14And when Moses' father in law saw all that he did to the people, he
	said, What is this thing that thou doest to the people? why sittest
	thou thyself alone, and all the people stand by thee from morning unto
	even?

	^15And Moses said unto his father in law, Because the people come unto
	me to enquire of God:

	^16When they have a matter, they come unto me; and I judge between one
	and another, and I do make them know the statutes of God, and his laws.

	^17And Moses' father in law said unto him, The thing that thou doest is
	not good.

	^18Thou wilt surely wear away, both thou, and this people that is with
	thee: for this thing is too heavy for thee; thou art not able to
	perform it thyself alone.

	^19Hearken now unto my voice, I will give thee counsel, and God shall
	be with thee: Be thou for the people to God-ward, that thou mayest
	bring the causes unto God:

	^20And thou shalt teach them ordinances and laws, and shalt shew them
	the way wherein they must walk, and the work that they must do.

	^21Moreover thou shalt provide out of all the people able men, such as
	fear God, men of truth, hating covetousness; and place such over them,
	to be rulers of thousands, and rulers of hundreds, rulers of fifties,
	and rulers of tens:

	^22And let them judge the people at all seasons: and it shall be, that
	every great matter they shall bring unto thee, but every small matter
	they shall judge: so shall it be easier for thyself, and they shall
	bear the burden with thee.

	^23If thou shalt do this thing, and God command thee so, then thou
	shalt be able to endure, and all this people shall also go to their
	place in peace.

	^24So Moses hearkened to the voice of his father in law, and did all
	that he had said.

	^25And Moses chose able men out of all Israel, and made them heads over
	the people, rulers of thousands, rulers of hundreds, rulers of fifties,
	and rulers of tens.

	^26And they judged the people at all seasons: the hard causes they
	brought unto Moses, but every small matter they judged themselves.

	^27And Moses let his father in law depart; and he went his way into his
	own land.
	__________________________________________________________________

	Chapter 19

	In the third month, when the children of Israel were gone forth out of
	the land of Egypt, the same day came they into the wilderness of Sinai.

	^2For they were departed from Rephidim, and were come to the desert of
	Sinai, and had pitched in the wilderness; and there Israel camped
	before the mount.

	^3And Moses went up unto God, and the Lord called unto him out of the
	mountain, saying, Thus shalt thou say to the house of Jacob, and tell
	the children of Israel;

	^4Ye have seen what I did unto the Egyptians, and how I bare you on
	eagles' wings, and brought you unto myself.

	^5Now therefore, if ye will obey my voice indeed, and keep my covenant,
	then ye shall be a peculiar treasure unto me above all people: for all
	the earth is mine:

	^6And ye shall be unto me a kingdom of priests, and an holy nation.
	These are the words which thou shalt speak unto the children of Israel.

	^7And Moses came and called for the elders of the people, and laid
	before their faces all these words which the Lord commanded him.

	^8And all the people answered together, and said, All that the Lord
	hath spoken we will do. And Moses returned the words of the people unto
	the Lord.

	^9And the Lord said unto Moses, Lo, I come unto thee in a thick cloud,
	that the people may hear when I speak with thee, and believe thee for
	ever. And Moses told the words of the people unto the Lord.

	^10And the Lord said unto Moses, Go unto the people, and sanctify them
	to day and to morrow, and let them wash their clothes,

	^11And be ready against the third day: for the third day the Lord will
	come down in the sight of all the people upon mount Sinai.

	^12And thou shalt set bounds unto the people round about, saying, Take
	heed to yourselves, that ye go not up into the mount, or touch the
	border of it: whosoever toucheth the mount shall be surely put to
	death:

	^13There shall not an hand touch it, but he shall surely be stoned, or
	shot through; whether it be beast or man, it shall not live: when the
	trumpet soundeth long, they shall come up to the mount.

	^14And Moses went down from the mount unto the people, and sanctified
	the people; and they washed their clothes.

	^15And he said unto the people, Be ready against the third day: come
	not at your wives.

	^16And it came to pass on the third day in the morning, that there were
	thunders and lightnings, and a thick cloud upon the mount, and the
	voice of the trumpet exceeding loud; so that all the people that was in
	the camp trembled.

	^17And Moses brought forth the people out of the camp to meet with God;
	and they stood at the nether part of the mount.

	^18And mount Sinai was altogether on a smoke, because the Lord
	descended upon it in fire: and the smoke thereof ascended as the smoke
	of a furnace, and the whole mount quaked greatly.

	^19And when the voice of the trumpet sounded long, and waxed louder and
	louder, Moses spake, and God answered him by a voice.

	^20And the Lord came down upon mount Sinai, on the top of the mount:
	and the Lord called Moses up to the top of the mount; and Moses went
	up.

	^21And the Lord said unto Moses, Go down, charge the people, lest they
	break through unto the Lord to gaze, and many of them perish.

	^22And let the priests also, which come near to the Lord, sanctify
	themselves, lest the Lord break forth upon them.

	^23And Moses said unto the Lord, The people cannot come up to mount
	Sinai: for thou chargedst us, saying, Set bounds about the mount, and
	sanctify it.

	^24And the Lord said unto him, Away, get thee down, and thou shalt come
	up, thou, and Aaron with thee: but let not the priests and the people
	break through to come up unto the Lord, lest he break forth upon them.

	^25So Moses went down unto the people, and spake unto them.
	__________________________________________________________________

	Chapter 20

	And God spake all these words, saying,

	^2I am the Lord thy God, which have brought thee out of the land of
	Egypt, out of the house of bondage.

	^3Thou shalt have no other gods before me.

	^4Thou shalt not make unto thee any graven image, or any likeness of
	any thing that is in heaven above, or that is in the earth beneath, or
	that is in the water under the earth:

	^5Thou shalt not bow down thyself to them, nor serve them: for I the
	Lord thy God am a jealous God, visiting the iniquity of the fathers
	upon the children unto the third and fourth generation of them that
	hate me;

	^6And shewing mercy unto thousands of them that love me, and keep my
	commandments.

	^7Thou shalt not take the name of the Lord thy God in vain; for the
	Lord will not hold him guiltless that taketh his name in vain.

	^8Remember the sabbath day, to keep it holy.

	^9Six days shalt thou labour, and do all thy work:

	^10But the seventh day is the sabbath of the Lord thy God: in it thou
	shalt not do any work, thou, nor thy son, nor thy daughter, thy
	manservant, nor thy maidservant, nor thy cattle, nor thy stranger that
	is within thy gates:

	^11For in six days the Lord made heaven and earth, the sea, and all
	that in them is, and rested the seventh day: wherefore the Lord blessed
	the sabbath day, and hallowed it.

	^12Honour thy father and thy mother: that thy days may be long upon the
	land which the Lord thy God giveth thee.

	^13Thou shalt not kill.

	^14Thou shalt not commit adultery.

	^15Thou shalt not steal.

	^16Thou shalt not bear false witness against thy neighbour.

	^17Thou shalt not covet thy neighbour's house, thou shalt not covet thy
	neighbour's wife, nor his manservant, nor his maidservant, nor his ox,
	nor his ass, nor any thing that is thy neighbour's.

	^18And all the people saw the thunderings, and the lightnings, and the
	noise of the trumpet, and the mountain smoking: and when the people saw
	it, they removed, and stood afar off.

	^19And they said unto Moses, Speak thou with us, and we will hear: but
	let not God speak with us, lest we die.

	^20And Moses said unto the people, Fear not: for God is come to prove
	you, and that his fear may be before your faces, that ye sin not.

	^21And the people stood afar off, and Moses drew near unto the thick
	darkness where God was.

	^22And the Lord said unto Moses, Thus thou shalt say unto the children
	of Israel, Ye have seen that I have talked with you from heaven.

	^23Ye shall not make with me gods of silver, neither shall ye make unto
	you gods of gold.

	^24An altar of earth thou shalt make unto me, and shalt sacrifice
	thereon thy burnt offerings, and thy peace offerings, thy sheep, and
	thine oxen: in all places where I record my name I will come unto thee,
	and I will bless thee.

	^25And if thou wilt make me an altar of stone, thou shalt not build it
	of hewn stone: for if thou lift up thy tool upon it, thou hast polluted
	it.

	^26Neither shalt thou go up by steps unto mine altar, that thy
	nakedness be not discovered thereon.
	__________________________________________________________________

	Chapter 21

	Now these are the judgments which thou shalt set before them.

	^2If thou buy an Hebrew servant, six years he shall serve: and in the
	seventh he shall go out free for nothing.

	^3If he came in by himself, he shall go out by himself: if he were
	married, then his wife shall go out with him.

	^4If his master have given him a wife, and she have born him sons or
	daughters; the wife and her children shall be her master's, and he
	shall go out by himself.

	^5And if the servant shall plainly say, I love my master, my wife, and
	my children; I will not go out free:

	^6Then his master shall bring him unto the judges; he shall also bring
	him to the door, or unto the door post; and his master shall bore his
	ear through with an aul; and he shall serve him for ever.

	^7And if a man sell his daughter to be a maidservant, she shall not go
	out as the menservants do.

	^8If she please not her master, who hath betrothed her to himself, then
	shall he let her be redeemed: to sell her unto a strange nation he
	shall have no power, seeing he hath dealt deceitfully with her.

	^9And if he have betrothed her unto his son, he shall deal with her
	after the manner of daughters.

	^10If he take him another wife; her food, her raiment, and her duty of
	marriage, shall he not diminish.

	^11And if he do not these three unto her, then shall she go out free
	without money.

	^12He that smiteth a man, so that he die, shall be surely put to death.

	^13And if a man lie not in wait, but God deliver him into his hand;
	then I will appoint thee a place whither he shall flee.

	^14But if a man come presumptuously upon his neighbour, to slay him
	with guile; thou shalt take him from mine altar, that he may die.

	^15And he that smiteth his father, or his mother, shall be surely put
	to death.

	^16And he that stealeth a man, and selleth him, or if he be found in
	his hand, he shall surely be put to death.

	^17And he that curseth his father, or his mother, shall surely be put
	to death.

	^18And if men strive together, and one smite another with a stone, or
	with his fist, and he die not, but keepeth his bed:

	^19If he rise again, and walk abroad upon his staff, then shall he that
	smote him be quit: only he shall pay for the loss of his time, and
	shall cause him to be thoroughly healed.

	^20And if a man smite his servant, or his maid, with a rod, and he die
	under his hand; he shall be surely punished.

	^21Notwithstanding, if he continue a day or two, he shall not be
	punished: for he is his money.

	^22If men strive, and hurt a woman with child, so that her fruit depart
	from her, and yet no mischief follow: he shall be surely punished,
	according as the woman's husband will lay upon him; and he shall pay as
	the judges determine.

	^23And if any mischief follow, then thou shalt give life for life,

	^24Eye for eye, tooth for tooth, hand for hand, foot for foot,

	^25Burning for burning, wound for wound, stripe for stripe.

	^26And if a man smite the eye of his servant, or the eye of his maid,
	that it perish; he shall let him go free for his eye's sake.

	^27And if he smite out his manservant's tooth, or his maidservant's
	tooth; he shall let him go free for his tooth's sake.

	^28If an ox gore a man or a woman, that they die: then the ox shall be
	surely stoned, and his flesh shall not be eaten; but the owner of the
	ox shall be quit.

	^29But if the ox were wont to push with his horn in time past, and it
	hath been testified to his owner, and he hath not kept him in, but that
	he hath killed a man or a woman; the ox shall be stoned, and his owner
	also shall be put to death.

	^30If there be laid on him a sum of money, then he shall give for the
	ransom of his life whatsoever is laid upon him.

	^31Whether he have gored a son, or have gored a daughter, according to
	this judgment shall it be done unto him.

	^32If the ox shall push a manservant or a maidservant; he shall give
	unto their master thirty shekels of silver, and the ox shall be stoned.

	^33And if a man shall open a pit, or if a man shall dig a pit, and not
	cover it, and an ox or an ass fall therein;

	^34The owner of the pit shall make it good, and give money unto the
	owner of them; and the dead beast shall be his.

	^35And if one man's ox hurt another's, that he die; then they shall
	sell the live ox, and divide the money of it; and the dead ox also they
	shall divide.

	^36Or if it be known that the ox hath used to push in time past, and
	his owner hath not kept him in; he shall surely pay ox for ox; and the
	dead shall be his own.
	__________________________________________________________________

	Chapter 22

	If a man shall steal an ox, or a sheep, and kill it, or sell it; he
	shall restore five oxen for an ox, and four sheep for a sheep.

	^2If a thief be found breaking up, and be smitten that he die, there
	shall no blood be shed for him.

	^3If the sun be risen upon him, there shall be blood shed for him; for
	he should make full restitution; if he have nothing, then he shall be
	sold for his theft.

	^4If the theft be certainly found in his hand alive, whether it be ox,
	or ass, or sheep; he shall restore double.

	^5If a man shall cause a field or vineyard to be eaten, and shall put
	in his beast, and shall feed in another man's field; of the best of his
	own field, and of the best of his own vineyard, shall he make
	restitution.

	^6If fire break out, and catch in thorns, so that the stacks of corn,
	or the standing corn, or the field, be consumed therewith; he that
	kindled the fire shall surely make restitution.

	^7If a man shall deliver unto his neighbour money or stuff to keep, and
	it be stolen out of the man's house; if the thief be found, let him pay
	double.

	^8If the thief be not found, then the master of the house shall be
	brought unto the judges, to see whether he have put his hand unto his
	neighbour's goods.

	^9For all manner of trespass, whether it be for ox, for ass, for sheep,
	for raiment, or for any manner of lost thing, which another challengeth
	to be his, the cause of both parties shall come before the judges; and
	whom the judges shall condemn, he shall pay double unto his neighbour.

	^10If a man deliver unto his neighbour an ass, or an ox, or a sheep, or
	any beast, to keep; and it die, or be hurt, or driven away, no man
	seeing it:

	^11Then shall an oath of the Lord be between them both, that he hath
	not put his hand unto his neighbour's goods; and the owner of it shall
	accept thereof, and he shall not make it good.

	^12And if it be stolen from him, he shall make restitution unto the
	owner thereof.

	^13If it be torn in pieces, then let him bring it for witness, and he
	shall not make good that which was torn.

	^14And if a man borrow ought of his neighbour, and it be hurt, or die,
	the owner thereof being not with it, he shall surely make it good.

	^15But if the owner thereof be with it, he shall not make it good: if
	it be an hired thing, it came for his hire.

	^16And if a man entice a maid that is not betrothed, and lie with her,
	he shall surely endow her to be his wife.

	^17If her father utterly refuse to give her unto him, he shall pay
	money according to the dowry of virgins.

	^18Thou shalt not suffer a witch to live.

	^19Whosoever lieth with a beast shall surely be put to death.

	^20He that sacrificeth unto any god, save unto the Lord only, he shall
	be utterly destroyed.

	^21Thou shalt neither vex a stranger, nor oppress him: for ye were
	strangers in the land of Egypt.

	^22Ye shall not afflict any widow, or fatherless child.

	^23If thou afflict them in any wise, and they cry at all unto me, I
	will surely hear their cry;

	^24And my wrath shall wax hot, and I will kill you with the sword; and
	your wives shall be widows, and your children fatherless.

	^25If thou lend money to any of my people that is poor by thee, thou
	shalt not be to him as an usurer, neither shalt thou lay upon him
	usury.

	^26If thou at all take thy neighbour's raiment to pledge, thou shalt
	deliver it unto him by that the sun goeth down:

	^27For that is his covering only, it is his raiment for his skin:
	wherein shall he sleep? and it shall come to pass, when he crieth unto
	me, that I will hear; for I am gracious.

	^28Thou shalt not revile the gods, nor curse the ruler of thy people.

	^29Thou shalt not delay to offer the first of thy ripe fruits, and of
	thy liquors: the firstborn of thy sons shalt thou give unto me.

	^30Likewise shalt thou do with thine oxen, and with thy sheep: seven
	days it shall be with his dam; on the eighth day thou shalt give it me.

	^31And ye shall be holy men unto me: neither shall ye eat any flesh
	that is torn of beasts in the field; ye shall cast it to the dogs.
	__________________________________________________________________

	Chapter 23

	Thou shalt not raise a false report: put not thine hand with the wicked
	to be an unrighteous witness.

	^2Thou shalt not follow a multitude to do evil; neither shalt thou
	speak in a cause to decline after many to wrest judgment:

	^3Neither shalt thou countenance a poor man in his cause.

	^4If thou meet thine enemy's ox or his ass going astray, thou shalt
	surely bring it back to him again.

	^5If thou see the ass of him that hateth thee lying under his burden,
	and wouldest forbear to help him, thou shalt surely help with him.

	^6Thou shalt not wrest the judgment of thy poor in his cause.

	^7Keep thee far from a false matter; and the innocent and righteous
	slay thou not: for I will not justify the wicked.

	^8And thou shalt take no gift: for the gift blindeth the wise, and
	perverteth the words of the righteous.

	^9Also thou shalt not oppress a stranger: for ye know the heart of a
	stranger, seeing ye were strangers in the land of Egypt.

	^10And six years thou shalt sow thy land, and shalt gather in the
	fruits thereof:

	^11But the seventh year thou shalt let it rest and lie still; that the
	poor of thy people may eat: and what they leave the beasts of the field
	shall eat. In like manner thou shalt deal with thy vineyard, and with
	thy oliveyard.

	^12Six days thou shalt do thy work, and on the seventh day thou shalt
	rest: that thine ox and thine ass may rest, and the son of thy
	handmaid, and the stranger, may be refreshed.

	^13And in all things that I have said unto you be circumspect: and make
	no mention of the name of other gods, neither let it be heard out of
	thy mouth.

	^14Three times thou shalt keep a feast unto me in the year.

	^15Thou shalt keep the feast of unleavened bread: (thou shalt eat
			unleavened bread seven days, as I commanded thee, in the time appointed
			of the month Abib; for in it thou camest out from Egypt: and none shall
			appear before me empty:)

	^16And the feast of harvest, the firstfruits of thy labours, which thou
	hast sown in the field: and the feast of ingathering, which is in the
	end of the year, when thou hast gathered in thy labours out of the
	field.

	^17Three times in the year all thy males shall appear before the Lord
	GOD.

	^18Thou shalt not offer the blood of my sacrifice with leavened bread;
	neither shall the fat of my sacrifice remain until the morning.

	^19The first of the firstfruits of thy land thou shalt bring into the
	house of the Lord thy God. Thou shalt not seethe a kid in his mother's
	milk.

	^20Behold, I send an Angel before thee, to keep thee in the way, and to
	bring thee into the place which I have prepared.

	^21Beware of him, and obey his voice, provoke him not; for he will not
	pardon your transgressions: for my name is in him.

	^22But if thou shalt indeed obey his voice, and do all that I speak;
	then I will be an enemy unto thine enemies, and an adversary unto thine
	adversaries.

	^23For mine Angel shall go before thee, and bring thee in unto the
	Amorites, and the Hittites, and the Perizzites, and the Canaanites, the
	Hivites, and the Jebusites: and I will cut them off.

	^24Thou shalt not bow down to their gods, nor serve them, nor do after
	their works: but thou shalt utterly overthrow them, and quite break
	down their images.

	^25And ye shall serve the Lord your God, and he shall bless thy bread,
	and thy water; and I will take sickness away from the midst of thee.

	^26There shall nothing cast their young, nor be barren, in thy land:
	the number of thy days I will fulfil.

	^27I will send my fear before thee, and will destroy all the people to
	whom thou shalt come, and I will make all thine enemies turn their
	backs unto thee.

	^28And I will send hornets before thee, which shall drive out the
	Hivite, the Canaanite, and the Hittite, from before thee.

	^29I will not drive them out from before thee in one year; lest the
	land become desolate, and the beast of the field multiply against thee.

	^30By little and little I will drive them out from before thee, until
	thou be increased, and inherit the land.

	^31And I will set thy bounds from the Red sea even unto the sea of the
	Philistines, and from the desert unto the river: for I will deliver the
	inhabitants of the land into your hand; and thou shalt drive them out
	before thee.

	^32Thou shalt make no covenant with them, nor with their gods.

	^33They shall not dwell in thy land, lest they make thee sin against
	me: for if thou serve their gods, it will surely be a snare unto thee.
	__________________________________________________________________

	Chapter 24

	And he said unto Moses, Come up unto the Lord, thou, and Aaron, Nadab,
	and Abihu, and seventy of the elders of Israel; and worship ye afar
	off.

	^2And Moses alone shall come near the Lord: but they shall not come
	nigh; neither shall the people go up with him.

	^3And Moses came and told the people all the words of the Lord, and all
	the judgments: and all the people answered with one voice, and said,
	All the words which the Lord hath said will we do.

	^4And Moses wrote all the words of the Lord, and rose up early in the
	morning, and builded an altar under the hill, and twelve pillars,
	according to the twelve tribes of Israel.

	^5And he sent young men of the children of Israel, which offered burnt
	offerings, and sacrificed peace offerings of oxen unto the Lord.

	^6And Moses took half of the blood, and put it in basons; and half of
	the blood he sprinkled on the altar.

	^7And he took the book of the covenant, and read in the audience of the
	people: and they said, All that the Lord hath said will we do, and be
	obedient.

	^8And Moses took the blood, and sprinkled it on the people, and said,
	Behold the blood of the covenant, which the Lord hath made with you
	concerning all these words.

	^9Then went up Moses, and Aaron, Nadab, and Abihu, and seventy of the
	elders of Israel:

	^10And they saw the God of Israel: and there was under his feet as it
	were a paved work of a sapphire stone, and as it were the body of
	heaven in his clearness.

	^11And upon the nobles of the children of Israel he laid not his hand:
	also they saw God, and did eat and drink.

	^12And the Lord said unto Moses, Come up to me into the mount, and be
	there: and I will give thee tables of stone, and a law, and
	commandments which I have written; that thou mayest teach them.

	^13And Moses rose up, and his minister Joshua: and Moses went up into
	the mount of God.

	^14And he said unto the elders, Tarry ye here for us, until we come
	again unto you: and, behold, Aaron and Hur are with you: if any man
	have any matters to do, let him come unto them.

	^15And Moses went up into the mount, and a cloud covered the mount.

	^16And the glory of the Lord abode upon mount Sinai, and the cloud
	covered it six days: and the seventh day he called unto Moses out of
	the midst of the cloud.

	^17And the sight of the glory of the Lord was like devouring fire on
	the top of the mount in the eyes of the children of Israel.

	^18And Moses went into the midst of the cloud, and gat him up into the
	mount: and Moses was in the mount forty days and forty nights.
	__________________________________________________________________

	Chapter 25

	And the Lord spake unto Moses, saying,

	^2Speak unto the children of Israel, that they bring me an offering: of
	every man that giveth it willingly with his heart ye shall take my
	offering.

	^3And this is the offering which ye shall take of them; gold, and
	silver, and brass,

	^4And blue, and purple, and scarlet, and fine linen, and goats' hair,

	^5And rams' skins dyed red, and badgers' skins, and shittim wood,

	^6Oil for the light, spices for anointing oil, and for sweet incense,

	^7Onyx stones, and stones to be set in the ephod, and in the
	breastplate.

	^8And let them make me a sanctuary; that I may dwell among them.

	^9According to all that I shew thee, after the pattern of the
	tabernacle, and the pattern of all the instruments thereof, even so
	shall ye make it.

	^10And they shall make an ark of shittim wood: two cubits and a half
	shall be the length thereof, and a cubit and a half the breadth
	thereof, and a cubit and a half the height thereof.

	^11And thou shalt overlay it with pure gold, within and without shalt
	thou overlay it, and shalt make upon it a crown of gold round about.

	^12And thou shalt cast four rings of gold for it, and put them in the
	four corners thereof; and two rings shall be in the one side of it, and
	two rings in the other side of it.

	^13And thou shalt make staves of shittim wood, and overlay them with
	gold.

	^14And thou shalt put the staves into the rings by the sides of the
	ark, that the ark may be borne with them.

	^15The staves shall be in the rings of the ark: they shall not be taken
	from it.

	^16And thou shalt put into the ark the testimony which I shall give
	thee.

	^17And thou shalt make a mercy seat of pure gold: two cubits and a half
	shall be the length thereof, and a cubit and a half the breadth
	thereof.

	^18And thou shalt make two cherubims of gold, of beaten work shalt thou
	make them, in the two ends of the mercy seat.

	^19And make one cherub on the one end, and the other cherub on the
	other end: even of the mercy seat shall ye make the cherubims on the
	two ends thereof.

	^20And the cherubims shall stretch forth their wings on high, covering
	the mercy seat with their wings, and their faces shall look one to
	another; toward the mercy seat shall the faces of the cherubims be.

	^21And thou shalt put the mercy seat above upon the ark; and in the ark
	thou shalt put the testimony that I shall give thee.

	^22And there I will meet with thee, and I will commune with thee from
	above the mercy seat, from between the two cherubims which are upon the
	ark of the testimony, of all things which I will give thee in
	commandment unto the children of Israel.

	^23Thou shalt also make a table of shittim wood: two cubits shall be
	the length thereof, and a cubit the breadth thereof, and a cubit and a
	half the height thereof.

	^24And thou shalt overlay it with pure gold, and make thereto a crown
	of gold round about.

	^25And thou shalt make unto it a border of an hand breadth round about,
	and thou shalt make a golden crown to the border thereof round about.

	^26And thou shalt make for it four rings of gold, and put the rings in
	the four corners that are on the four feet thereof.

	^27Over against the border shall the rings be for places of the staves
	to bear the table.

	^28And thou shalt make the staves of shittim wood, and overlay them
	with gold, that the table may be borne with them.

	^29And thou shalt make the dishes thereof, and spoons thereof, and
	covers thereof, and bowls thereof, to cover withal: of pure gold shalt
	thou make them.

	^30And thou shalt set upon the table shewbread before me alway.

	^31And thou shalt make a candlestick of pure gold: of beaten work shall
	the candlestick be made: his shaft, and his branches, his bowls, his
	knops, and his flowers, shall be of the same.

	^32And six branches shall come out of the sides of it; three branches
	of the candlestick out of the one side, and three branches of the
	candlestick out of the other side:

	^33Three bowls made like unto almonds, with a knop and a flower in one
	branch; and three bowls made like almonds in the other branch, with a
	knop and a flower: so in the six branches that come out of the
	candlestick.

	^34And in the candlestick shall be four bowls made like unto almonds,
	with their knops and their flowers.

	^35And there shall be a knop under two branches of the same, and a knop
	under two branches of the same, and a knop under two branches of the
	same, according to the six branches that proceed out of the
	candlestick.

	^36Their knops and their branches shall be of the same: all it shall be
	one beaten work of pure gold.

	^37And thou shalt make the seven lamps thereof: and they shall light
	the lamps thereof, that they may give light over against it.

	^38And the tongs thereof, and the snuffdishes thereof, shall be of pure
	gold.

	^39Of a talent of pure gold shall he make it, with all these vessels.

	^40And look that thou make them after their pattern, which was shewed
	thee in the mount.
	__________________________________________________________________

	Chapter 26

	Moreover thou shalt make the tabernacle with ten curtains of fine
	twined linen, and blue, and purple, and scarlet: with cherubims of
	cunning work shalt thou make them.

	^2The length of one curtain shall be eight and twenty cubits, and the
	breadth of one curtain four cubits: and every one of the curtains shall
	have one measure.

	^3The five curtains shall be coupled together one to another; and other
	five curtains shall be coupled one to another.

	^4And thou shalt make loops of blue upon the edge of the one curtain
	from the selvedge in the coupling; and likewise shalt thou make in the
	uttermost edge of another curtain, in the coupling of the second.

	^5Fifty loops shalt thou make in the one curtain, and fifty loops shalt
	thou make in the edge of the curtain that is in the coupling of the
	second; that the loops may take hold one of another.

	^6And thou shalt make fifty taches of gold, and couple the curtains
	together with the taches: and it shall be one tabernacle.

	^7And thou shalt make curtains of goats' hair to be a covering upon the
	tabernacle: eleven curtains shalt thou make.

	^8The length of one curtain shall be thirty cubits, and the breadth of
	one curtain four cubits: and the eleven curtains shall be all of one
	measure.

	^9And thou shalt couple five curtains by themselves, and six curtains
	by themselves, and shalt double the sixth curtain in the forefront of
	the tabernacle.

	^10And thou shalt make fifty loops on the edge of the one curtain that
	is outmost in the coupling, and fifty loops in the edge of the curtain
	which coupleth the second.

	^11And thou shalt make fifty taches of brass, and put the taches into
	the loops, and couple the tent together, that it may be one.

	^12And the remnant that remaineth of the curtains of the tent, the half
	curtain that remaineth, shall hang over the backside of the tabernacle.

	^13And a cubit on the one side, and a cubit on the other side of that
	which remaineth in the length of the curtains of the tent, it shall
	hang over the sides of the tabernacle on this side and on that side, to
	cover it.

	^14And thou shalt make a covering for the tent of rams' skins dyed red,
	and a covering above of badgers' skins.

	^15And thou shalt make boards for the tabernacle of shittim wood
	standing up.

	^16Ten cubits shall be the length of a board, and a cubit and a half
	shall be the breadth of one board.

	^17Two tenons shall there be in one board, set in order one against
	another: thus shalt thou make for all the boards of the tabernacle.

	^18And thou shalt make the boards for the tabernacle, twenty boards on
	the south side southward.

	^19And thou shalt make forty sockets of silver under the twenty boards;
	two sockets under one board for his two tenons, and two sockets under
	another board for his two tenons.

	^20And for the second side of the tabernacle on the north side there
	shall be twenty boards:

	^21And their forty sockets of silver; two sockets under one board, and
	two sockets under another board.

	^22And for the sides of the tabernacle westward thou shalt make six
	boards.

	^23And two boards shalt thou make for the corners of the tabernacle in
	the two sides.

	^24And they shall be coupled together beneath, and they shall be
	coupled together above the head of it unto one ring: thus shall it be
	for them both; they shall be for the two corners.

	^25And they shall be eight boards, and their sockets of silver, sixteen
	sockets; two sockets under one board, and two sockets under another
	board.

	^26And thou shalt make bars of shittim wood; five for the boards of the
	one side of the tabernacle,

	^27And five bars for the boards of the other side of the tabernacle,
	and five bars for the boards of the side of the tabernacle, for the two
	sides westward.

	^28And the middle bar in the midst of the boards shall reach from end
	to end.

	^29And thou shalt overlay the boards with gold, and make their rings of
	gold for places for the bars: and thou shalt overlay the bars with
	gold.

	^30And thou shalt rear up the tabernacle according to the fashion
	thereof which was shewed thee in the mount.

	^31And thou shalt make a vail of blue, and purple, and scarlet, and
	fine twined linen of cunning work: with cherubims shall it be made:

	^32And thou shalt hang it upon four pillars of shittim wood overlaid
	with gold: their hooks shall be of gold, upon the four sockets of
	silver.

	^33And thou shalt hang up the vail under the taches, that thou mayest
	bring in thither within the vail the ark of the testimony: and the vail
	shall divide unto you between the holy place and the most holy.

	^34And thou shalt put the mercy seat upon the ark of the testimony in
	the most holy place.

	^35And thou shalt set the table without the vail, and the candlestick
	over against the table on the side of the tabernacle toward the south:
	and thou shalt put the table on the north side.

	^36And thou shalt make an hanging for the door of the tent, of blue,
	and purple, and scarlet, and fine twined linen, wrought with
	needlework.

	^37And thou shalt make for the hanging five pillars of shittim wood,
	and overlay them with gold, and their hooks shall be of gold: and thou
	shalt cast five sockets of brass for them.
	__________________________________________________________________

	Chapter 27

	And thou shalt make an altar of shittim wood, five cubits long, and
	five cubits broad; the altar shall be foursquare: and the height
	thereof shall be three cubits.

	^2And thou shalt make the horns of it upon the four corners thereof:
	his horns shall be of the same: and thou shalt overlay it with brass.

	^3And thou shalt make his pans to receive his ashes, and his shovels,
	and his basons, and his fleshhooks, and his firepans: all the vessels
	thereof thou shalt make of brass.

	^4And thou shalt make for it a grate of network of brass; and upon the
	net shalt thou make four brasen rings in the four corners thereof.

	^5And thou shalt put it under the compass of the altar beneath, that
	the net may be even to the midst of the altar.

	^6And thou shalt make staves for the altar, staves of shittim wood, and
	overlay them with brass.

	^7And the staves shall be put into the rings, and the staves shall be
	upon the two sides of the altar, to bear it.

	^8Hollow with boards shalt thou make it: as it was shewed thee in the
	mount, so shall they make it.

	^9And thou shalt make the court of the tabernacle: for the south side
	southward there shall be hangings for the court of fine twined linen of
	an hundred cubits long for one side:

	^10And the twenty pillars thereof and their twenty sockets shall be of
	brass; the hooks of the pillars and their fillets shall be of silver.

	^11And likewise for the north side in length there shall be hangings of
	an hundred cubits long, and his twenty pillars and their twenty sockets
	of brass; the hooks of the pillars and their fillets of silver.

	^12And for the breadth of the court on the west side shall be hangings
	of fifty cubits: their pillars ten, and their sockets ten.

	^13And the breadth of the court on the east side eastward shall be
	fifty cubits.

	^14The hangings of one side of the gate shall be fifteen cubits: their
	pillars three, and their sockets three.

	^15And on the other side shall be hangings fifteen cubits: their
	pillars three, and their sockets three.

	^16And for the gate of the court shall be an hanging of twenty cubits,
	of blue, and purple, and scarlet, and fine twined linen, wrought with
	needlework: and their pillars shall be four, and their sockets four.

	^17All the pillars round about the court shall be filleted with silver;
	their hooks shall be of silver, and their sockets of brass.

	^18The length of the court shall be an hundred cubits, and the breadth
	fifty every where, and the height five cubits of fine twined linen, and
	their sockets of brass.

	^19All the vessels of the tabernacle in all the service thereof, and
	all the pins thereof, and all the pins of the court, shall be of brass.

	^20And thou shalt command the children of Israel, that they bring thee
	pure oil olive beaten for the light, to cause the lamp to burn always.

	^21In the tabernacle of the congregation without the vail, which is
	before the testimony, Aaron and his sons shall order it from evening to
	morning before the Lord: it shall be a statute for ever unto their
	generations on the behalf of the children of Israel.
	__________________________________________________________________

	Chapter 28

	And take thou unto thee Aaron thy brother, and his sons with him, from
	among the children of Israel, that he may minister unto me in the
	priest's office, even Aaron, Nadab and Abihu, Eleazar and Ithamar,
	Aaron's sons.

	^2And thou shalt make holy garments for Aaron thy brother for glory and
	for beauty.

	^3And thou shalt speak unto all that are wise hearted, whom I have
	filled with the spirit of wisdom, that they may make Aaron's garments
	to consecrate him, that he may minister unto me in the priest's office.

	^4And these are the garments which they shall make; a breastplate, and
	an ephod, and a robe, and a broidered coat, a mitre, and a girdle: and
	they shall make holy garments for Aaron thy brother, and his sons, that
	he may minister unto me in the priest's office.

	^5And they shall take gold, and blue, and purple, and scarlet, and fine
	linen.

	^6And they shall make the ephod of gold, of blue, and of purple, of
	scarlet, and fine twined linen, with cunning work.

	^7It shall have the two shoulderpieces thereof joined at the two edges
	thereof; and so it shall be joined together.

	^8And the curious girdle of the ephod, which is upon it, shall be of
	the same, according to the work thereof; even of gold, of blue, and
	purple, and scarlet, and fine twined linen.

	^9And thou shalt take two onyx stones, and grave on them the names of
	the children of Israel:

	^10Six of their names on one stone, and the other six names of the rest
	on the other stone, according to their birth.

	^11With the work of an engraver in stone, like the engravings of a
	signet, shalt thou engrave the two stones with the names of the
	children of Israel: thou shalt make them to be set in ouches of gold.

	^12And thou shalt put the two stones upon the shoulders of the ephod
	for stones of memorial unto the children of Israel: and Aaron shall
	bear their names before the Lord upon his two shoulders for a memorial.

	^13And thou shalt make ouches of gold;

	^14And two chains of pure gold at the ends; of wreathen work shalt thou
	make them, and fasten the wreathen chains to the ouches.

	^15And thou shalt make the breastplate of judgment with cunning work;
	after the work of the ephod thou shalt make it; of gold, of blue, and
	of purple, and of scarlet, and of fine twined linen, shalt thou make
	it.

	^16Foursquare it shall be being doubled; a span shall be the length
	thereof, and a span shall be the breadth thereof.

	^17And thou shalt set in it settings of stones, even four rows of
	stones: the first row shall be a sardius, a topaz, and a carbuncle:
	this shall be the first row.

	^18And the second row shall be an emerald, a sapphire, and a diamond.

	^19And the third row a ligure, an agate, and an amethyst.

	^20And the fourth row a beryl, and an onyx, and a jasper: they shall be
	set in gold in their inclosings.

	^21And the stones shall be with the names of the children of Israel,
	twelve, according to their names, like the engravings of a signet;
every one with his name shall they be according to the twelve tribes.

^22And thou shalt make upon the breastplate chains at the ends of
wreathen work of pure gold.

^23And thou shalt make upon the breastplate two rings of gold, and
shalt put the two rings on the two ends of the breastplate.

^24And thou shalt put the two wreathen chains of gold in the two rings
which are on the ends of the breastplate.

^25And the other two ends of the two wreathen chains thou shalt fasten
in the two ouches, and put them on the shoulderpieces of the ephod
before it.

^26And thou shalt make two rings of gold, and thou shalt put them upon
the two ends of the breastplate in the border thereof, which is in the
side of the ephod inward.

^27And two other rings of gold thou shalt make, and shalt put them on
the two sides of the ephod underneath, toward the forepart thereof,
	over against the other coupling thereof, above the curious girdle of
	the ephod.

	^28And they shall bind the breastplate by the rings thereof unto the
	rings of the ephod with a lace of blue, that it may be above the
	curious girdle of the ephod, and that the breastplate be not loosed
	from the ephod.

	^29And Aaron shall bear the names of the children of Israel in the
	breastplate of judgment upon his heart, when he goeth in unto the holy
	place, for a memorial before the Lord continually.

	^30And thou shalt put in the breastplate of judgment the Urim and the
	Thummim; and they shall be upon Aaron's heart, when he goeth in before
	the Lord: and Aaron shall bear the judgment of the children of Israel
	upon his heart before the Lord continually.

	^31And thou shalt make the robe of the ephod all of blue.

	^32And there shall be an hole in the top of it, in the midst thereof:
	it shall have a binding of woven work round about the hole of it, as it
	were the hole of an habergeon, that it be not rent.

	^33And beneath upon the hem of it thou shalt make pomegranates of blue,
	and of purple, and of scarlet, round about the hem thereof; and bells
	of gold between them round about:

	^34A golden bell and a pomegranate, a golden bell and a pomegranate,
	upon the hem of the robe round about.

	^35And it shall be upon Aaron to minister: and his sound shall be heard
	when he goeth in unto the holy place before the Lord, and when he
	cometh out, that he die not.

	^36And thou shalt make a plate of pure gold, and grave upon it, like
	the engravings of a signet, HOLINESS TO THE Lord.

	^37And thou shalt put it on a blue lace, that it may be upon the mitre;
	upon the forefront of the mitre it shall be.

	^38And it shall be upon Aaron's forehead, that Aaron may bear the
	iniquity of the holy things, which the children of Israel shall hallow
	in all their holy gifts; and it shall be always upon his forehead, that
	they may be accepted before the Lord.

	^39And thou shalt embroider the coat of fine linen, and thou shalt make
	the mitre of fine linen, and thou shalt make the girdle of needlework.

	^40And for Aaron's sons thou shalt make coats, and thou shalt make for
	them girdles, and bonnets shalt thou make for them, for glory and for
	beauty.

	^41And thou shalt put them upon Aaron thy brother, and his sons with
	him; and shalt anoint them, and consecrate them, and sanctify them,
	that they may minister unto me in the priest's office.

	^42And thou shalt make them linen breeches to cover their nakedness;
	from the loins even unto the thighs they shall reach:

	^43And they shall be upon Aaron, and upon his sons, when they come in
	unto the tabernacle of the congregation, or when they come near unto
	the altar to minister in the holy place; that they bear not iniquity,
	and die: it shall be a statute for ever unto him and his seed after
	him.
	__________________________________________________________________

	Chapter 29

	And this is the thing that thou shalt do unto them to hallow them, to
	minister unto me in the priest's office: Take one young bullock, and
	two rams without blemish,

	^2And unleavened bread, and cakes unleavened tempered with oil, and
	wafers unleavened anointed with oil: of wheaten flour shalt thou make
	them.

	^3And thou shalt put them into one basket, and bring them in the
	basket, with the bullock and the two rams.

	^4And Aaron and his sons thou shalt bring unto the door of the
	tabernacle of the congregation, and shalt wash them with water.

	^5And thou shalt take the garments, and put upon Aaron the coat, and
	the robe of the ephod, and the ephod, and the breastplate, and gird him
	with the curious girdle of the ephod:

	^6And thou shalt put the mitre upon his head, and put the holy crown
	upon the mitre.

	^7Then shalt thou take the anointing oil, and pour it upon his head,
	and anoint him.

	^8And thou shalt bring his sons, and put coats upon them.

	^9And thou shalt gird them with girdles, Aaron and his sons, and put
	the bonnets on them: and the priest's office shall be theirs for a
	perpetual statute: and thou shalt consecrate Aaron and his sons.

	^10And thou shalt cause a bullock to be brought before the tabernacle
	of the congregation: and Aaron and his sons shall put their hands upon
	the head of the bullock.

	^11And thou shalt kill the bullock before the Lord, by the door of the
	tabernacle of the congregation.

	^12And thou shalt take of the blood of the bullock, and put it upon the
	horns of the altar with thy finger, and pour all the blood beside the
	bottom of the altar.

	^13And thou shalt take all the fat that covereth the inwards, and the
	caul that is above the liver, and the two kidneys, and the fat that is
	upon them, and burn them upon the altar.

	^14But the flesh of the bullock, and his skin, and his dung, shalt thou
	burn with fire without the camp: it is a sin offering.

	^15Thou shalt also take one ram; and Aaron and his sons shall put their
	hands upon the head of the ram.

	^16And thou shalt slay the ram, and thou shalt take his blood, and
	sprinkle it round about upon the altar.

	^17And thou shalt cut the ram in pieces, and wash the inwards of him,
	and his legs, and put them unto his pieces, and unto his head.

	^18And thou shalt burn the whole ram upon the altar: it is a burnt
	offering unto the Lord: it is a sweet savour, an offering made by fire
	unto the Lord.

	^19And thou shalt take the other ram; and Aaron and his sons shall put
	their hands upon the head of the ram.

	^20Then shalt thou kill the ram, and take of his blood, and put it upon
	the tip of the right ear of Aaron, and upon the tip of the right ear of
	his sons, and upon the thumb of their right hand, and upon the great
	toe of their right foot, and sprinkle the blood upon the altar round
	about.

	^21And thou shalt take of the blood that is upon the altar, and of the
	anointing oil, and sprinkle it upon Aaron, and upon his garments, and
	upon his sons, and upon the garments of his sons with him: and he shall
	be hallowed, and his garments, and his sons, and his sons' garments
	with him.

	^22Also thou shalt take of the ram the fat and the rump, and the fat
	that covereth the inwards, and the caul above the liver, and the two
	kidneys, and the fat that is upon them, and the right shoulder; for it
	is a ram of consecration:

	^23And one loaf of bread, and one cake of oiled bread, and one wafer
	out of the basket of the unleavened bread that is before the Lord:

	^24And thou shalt put all in the hands of Aaron, and in the hands of
	his sons; and shalt wave them for a wave offering before the Lord.

	^25And thou shalt receive them of their hands, and burn them upon the
	altar for a burnt offering, for a sweet savour before the Lord: it is
	an offering made by fire unto the Lord.

	^26And thou shalt take the breast of the ram of Aaron's consecration,
	and wave it for a wave offering before the Lord: and it shall be thy
	part.

	^27And thou shalt sanctify the breast of the wave offering, and the
	shoulder of the heave offering, which is waved, and which is heaved up,
	of the ram of the consecration, even of that which is for Aaron, and of
	that which is for his sons:

	^28And it shall be Aaron's and his sons' by a statute for ever from the
	children of Israel: for it is an heave offering: and it shall be an
	heave offering from the children of Israel of the sacrifice of their
	peace offerings, even their heave offering unto the Lord.

	^29And the holy garments of Aaron shall be his sons' after him, to be
	anointed therein, and to be consecrated in them.

	^30And that son that is priest in his stead shall put them on seven
	days, when he cometh into the tabernacle of the congregation to
	minister in the holy place.

	^31And thou shalt take the ram of the consecration, and seethe his
	flesh in the holy place.

	^32And Aaron and his sons shall eat the flesh of the ram, and the bread
	that is in the basket, by the door of the tabernacle of the
	congregation.

	^33And they shall eat those things wherewith the atonement was made, to
	consecrate and to sanctify them: but a stranger shall not eat thereof,
	because they are holy.

	^34And if ought of the flesh of the consecrations, or of the bread,
	remain unto the morning, then thou shalt burn the remainder with fire:
	it shall not be eaten, because it is holy.

	^35And thus shalt thou do unto Aaron, and to his sons, according to all
	things which I have commanded thee: seven days shalt thou consecrate
	them.

	^36And thou shalt offer every day a bullock for a sin offering for
	atonement: and thou shalt cleanse the altar, when thou hast made an
	atonement for it, and thou shalt anoint it, to sanctify it.

	^37Seven days thou shalt make an atonement for the altar, and sanctify
	it; and it shall be an altar most holy: whatsoever toucheth the altar
	shall be holy.

	^38Now this is that which thou shalt offer upon the altar; two lambs of
	the first year day by day continually.

	^39The one lamb thou shalt offer in the morning; and the other lamb
	thou shalt offer at even:

	^40And with the one lamb a tenth deal of flour mingled with the fourth
	part of an hin of beaten oil; and the fourth part of an hin of wine for
	a drink offering.

	^41And the other lamb thou shalt offer at even, and shalt do thereto
	according to the meat offering of the morning, and according to the
	drink offering thereof, for a sweet savour, an offering made by fire
	unto the Lord.

	^42This shall be a continual burnt offering throughout your generations
	at the door of the tabernacle of the congregation before the Lord:
	where I will meet you, to speak there unto thee.

	^43And there I will meet with the children of Israel, and the
	tabernacle shall be sanctified by my glory.

	^44And I will sanctify the tabernacle of the congregation, and the
	altar: I will sanctify also both Aaron and his sons, to minister to me
	in the priest's office.

	^45And I will dwell among the children of Israel, and will be their
	God.

	^46And they shall know that I am the Lord their God, that brought them
	forth out of the land of Egypt, that I may dwell among them: I am the
	Lord their God.
	__________________________________________________________________

	Chapter 30

	And thou shalt make an altar to burn incense upon: of shittim wood
	shalt thou make it.

	^2A cubit shall be the length thereof, and a cubit the breadth thereof;
	foursquare shall it be: and two cubits shall be the height thereof: the
	horns thereof shall be of the same.

	^3And thou shalt overlay it with pure gold, the top thereof, and the
	sides thereof round about, and the horns thereof; and thou shalt make
	unto it a crown of gold round about.

	^4And two golden rings shalt thou make to it under the crown of it, by
	the two corners thereof, upon the two sides of it shalt thou make it;
	and they shall be for places for the staves to bear it withal.

	^5And thou shalt make the staves of shittim wood, and overlay them with
	gold.

	^6And thou shalt put it before the vail that is by the ark of the
	testimony, before the mercy seat that is over the testimony, where I
	will meet with thee.

	^7And Aaron shall burn thereon sweet incense every morning: when he
	dresseth the lamps, he shall burn incense upon it.

	^8And when Aaron lighteth the lamps at even, he shall burn incense upon
	it, a perpetual incense before the Lord throughout your generations.

	^9Ye shall offer no strange incense thereon, nor burnt sacrifice, nor
	meat offering; neither shall ye pour drink offering thereon.

	^10And Aaron shall make an atonement upon the horns of it once in a
	year with the blood of the sin offering of atonements: once in the year
	shall he make atonement upon it throughout your generations: it is most
	holy unto the Lord.

	^11And the Lord spake unto Moses, saying,

	^12When thou takest the sum of the children of Israel after their
	number, then shall they give every man a ransom for his soul unto the
	Lord, when thou numberest them; that there be no plague among them,
	when thou numberest them.

	^13This they shall give, every one that passeth among them that are
	numbered, half a shekel after the shekel of the sanctuary: (a shekel is
			twenty gerahs:) an half shekel shall be the offering of the Lord.

	^14Every one that passeth among them that are numbered, from twenty
	years old and above, shall give an offering unto the Lord.

	^15The rich shall not give more, and the poor shall not give less than
	half a shekel, when they give an offering unto the Lord, to make an
	atonement for your souls.

	^16And thou shalt take the atonement money of the children of Israel,
	and shalt appoint it for the service of the tabernacle of the
	congregation; that it may be a memorial unto the children of Israel
	before the Lord, to make an atonement for your souls.

	^17And the Lord spake unto Moses, saying,

	^18Thou shalt also make a laver of brass, and his foot also of brass,
	to wash withal: and thou shalt put it between the tabernacle of the
	congregation and the altar, and thou shalt put water therein.

	^19For Aaron and his sons shall wash their hands and their feet
	thereat:

	^20When they go into the tabernacle of the congregation, they shall
	wash with water, that they die not; or when they come near to the altar
	to minister, to burn offering made by fire unto the Lord:

	^21So they shall wash their hands and their feet, that they die not:
	and it shall be a statute for ever to them, even to him and to his seed
	throughout their generations.

	^22Moreover the Lord spake unto Moses, saying,

	^23Take thou also unto thee principal spices, of pure myrrh five
	hundred shekels, and of sweet cinnamon half so much, even two hundred
	and fifty shekels, and of sweet calamus two hundred and fifty shekels,

	^24And of cassia five hundred shekels, after the shekel of the
	sanctuary, and of oil olive an hin:

	^25And thou shalt make it an oil of holy ointment, an ointment compound
	after the art of the apothecary: it shall be an holy anointing oil.

	^26And thou shalt anoint the tabernacle of the congregation therewith,
	and the ark of the testimony,

	^27And the table and all his vessels, and the candlestick and his
	vessels, and the altar of incense,

	^28And the altar of burnt offering with all his vessels, and the laver
	and his foot.

	^29And thou shalt sanctify them, that they may be most holy: whatsoever
	toucheth them shall be holy.

	^30And thou shalt anoint Aaron and his sons, and consecrate them, that
	they may minister unto me in the priest's office.

	^31And thou shalt speak unto the children of Israel, saying, This shall
	be an holy anointing oil unto me throughout your generations.

	^32Upon man's flesh shall it not be poured, neither shall ye make any
	other like it, after the composition of it: it is holy, and it shall be
	holy unto you.

	^33Whosoever compoundeth any like it, or whosoever putteth any of it
	upon a stranger, shall even be cut off from his people.

	^34And the Lord said unto Moses, Take unto thee sweet spices, stacte,
	and onycha, and galbanum; these sweet spices with pure frankincense: of
	each shall there be a like weight:

	^35And thou shalt make it a perfume, a confection after the art of the
	apothecary, tempered together, pure and holy:

	^36And thou shalt beat some of it very small, and put of it before the
	testimony in the tabernacle of the congregation, where I will meet with
	thee: it shall be unto you most holy.

	^37And as for the perfume which thou shalt make, ye shall not make to
	yourselves according to the composition thereof: it shall be unto thee
	holy for the Lord.

	^38Whosoever shall make like unto that, to smell thereto, shall even be
	cut off from his people.
	__________________________________________________________________

	Chapter 31

	And the Lord spake unto Moses, saying,

	^2See, I have called by name Bezaleel the son of Uri, the son of Hur,
	of the tribe of Judah:

	^3And I have filled him with the spirit of God, in wisdom, and in
	understanding, and in knowledge, and in all manner of workmanship,

	^4To devise cunning works, to work in gold, and in silver, and in
	brass,

	^5And in cutting of stones, to set them, and in carving of timber, to
	work in all manner of workmanship.

	^6And I, behold, I have given with him Aholiab, the son of Ahisamach,
	of the tribe of Dan: and in the hearts of all that are wise hearted I
	have put wisdom, that they may make all that I have commanded thee;

	^7The tabernacle of the congregation, and the ark of the testimony, and
	the mercy seat that is thereupon, and all the furniture of the
	tabernacle,

	^8And the table and his furniture, and the pure candlestick with all
	his furniture, and the altar of incense,

	^9And the altar of burnt offering with all his furniture, and the laver
	and his foot,

	^10And the cloths of service, and the holy garments for Aaron the
	priest, and the garments of his sons, to minister in the priest's
	office,

	^11And the anointing oil, and sweet incense for the holy place:
	according to all that I have commanded thee shall they do.

	^12And the Lord spake unto Moses, saying,

	^13Speak thou also unto the children of Israel, saying, Verily my
	sabbaths ye shall keep: for it is a sign between me and you throughout
	your generations; that ye may know that I am the Lord that doth
	sanctify you.

	^14Ye shall keep the sabbath therefore; for it is holy unto you: every
	one that defileth it shall surely be put to death: for whosoever doeth
	any work therein, that soul shall be cut off from among his people.

	^15Six days may work be done; but in the seventh is the sabbath of
	rest, holy to the Lord: whosoever doeth any work in the sabbath day, he
	shall surely be put to death.

	^16Wherefore the children of Israel shall keep the sabbath, to observe
	the sabbath throughout their generations, for a perpetual covenant.

	^17It is a sign between me and the children of Israel for ever: for in
	six days the Lord made heaven and earth, and on the seventh day he
	rested, and was refreshed.

	^18And he gave unto Moses, when he had made an end of communing with
	him upon mount Sinai, two tables of testimony, tables of stone, written
	with the finger of God.
	__________________________________________________________________

	Chapter 32

	And when the people saw that Moses delayed to come down out of the
	mount, the people gathered themselves together unto Aaron, and said
	unto him, Up, make us gods, which shall go before us; for as for this
	Moses, the man that brought us up out of the land of Egypt, we wot not
	what is become of him.

	^2And Aaron said unto them, Break off the golden earrings, which are in
	the ears of your wives, of your sons, and of your daughters, and bring
	them unto me.

	^3And all the people brake off the golden earrings which were in their
	ears, and brought them unto Aaron.

	^4And he received them at their hand, and fashioned it with a graving
	tool, after he had made it a molten calf: and they said, These be thy
	gods, O Israel, which brought thee up out of the land of Egypt.

	^5And when Aaron saw it, he built an altar before it; and Aaron made
	proclamation, and said, To morrow is a feast to the Lord.

	^6And they rose up early on the morrow, and offered burnt offerings,
	and brought peace offerings; and the people sat down to eat and to
	drink, and rose up to play.

	^7And the Lord said unto Moses, Go, get thee down; for thy people,
	which thou broughtest out of the land of Egypt, have corrupted
	themselves:

	^8They have turned aside quickly out of the way which I commanded them:
	they have made them a molten calf, and have worshipped it, and have
	sacrificed thereunto, and said, These be thy gods, O Israel, which have
	brought thee up out of the land of Egypt.

	^9And the Lord said unto Moses, I have seen this people, and, behold,
	it is a stiffnecked people:

	^10Now therefore let me alone, that my wrath may wax hot against them,
	and that I may consume them: and I will make of thee a great nation.

	^11And Moses besought the Lord his God, and said, Lord, why doth thy
	wrath wax hot against thy people, which thou hast brought forth out of
	the land of Egypt with great power, and with a mighty hand?

	^12Wherefore should the Egyptians speak, and say, For mischief did he
	bring them out, to slay them in the mountains, and to consume them from
	the face of the earth? Turn from thy fierce wrath, and repent of this
	evil against thy people.

	^13Remember Abraham, Isaac, and Israel, thy servants, to whom thou
	swarest by thine own self, and saidst unto them, I will multiply your
	seed as the stars of heaven, and all this land that I have spoken of
	will I give unto your seed, and they shall inherit it for ever.

	^14And the Lord repented of the evil which he thought to do unto his
	people.

	^15And Moses turned, and went down from the mount, and the two tables
	of the testimony were in his hand: the tables were written on both
	their sides; on the one side and on the other were they written.

	^16And the tables were the work of God, and the writing was the writing
	of God, graven upon the tables.

	^17And when Joshua heard the noise of the people as they shouted, he
	said unto Moses, There is a noise of war in the camp.

	^18And he said, It is not the voice of them that shout for mastery,
	neither is it the voice of them that cry for being overcome: but the
	noise of them that sing do I hear.

	^19And it came to pass, as soon as he came nigh unto the camp, that he
	saw the calf, and the dancing: and Moses' anger waxed hot, and he cast
	the tables out of his hands, and brake them beneath the mount.

	^20And he took the calf which they had made, and burnt it in the fire,
	and ground it to powder, and strawed it upon the water, and made the
	children of Israel drink of it.

	^21And Moses said unto Aaron, What did this people unto thee, that thou
	hast brought so great a sin upon them?

	^22And Aaron said, Let not the anger of my lord wax hot: thou knowest
	the people, that they are set on mischief.

	^23For they said unto me, Make us gods, which shall go before us: for
	as for this Moses, the man that brought us up out of the land of Egypt,
	we wot not what is become of him.

	^24And I said unto them, Whosoever hath any gold, let them break it
	off. So they gave it me: then I cast it into the fire, and there came
	out this calf.

	^25And when Moses saw that the people were naked; (for Aaron had made
			them naked unto their shame among their enemies:)

	^26Then Moses stood in the gate of the camp, and said, Who is on the
	Lord'S side? let him come unto me. And all the sons of Levi gathered
	themselves together unto him.

	^27And he said unto them, Thus saith the Lord God of Israel, Put every
	man his sword by his side, and go in and out from gate to gate
	throughout the camp, and slay every man his brother, and every man his
	companion, and every man his neighbour.

	^28And the children of Levi did according to the word of Moses: and
	there fell of the people that day about three thousand men.

	^29For Moses had said, Consecrate yourselves to day to the Lord, even
	every man upon his son, and upon his brother; that he may bestow upon
	you a blessing this day.

	^30And it came to pass on the morrow, that Moses said unto the people,
	Ye have sinned a great sin: and now I will go up unto the Lord;
peradventure I shall make an atonement for your sin.

^31And Moses returned unto the Lord, and said, Oh, this people have
sinned a great sin, and have made them gods of gold.

^32Yet now, if thou wilt forgive their sin--; and if not, blot me, I
pray thee, out of thy book which thou hast written.

^33And the Lord said unto Moses, Whosoever hath sinned against me, him
will I blot out of my book.

^34Therefore now go, lead the people unto the place of which I have
spoken unto thee: behold, mine Angel shall go before thee: nevertheless
in the day when I visit I will visit their sin upon them.

^35And the Lord plagued the people, because they made the calf, which
Aaron made.
__________________________________________________________________

Chapter 33

And the Lord said unto Moses, Depart, and go up hence, thou and the
people which thou hast brought up out of the land of Egypt, unto the
land which I sware unto Abraham, to Isaac, and to Jacob, saying, Unto
thy seed will I give it:

^2And I will send an angel before thee; and I will drive out the
Canaanite, the Amorite, and the Hittite, and the Perizzite, the Hivite,
	and the Jebusite:

	^3Unto a land flowing with milk and honey: for I will not go up in the
	midst of thee; for thou art a stiffnecked people: lest I consume thee
	in the way.

	^4And when the people heard these evil tidings, they mourned: and no
	man did put on him his ornaments.

	^5For the Lord had said unto Moses, Say unto the children of Israel, Ye
	are a stiffnecked people: I will come up into the midst of thee in a
	moment, and consume thee: therefore now put off thy ornaments from
	thee, that I may know what to do unto thee.

	^6And the children of Israel stripped themselves of their ornaments by
	the mount Horeb.

	^7And Moses took the tabernacle, and pitched it without the camp, afar
	off from the camp, and called it the Tabernacle of the congregation.
	And it came to pass, that every one which sought the Lord went out unto
	the tabernacle of the congregation, which was without the camp.

	^8And it came to pass, when Moses went out unto the tabernacle, that
	all the people rose up, and stood every man at his tent door, and
	looked after Moses, until he was gone into the tabernacle.

	^9And it came to pass, as Moses entered into the tabernacle, the cloudy
	pillar descended, and stood at the door of the tabernacle, and the Lord
	talked with Moses.

	^10And all the people saw the cloudy pillar stand at the tabernacle
	door: and all the people rose up and worshipped, every man in his tent
	door.

	^11And the Lord spake unto Moses face to face, as a man speaketh unto
	his friend. And he turned again into the camp: but his servant Joshua,
	the son of Nun, a young man, departed not out of the tabernacle.

	^12And Moses said unto the Lord, See, thou sayest unto me, Bring up
	this people: and thou hast not let me know whom thou wilt send with me.
	Yet thou hast said, I know thee by name, and thou hast also found grace
	in my sight.

	^13Now therefore, I pray thee, if I have found grace in thy sight, shew
	me now thy way, that I may know thee, that I may find grace in thy
	sight: and consider that this nation is thy people.

	^14And he said, My presence shall go with thee, and I will give thee
	rest.

	^15And he said unto him, If thy presence go not with me, carry us not
	up hence.

	^16For wherein shall it be known here that I and thy people have found
	grace in thy sight? is it not in that thou goest with us? so shall we
	be separated, I and thy people, from all the people that are upon the
	face of the earth.

	^17And the Lord said unto Moses, I will do this thing also that thou
	hast spoken: for thou hast found grace in my sight, and I know thee by
	name.

	^18And he said, I beseech thee, shew me thy glory.

	^19And he said, I will make all my goodness pass before thee, and I
	will proclaim the name of the Lord before thee; and will be gracious to
	whom I will be gracious, and will shew mercy on whom I will shew mercy.

	^20And he said, Thou canst not see my face: for there shall no man see
	me, and live.

	^21And the Lord said, Behold, there is a place by me, and thou shalt
	stand upon a rock:

	^22And it shall come to pass, while my glory passeth by, that I will
	put thee in a clift of the rock, and will cover thee with my hand while
	I pass by:

	^23And I will take away mine hand, and thou shalt see my back parts:
	but my face shall not be seen.
	__________________________________________________________________

	Chapter 34

	And the Lord said unto Moses, Hew thee two tables of stone like unto
	the first: and I will write upon these tables the words that were in
	the first tables, which thou brakest.

	^2And be ready in the morning, and come up in the morning unto mount
	Sinai, and present thyself there to me in the top of the mount.

	^3And no man shall come up with thee, neither let any man be seen
	throughout all the mount; neither let the flocks nor herds feed before
	that mount.

	^4And he hewed two tables of stone like unto the first; and Moses rose
	up early in the morning, and went up unto mount Sinai, as the Lord had
	commanded him, and took in his hand the two tables of stone.

	^5And the Lord descended in the cloud, and stood with him there, and
	proclaimed the name of the Lord.

	^6And the Lord passed by before him, and proclaimed, The Lord, The Lord
	God, merciful and gracious, longsuffering, and abundant in goodness and
	truth,

	^7Keeping mercy for thousands, forgiving iniquity and transgression and
	sin, and that will by no means clear the guilty; visiting the iniquity
	of the fathers upon the children, and upon the children's children,
	unto the third and to the fourth generation.

	^8And Moses made haste, and bowed his head toward the earth, and
	worshipped.

	^9And he said, If now I have found grace in thy sight, O Lord, let my
	Lord, I pray thee, go among us; for it is a stiffnecked people; and
	pardon our iniquity and our sin, and take us for thine inheritance.

	^10And he said, Behold, I make a covenant: before all thy people I will
	do marvels, such as have not been done in all the earth, nor in any
	nation: and all the people among which thou art shall see the work of
	the Lord: for it is a terrible thing that I will do with thee.

	^11Observe thou that which I command thee this day: behold, I drive out
	before thee the Amorite, and the Canaanite, and the Hittite, and the
	Perizzite, and the Hivite, and the Jebusite.

	^12Take heed to thyself, lest thou make a covenant with the inhabitants
	of the land whither thou goest, lest it be for a snare in the midst of
	thee:

	^13But ye shall destroy their altars, break their images, and cut down
	their groves:

	^14For thou shalt worship no other god: for the Lord, whose name is
	Jealous, is a jealous God:

	^15Lest thou make a covenant with the inhabitants of the land, and they
	go a whoring after their gods, and do sacrifice unto their gods, and
	one call thee, and thou eat of his sacrifice;

	^16And thou take of their daughters unto thy sons, and their daughters
	go a whoring after their gods, and make thy sons go a whoring after
	their gods.

	^17Thou shalt make thee no molten gods.

	^18The feast of unleavened bread shalt thou keep. Seven days thou shalt
	eat unleavened bread, as I commanded thee, in the time of the month
	Abib: for in the month Abib thou camest out from Egypt.

	^19All that openeth the matrix is mine; and every firstling among thy
	cattle, whether ox or sheep, that is male.

	^20But the firstling of an ass thou shalt redeem with a lamb: and if
	thou redeem him not, then shalt thou break his neck. All the firstborn
	of thy sons thou shalt redeem. And none shall appear before me empty.

	^21Six days thou shalt work, but on the seventh day thou shalt rest: in
	earing time and in harvest thou shalt rest.

	^22And thou shalt observe the feast of weeks, of the firstfruits of
	wheat harvest, and the feast of ingathering at the year's end.

	^23Thrice in the year shall all your men children appear before the
	Lord GOD, the God of Israel.

	^24For I will cast out the nations before thee, and enlarge thy
	borders: neither shall any man desire thy land, when thou shalt go up
	to appear before the Lord thy God thrice in the year.

	^25Thou shalt not offer the blood of my sacrifice with leaven; neither
	shall the sacrifice of the feast of the passover be left unto the
	morning.

	^26The first of the firstfruits of thy land thou shalt bring unto the
	house of the Lord thy God. Thou shalt not seethe a kid in his mother's
	milk.

	^27And the Lord said unto Moses, Write thou these words: for after the
	tenor of these words I have made a covenant with thee and with Israel.

	^28And he was there with the Lord forty days and forty nights; he did
	neither eat bread, nor drink water. And he wrote upon the tables the
	words of the covenant, the ten commandments.

	^29And it came to pass, when Moses came down from mount Sinai with the
	two tables of testimony in Moses' hand, when he came down from the
	mount, that Moses wist not that the skin of his face shone while he
	talked with him.

	^30And when Aaron and all the children of Israel saw Moses, behold, the
	skin of his face shone; and they were afraid to come nigh him.

	^31And Moses called unto them; and Aaron and all the rulers of the
	congregation returned unto him: and Moses talked with them.

	^32And afterward all the children of Israel came nigh: and he gave them
	in commandment all that the Lord had spoken with him in mount Sinai.

	^33And till Moses had done speaking with them, he put a vail on his
	face.

	^34But when Moses went in before the Lord to speak with him, he took
	the vail off, until he came out. And he came out, and spake unto the
	children of Israel that which he was commanded.

	^35And the children of Israel saw the face of Moses, that the skin of
	Moses' face shone: and Moses put the vail upon his face again, until he
	went in to speak with him.
	__________________________________________________________________

	Chapter 35
